UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form 10-K
(Mark one)
☒    ANNUAL REPOR T PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December  31, 2020
or
☐    TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period fr om to
Commission file number: 001-33156
First Solar , Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delawar e 20-4623678
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
350 West W ashington Str eet, Suite 600
Tempe , Arizona  85281
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(602) 414-9300
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common stock, $0.001 par value FSLR The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.  Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days.  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation
S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files).  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging
growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of
the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐
Smaller reporting company ☐ Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation on its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over
financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit
report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).  Yes ☐   No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’s common stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant as of June 30, 2020, the last business day of the registrant’s most
recently completed second fiscal quarter, was approximately $4.1 billion (based on the closing price of the registrant’s common stock on that date). As of February
19, 2021, 105,986,398 shares of the registrant’s common stock, $0.001 par value per share, were outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
The information required by Part III of this Form 10-K, to the extent not set forth herein, is incorporated by reference from the registrant’s definitive proxy statement
relating to the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held in 2021, which will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission within 120 days after the end
of the fiscal year to which this Form 10-K relates.
FIRST SOLAR, INC.
FORM 10-K FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2020
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 3
Information about Our Executive Officers 17
Item 1A. Risk Factors 20
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 49
Item 2. Properties 49
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 50
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 50
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 50
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 52
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 53
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 73
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 76
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 76
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 76
Item 9B. Other Information 77
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance 78
Item 11. Executive Compensation 78
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 78
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 79
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services 79
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 79
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 143
Signatures 144
Throughout this Annual Report on Form 10-K, we refer to First Solar, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries as “First Solar,” “the
Company,” “we,” “us,” and “our.” When referring to our manufacturing capacity, total sales, and solar module sales, the unit of
electricity in watts for megawatts (“MW”) and gigawatts (“GW”) is direct current (“DC” or “”) unless otherwise noted. When
referring to our projects or systems, the unit of electricity in watts for MW and GW is alternating current (“AC” or “”) unless
otherwise noted.DC
AC
Table of Contents
NOTE REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), and the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”), which are subject to
risks, uncertainties, and assumptions that are difficult to predict. All statements in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, other than
statements of historical fact, are forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are made pursuant to safe harbor
provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The forward-looking statements include statements, among
other things, concerning: the length and severity of the ongoing COVID-19 (novel coronavirus) outbreak, including its impacts
across our businesses on demand, manufacturing, project development, construction, operations and maintenance, financing, and
our global supply chains, actions that may be taken by governmental authorities to contain the COVID-19 outbreak or to treat its
impacts, and the ability of our customers, suppliers, equipment vendors, and other counterparties to fulfill their contractual
obligations to us; effects resulting from certain module manufacturing changes; our business strategy, including anticipated trends
and developments in and management plans for our business and the markets in which we operate; future financial results,
operating results, revenues, gross margin, operating expenses, products, projected costs (including estimated future module
collection and recycling costs), warranties, solar module technology and cost reduction roadmaps, restructuring, product reliability,
investments, and capital expenditures; our ability to continue to reduce the cost per watt of our solar modules; the impact of public
policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules; effects resulting from pending litigation; our
ability to expand manufacturing capacity worldwide; our ability to reduce the costs to develop and construct photovoltaic (“PV”)
solar power systems; research and development (“R&D”) programs and our ability to improve the wattage of our solar modules;
sales and marketing initiatives; and competition. In some cases, you can identify these statements by forward-looking words, such
as “estimate,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “project,” “plan,” “intend,” “seek,” “believe,” “forecast,” “foresee,” “likely,” “may,”
“should,” “goal,” “target,” “might,” “will,” “could,” “predict,” “continue,” and the negative or plural of these words, and other
comparable terminology. Forward-looking statements are only predictions based on our current expectations and our projections
about future events. All forward-looking statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K are based upon information
available to us as of the filing date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and therefore speak only as of the filing date. You should
not place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements. We undertake no obligation to update any of these forward-looking
statements for any reason, whether as a result of new information, future developments, or otherwise. These forward-looking
statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause our actual results, levels of activity,
performance, or achievements to differ materially from those expressed or implied by these statements, including, but not limited
to:
•structural imbalances in global supply and demand for PV solar modules;
•our competitive position and other key competitive factors;
•the market for renewable energy, including solar energy;
•the reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, policies, and support programs for solar energy projects;
•our ability to execute on our solar module technology and cost reduction roadmaps;
•our ability to improve the wattage of our solar modules;
•the impact of public policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules;
•the severity and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic, including its potential impact on the Company’s business, financial
condition, and results of operations;
1
Table of Contents
•interest rate fluctuations and both our and our customers’ ability to secure financing;
•our ability to execute on our long-term strategic plans;
•the loss of any of our large customers, or the ability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their contracts
with us;
•the creditworthiness of our off-take counterparties and the ability of our off-take counterparties to fulfill their contractual
obligations to us;
•the satisfaction of conditions precedent in our sales agreements;
•our ability to attract new customers and to develop and maintain existing customer and supplier relationships;
•claims under our limited warranty obligations;
•the supply and price of components and raw materials, including CdTe;
•our ability to convert existing or construct production facilities to support new product lines;
•future collection and recycling costs for solar modules covered by our module collection and recycling program;
•our ability to protect our intellectual property;
•our continued investment in R&D;
•our ability to successfully develop and complete our systems business projects;
•our ability to attract and retain key executive officers and associates;
•changes in, or the failure to comply with, government regulations and environmental, health, and safety requirements;
•general economic and business conditions, including those influenced by U.S., international, and geopolitical events;
•environmental responsibility, including with respect to cadmium telluride (“CdTe”) and other semiconductor materials;
•our ability to prevent and/or minimize the impact of cyber-attacks or other breaches of our information systems;
•effects arising from pending litigation; and
•all other matters discussed in Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, our
subsequently filed Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, and our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission
(the “SEC”).
You should carefully consider the risks and uncertainties described under this section.
2
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
Company Overview
We are a leading global provider of PV solar energy solutions. We design, manufacture, and sell PV solar modules with an
advanced thin film semiconductor technology. In certain markets, we also develop and sell PV solar power systems that primarily
use the modules we manufacture and provide operations and maintenance (“O&M”) services to system owners. We have
substantial, ongoing R&D efforts focused on various technology innovations. We are the world’s largest thin film PV solar module
manufacturer and the largest PV solar module manufacturer in the Western Hemisphere.
In addressing the overall global demand for electricity, our CdTe modules, which leverage our Series 6 (“Series 6”) module
technology, compete favorably on an economic basis with traditional forms of energy generation and provide low cost electricity to
end users. Our diverse capabilities facilitate the sale of these solutions and the adoption of our technology in key markets around
the world. We believe our strategies and points of differentiation provide the foundation for our competitive position and enable us
to remain one of the preferred providers of PV solar modules.
Business Strategy
Differentiated Technology
As a field-proven technology, our CdTe solar modules offer certain advantages over conventional crystalline silicon solar modules
by delivering competitive efficiency, higher real-world energy yield, and long-term reliability. Proven to deliver up to 8% more
usable energy per nameplate watt than crystalline silicon technologies in certain geographic markets and with a record of reliable
system performance, our CdTe technology delivers more energy over the lifetime of a PV solar power system. Our Series 6 module
technology, with its combination of high wattage, low manufacturing costs, and balance of systems (“BoS”) component
compatibility, has further enhanced our competitive position since the launch of such technology in 2018.
In terms of energy yield, in many climates our CdTe solar modules provide an energy production advantage over crystalline silicon
solar modules of equivalent efficiency rating. For example, our CdTe solar modules provide a superior temperature coefficient,
which results in stronger system performance in typical high insolation climates as the majority of a system’s generation, on
average, occurs when module temperatures are well above 25°C (standard test conditions). In addition, our CdTe solar modules
provide a superior spectral response in humid environments where atmospheric moisture alters the solar spectrum relative to
laboratory standards. Our CdTe solar modules also provide a better partial shading response than conventional crystalline silicon
solar modules, which may experience significantly lower energy generation than CdTe solar modules when partial shading occurs.
As a result of these and other factors, our PV solar modules typically produce more annual energy in real world field conditions
than conventional modules with the same nameplate capacity. Furthermore, our thin-film CdTe semiconductor technology is
immune to cell cracking and its resulting power output loss, a common failure often observed in crystalline silicon modules caused
by poor manufacturing, handling, weather, or other conditions.
Manufacturing Process
Our modules are manufactured in a high-throughput, automated environment that integrates all manufacturing steps into a
continuous flow line. Such manufacturing process eliminates the multiple supply chain operators and resource-intensive batch
processing steps that are used to produce crystalline silicon solar modules, which typically occur over several days and across
multiple factories. At the outset of the production of our modules, a sheet of glass enters the production line and in a matter of
hours is transformed into a completed module, which is flash tested,TM
3
Table of Contents
packaged, and ready for shipment. With more than 30 GW of modules sold worldwide, we have a demonstrated history of
manufacturing success and innovation. We have a global manufacturing footprint with facilities based in the United States,
Malaysia, and Vietnam.
Diversified Capabilities
We are diversified across the solar value chain. Many of the efficiencies and capabilities that we deliver to our customers are not
easily replicable for other industry participants that are not diversified in a similar manner. Accordingly, our operational model
offers PV solar energy solutions that benefit from our wide range of capabilities, including advanced PV solar module
manufacturing and, in certain markets, project development, construction management services, and O&M services.
Financial Viability
We are committed to creating long-term shareholder value through a decision-making framework that delivers a balance of growth,
profitability, and liquidity. This framework has enabled us to fund our Series 6 manufacturing and capacity expansion initiatives
using cash flows generated by our operations despite substantial downward pressure on the price of solar modules and systems due
to competition, demand fluctuations, and significant overcapacity in the industry. Our financial viability provides strategic
optionality as we evaluate how to invest in our business and generate returns for our shareholders. Our financial viability and
bankability also enable us to offer meaningful warranties, which provide us with a competitive advantage relative to many of our
peers in the solar industry in the context of project financing and offering PV solar energy solutions to long-term owners.
Furthermore, we expect our financial discipline and ability to manage operating costs to enhance our profitability as we continue to
scale our business.
Sustainability
In addition to our financial commitments, we are also committed to minimizing the environmental impacts and enhancing the social
and economic benefits of our products across their life cycle, from raw material sourcing through end-of-life module recycling. Our
thin film modules are manufactured in a high-throughput, automated environment that integrates all manufacturing steps into a
continuous-flow operation, using less energy, water, and semiconductor material than conventional crystalline silicon. Accordingly,
our modules and systems provide an ecologically leading solution to climate change, energy security, and water scarcity, which also
enables our customers to achieve their sustainability objectives. On a lifecycle basis, our thin film module technology has the
fastest energy payback time, smallest carbon footprint, and lowest water use of any PV solar technology on the market.
The energy payback time, which is the amount of time a system must operate to recover the energy required to produce it, of our
module technology is facilitated by our specialized manufacturing process. In less than six months under high irradiance
conditions, our systems produce more energy than was required to create them. This energy payback time represents a 50-fold
energy return on investment over a theoretical 25-year system lifetime and an abundant net energy gain to the electricity grid.
Furthermore, our module technology displaces up to 98% of greenhouse gas emissions and other air pollutants when replacing
traditional forms of energy generation. Our modules also use up to 400 times less water per MW hour than conventional energy
sources and up to 24 times less water than other PV solar modules. In addition, our industry-leading recycling process further
enhances our sustainability advantage by recovering approximately 90% of the glass for reuse in new glass products and over 90%
of the semiconductor material for reuse in new modules. During 2020 our Series 6 modules became the world’s first PV product to
be included in the Electronic Products Environmental Assessment Tool (“EPEAT”) Registry’s Photovoltaic and Inverters product
category. The EPEAT Registry enables the identification of credible sustainable electronic products from a broad range of
manufacturers based on several factors, including the product’s raw materials, manufacturing energy, water use, product packaging,
end-of-life recycling, and corporate responsibility.DC
4
Table of Contents
Offerings and Capabilities
We are focusing on markets and energy applications in which solar power can be a least-cost, best-fit energy solution, particularly
in regions with high solar resources, significant current or projected electricity demand, and/or relatively high existing electricity
prices. We differentiate our product offerings by geographic market and localize the solution, as needed. Our consultative approach
to our customers’ solar energy needs and capabilities results in customized solutions to meet their economic goals. As a result, we
have designed our product and service offerings according to the following business areas:
•PV Solar Modules. Our modules couple our leading-edge CdTe technology with the manufacturing excellence and quality
control that comes from being one of the world’s most experienced producers of advanced PV solar modules. Our
technology demonstrates certain performance advantages over crystalline silicon solar modules of equivalent efficiency
rating by delivering higher real-world energy yield and long-term reliability. We are able to provide such product
performance, quality, and reliability to our customers due, in large part, to our consistent and sustained investments in
R&D activities.
•Power Plant Solutions. In certain markets, we develop and sell PV solar power systems that primarily use the modules we
manufacture and provide O&M services to optimize system performance and comply with project agreements and
regulations. Our grid-connected systems support a diversified energy portfolio, reduce fossil-fuel consumption, mitigate
the risk of fuel price volatility, and save costs, proving that centralized solar generation can deliver dependable and
affordable solar electricity to the grid around the world. Additional benefits of our grid-connected power systems include
reductions of fuel imports and improvements in energy security, faster time-to-power, and managed variability through
accurate forecasting. Our products and services are engineered to enable the maximization of energy output and revenue
for our customers while significantly reducing their unplanned maintenance costs.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services business,
we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to
pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with a subsidiary of Clairvest Group, Inc.
(“Clairvest”) for the sale of our North American O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of
closing conditions, including the receipt of certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming
satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our U.S. project development
business, we have determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to pursue the sale of this business. On January 24, 2021,
we entered into an agreement with a subsidiary of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System (“OMERS”) for the sale of
our U.S. project development operations, which comprises the business of developing, contracting for the construction of, and
selling utility-scale PV solar power systems. The transaction includes our approximately 10 GW utility-scale solar project
pipeline, including the advanced-stage Horizon, Madison, Ridgely, Rabbitbrush, and Oak Trail projects that are expected to
commence construction in the next two years; the 30 MW Barilla Solar project, which is operational; and certain other
equipment. In addition, OMERS has agreed to certain module purchase commitments. The completion of the transaction is
contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approval from the U.S. Federal Energy Regulatory
Commission (“FERC”), the expiration of the mandatory waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the transaction by the
Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States (“CFIUS”), and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction
of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.AC
AC
5
Table of Contents
Market Overview
Solar energy is one of the fastest growing forms of renewable energy with numerous economic and environmental benefits that
make it an attractive complement to and/or substitute for traditional forms of energy generation. In recent years, the price of PV
solar power systems, and accordingly the cost of producing electricity from such systems, has dropped to levels that are
competitive with or below the wholesale price of electricity in many markets. This rapid price decline has opened new possibilities
to develop systems in many locations with limited or no financial incentives. Other technological developments in the industry,
such as the advancement of energy storage capabilities, have further enhanced the prospects of solar energy as an alternative to
traditional forms of energy generation. Furthermore, the fact that a PV solar power system requires no fuel provides a unique and
valuable hedging benefit to owners of such systems relative to traditional energy generation assets. Once installed, PV solar power
systems can function for over 35 years with relatively less maintenance or oversight compared to many other forms of generation.
In addition to these economic benefits, solar energy has substantial environmental benefits. For example, PV solar power systems
generate no greenhouse gas or other emissions and use minimal amounts of water compared to traditional energy generation assets.
Worldwide solar markets continue to develop, aided by the above factors as well as demand elasticity resulting from declining
industry average selling prices, both at the module and system level, which have made solar power one of the most economically
attractive sources of energy.
Module average selling prices in many global markets have declined in recent years and are expected to continue to decline to some
degree in the future. In the aggregate, we believe manufacturers of solar cells and modules have significant installed production
capacity, relative to global demand, and the ability for additional capacity expansion. We believe the solar industry may from time
to time experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand (i.e., where production capacity exceeds global
demand), and that such periods will continue to put pressure on pricing. Additionally, intense competition at the system level may
result in an environment in which pricing falls rapidly, thereby further increasing demand for solar energy solutions but
constraining the ability for project developers and diversified module manufacturers to sustain meaningful and consistent
profitability. In light of such market realities, we are focusing on our strategies and points of differentiation, which include our
advanced module technology, our manufacturing process, our diversified capabilities, our financial viability, and the sustainability
advantage of our modules and systems.
Global Markets
We have established and continue to develop a global business presence. Energy markets are, by their nature, localized, with
different drivers and market forces impacting electricity generation and demand in a particular region or for a particular application.
Accordingly, our business is evolving worldwide and is shaped by the varying ways in which our offerings can be compelling and
economically viable solutions to energy needs in various markets. Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, market growth in certain
geographies in which we operate has slowed. For a detailed discussion of the impact of, and potential risks arising from, the
COVID-19 pandemic on our business, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The COVID-19 pandemic could materially impact our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.”
We are currently focusing on markets, including those listed below, in which our CdTe solar modules provide certain advantages
over conventional crystalline silicon solar modules, including high insolation climates in which our modules provide a superior
temperature coefficient, humid environments in which our modules provide a superior spectral response, and markets that favor the
superior sustainability profile of our PV solar technology. To the extent our production capacity expands in future periods, we have
the potential to extend our focus to additional geographic markets.
United States. Multiple markets within the United States, which accounted for 68% of our 2020 net sales, exemplify favorable
characteristics for a solar market, including (i) sizeable electricity demand, particularly around growing population centers and
industrial areas; (ii) strong demand for renewable energy generation; and (iii) abundant solar resources. In those areas and
applications in which these factors are more pronounced, our PV solar energy solutions
6
Table of Contents
compete favorably on an economic basis with traditional forms of energy generation. The market penetration of PV solar is also
impacted by certain federal and state support programs, including the federal investment tax credit, as described below under
“Support Programs.”
Japan. Japan’s electricity markets have various characteristics, which make them attractive markets for PV solar energy. In
particular, Japan has few domestic fossil fuel resources and relies heavily on fossil fuel imports. Following the Fukushima
earthquake in 2011, the country introduced certain initiatives to limit its reliance on nuclear power. Accordingly, the Japanese
government announced a long-term goal of dramatically increasing installed solar power capacity and provided various incentives
for solar power installations. In recent years, we have partnered with local companies to develop, construct, sell, and operate
various PV solar power systems, which are expected to mitigate Japan’s dependence on fossil fuel imports and nuclear power. In
2020, we completed the sale of multiple projects in Japan totaling 116 MW and expect to continue providing O&M services to
such projects in the future. We continue to pursue other utility-scale project development, O&M, and module sale opportunities in
the country.
Europe. Most markets across Europe reflect strong demand for PV solar energy due to its ability to compete economically with
more traditional forms of energy generation. In particular, France, Germany, Greece, Italy, the Netherlands, Portugal, and Spain are
all running tenders in which utility-scale PV solar projects can bid for capacity. Such tenders and other recent market developments
indicate the potential for further growth in the demand for PV solar energy beyond the region’s installed generation capacity of
approximately 135 GW. Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the market growth in Europe has slowed, and the utility-scale market
has experienced some delays in both tenders and installations. We continue to pursue module sales activities in many of the
countries mentioned above.
India. India continues to represent one of the largest and fastest growing markets for PV solar energy with an installed generation
capacity of over 36 GW and over 20 GW of new procurement programs announced. In addition, the government has
established aggressive renewable energy targets, which include increasing the country’s solar capacity to 100 GW by 2022, and
the overall renewable energy target of 450 GW of installed capacity by 2030. These targets, along with various policy and
regulatory measures, help create significant and sustained demand for PV solar energy. Accordingly, we expect to continue selling
modules to market participants to address the region’s energy needs. In 2020, we completed the sale of our Anantapur and
Tungabhadra projects located in Telangana and Karnataka, respectively, which total 40 MW. In addition, we continue to maintain
our strong module presence in India with approximately 2 GW of installed modules.
Support Programs
Although we compete in many markets that do not require solar-specific government subsidies or support programs, our net sales
and profits remain subject, in the near term, to variability based on the availability and size of government subsidies and economic
incentives, such as quotas, renewable portfolio standards, and tendering systems. In addition to these support programs, financial
incentives for PV solar energy generation may include tax and production incentives. Additionally, to address the near-term
business disruption caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, many governments have proposed policies or support programs intended
to stimulate their respective economies. Such support programs may include additional incentives for renewable energy projects,
including PV solar power systems, over several years. Although we expect to become less impacted by and less dependent on these
forms of government support over time, such programs continue to influence the demand for PV solar energy around the world.
In Europe, renewable energy targets, in conjunction with tenders for utility-scale PV solar and other support measures, have
contributed to growth in PV solar markets. Renewable energy targets prescribe how much energy consumption must come from
renewable sources, while incentive policies and competitive tender policies are intended to support new supply development by
providing certainty to investors. Various European UnionAC
DC
DC DC
AC
DC 
AC
DC
7
Table of Contents
(“EU”) directives on renewable energy have set targets for all EU member states in support of the recently revised goal of a 55%
share of energy from renewable sources in the EU by 2030.
Tax incentive programs exist in the United States at both the federal and state level and can take the form of investment and
production tax credits, accelerated depreciation, and sales and property tax exemptions and abatements. At the federal level,
investment tax credits for business and residential solar systems have gone through several cycles of enactment and expiration since
the 1980s. In 2015, the U.S. Congress extended the 30% federal energy investment tax credit (“ITC”) for both residential and
commercial solar installations through 2019. Among other requirements, such credits require projects to have commenced
construction by a certain date, which may be achieved by certain qualifying procurement activities. Accordingly, projects that
commenced construction in 2019 were eligible for the 30% ITC. The ITC stepped down to 26% for projects that commenced
construction in 2020. In December 2020, the U.S. Congress extended the 26% ITC through 2022 as part of its COVID-19 relief
efforts. As a result of this extension, the ITC will step down to 22% for projects that commence construction in 2023 and 10% for
projects that commence construction thereafter. The ITC has been an important economic driver of solar installations and
qualifying procurement activities in the United States, and its extension has contributed to greater medium-term demand. The
positive impact of the ITC depends to a large degree on the availability of tax equity for project financing, and any significant
reduction in the availability of tax equity in the future could make it more difficult to develop and construct projects requiring
financing.
The majority of states in the United States have also enacted legislation adopting Renewable Portfolio Standard (“RPS”)
mechanisms. Under an RPS, regulated utilities and other load serving entities are required to procure a specified percentage of their
total retail electricity sales to end-user customers from eligible renewable resources, such as solar energy generation facilities, by a
specified date. Some programs may further require that a specified portion of the total percentage of renewable energy must come
from solar generation facilities or other technologies. RPS mechanisms and other legislation vary significantly from state to state,
particularly with respect to the percentage of renewable energy required to achieve the state’s RPS, the definition of eligible
renewable energy resources, and the extent to which renewable energy credits qualify for RPS compliance.
Measured in terms of the volume of renewable electricity required to meet its RPS mandate, California’s RPS program is one of the
most significant in the United States. In addition to serving as a template for other states, the California market for renewable
energy has historically been a key region for First Solar and has led the western United States in renewable energy demand for the
past several years. First enacted in 2002, California’s RPS statute has been amended several times to increase the overall percentage
requirement as well as to accelerate the target date for program compliance. Pursuant to the passage of SB100 by the California
legislature in 2018, the California RPS program requires utilities and other obligated load serving entities to procure 60% of their
total retail electricity demand from eligible renewable resources by 2030 and 100% of such electricity demand from carbon-free
resources by 2045.
Various proposed and contemplated environmental and tax policies may create regulatory uncertainty in the renewable energy
sector, including the solar energy sector, and may lead to a reduction or removal of various clean energy programs and initiatives
designed to curtail climate change. For more information about the risks associated with these potential government actions, see
Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives,
renewable energy targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other public policies, such as tariffs or other
trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and
systems and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating
results.”
8
Table of Contents
Business Segments
We operate our business in two segments. Our modules segment involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules,
which convert sunlight into electricity. Third-party customers of our modules segment include integrators and operators of PV solar
power systems. Our second segment is our systems segment, through which we provide power plant solutions in certain markets,
which include (i) project development, (ii) engineering, procurement, and construction (“EPC”) services, and (iii) O&M services.
We may provide any combination of individual products and services within such capabilities (including, with respect to EPC
services, by contracting with third parties) depending upon the customer and market opportunity. Our systems segment customers
include utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial companies, and other system owners. As part of our
systems segment, we may also temporarily own and operate certain of our systems for a period of time based on strategic
opportunities or market factors. See Note 20. “Segment and Geographical Information” to our consolidated financial statements for
further information regarding our business segments.
Modules Business
Solar Modules
Since the inception of First Solar, our flagship module has used our advanced thin film semiconductor technology. In April 2018,
we commenced commercial production of our Series 6 module technology, which represents the latest generation of our flagship
module. Each Series 6 module is a glass laminate approximately 4ft x 6ft (123cm x 201cm) in size that encapsulates thin film
semiconductor materials. At the end of 2020, our Series 6 modules had an average power output of 439 watts. Our modules offer
up to 8% more energy than certain crystalline silicon solar modules of equivalent nameplate capacity and generally include anti-
reflective coated glass, which enhances energy production. Our module semiconductor structure is a single-junction polycrystalline
thin film that uses CdTe as the absorption layer. CdTe has absorption properties that are well matched to the solar spectrum and can
deliver competitive wattage using approximately 1-2% of the amount of semiconductor material used to manufacture conventional
crystalline silicon modules. Due to its minimal thickness, our thin-film CdTe semiconductor technology is also immune to cell
cracking and its resulting power output loss, a common failure often observed in crystalline silicon modules caused by poor
manufacturing, handling, weather, or other conditions.
Manufacturing Process
We manufacture our solar modules on integrated production lines in an automated, proprietary, and continuous process, which
includes the following three stages: (i) the deposition stage, (ii) the cell definition and treatment stage, and (iii) the assembly and
test stage. In the deposition stage, panels of transparent oxide-coated glass are robotically loaded onto the production line where
they are cleaned, laser-mark identified with a serial number, heated, and coated with thin layers of CdTe and other semiconductor
materials using our proprietary vapor transport deposition technology, after which the semiconductor-coated plates are cooled
rapidly to increase glass strength. In the cell definition and treatment stage, we use high-speed lasers to transform the large
continuous semiconductor coating on the glass plate into a series of interconnected cells that deliver the desired current and voltage
output. In this stage, we also treat the semiconductor film using proprietary chemistries and processes to improve the device’s
performance, and we apply a metal sputtered back contact. In the assembly and test stage, we apply busbars, inter-layer material,
and a rear glass cover sheet that is laminated to encapsulate the device. We then apply anti-reflective coating material to the
substrate glass to further improve the module’s performance by increasing its ability to absorb sunlight. Finally, junction boxes,
termination wires, and an under-mount frame are applied to complete the assembly.
We maintain a robust quality and reliability assurance program that monitors critical process parameters and measures product
performance to ensure that industry and more stringent internal standards are met. We also conduct acceptance testing for electrical
leakage, visual quality, and power measurement on a solar simulator prior to preparing a module for shipment. The quality and
reliability tests complement production surveillance with an
9
Table of Contents
ongoing monitoring program, subjecting production modules to accelerated life stress testing to help ensure ongoing conformance
to requirements of the International Electrotechnical Commission and Underwriters Laboratories Inc. These programs help assure
delivery of power and performance in the field with a high level of product quality and reliability.
Research and Development
Our R&D model differentiates us from much of our competition due to its vertical integration, from advanced research to product
development, manufacturing, and applications. We continue to devote substantial resources to our R&D efforts, which generally
focus on continually improving the wattage and energy yield of our solar modules. We also focus our R&D activities on
continuously improving module durability and manufacturing efficiencies, including throughput improvement, volume ramp, and
material cost reduction. Based on publicly available information, we are one of the leaders in R&D investment among PV solar
module manufacturers, maintaining a rate of innovation that enables rapid wattage gains and cost reductions.
In the course of our R&D activities, we explore various technologies in our efforts to sustain competitive differentiation in our
modules. We primarily conduct our R&D activities and qualify process and product improvements for full production at our
Perrysburg, Ohio plant and then use a systematic process to propagate them to our other production lines. We believe that our
systematic approach to technology change management provides continuous improvements and ensures uniform adoption across
our production lines. In addition, our production lines are replicas or near replicas of each other and, as a result, a process or
production improvement on one line can be rapidly and reliably deployed to other production lines.
We regularly produce research cells in our laboratories, some of which are tested for performance and certified by independent labs,
such as the National Renewable Energy Laboratory. Cell efficiency measures the proportion of light converted to electricity in a
single solar cell at standard test conditions. Our research cells are produced using laboratory equipment and methods and are not
intended to be representative of our manufacturing capability. Our module conversion efficiency has improved on average more
than half a percent every year for the last ten years. We currently hold two world records for CdTe PV cell efficiency, achieving an
independently certified research cell efficiency of 22.1% and an aperture area module efficiency of 19.0%. We believe that our
record cells demonstrate a potential long-term module efficiency entitlement of over 25% that is achievable using our commercial-
scale manufacturing equipment.
Customers
During 2020, we sold the majority of our solar modules (not included in our systems projects) to integrators and operators of
systems in the United States and France, and such third-party module sales represented approximately 64% of our total net sales.
During 2020, Longroad Energy, NextEra Energy, and Softbank each accounted for more than 10% of our modules business net
sales.
We continue to focus on key geographic markets, particularly in areas with abundant solar resources and sizable electricity demand,
and additional customer relationships to diversify our customer base. We also collaborate with providers of community solar
solutions, which address the residential and small business sectors to provide a broad range of customers with access to
competitively priced solar energy regardless of the suitability of their rooftops. Community solar utilizes relatively small ground-
mounted installations that provide clean energy to utilities, which then offer consumers the ability to buy into a specific community
installation and benefit from the solar power generated by that resource. The demand for such offerings continues to build as states
across the country are enacting community solar policies, and utilities are looking to diversify their energy generation portfolio in
order to meet customer demand for affordable, clean energy. We also collaborate with providers of Community Choice Aggregation
programs, which allow cities and counties to purchase power on behalf of residents and businesses to provide clean energy options
at competitive prices. Our expertise in module technology and utility-scale generation,
10
Table of Contents
paired with community solar and/or Community Choice Aggregation, allows residential power consumers to “go solar,” including
those who live in apartment buildings or whose home rooftops cannot accommodate solar panels.
The wholesale commercial and industrial market also represents a promising opportunity for the widespread adoption of PV solar
technology as corporations undertake certain sustainability commitments. The demand for corporate renewables continues to
accelerate, with corporations worldwide committing to the RE100 campaign, a collaborative, global initiative of influential
businesses committed to 100% renewable electricity. We believe we also have a competitive advantage in the commercial and
industrial market due to many customers’ sensitivity to the sustainability, experience, bankability, and financial viability of their
suppliers and geographically diverse operating locations. With our sustainability advantage, strong development expertise, financial
strength, and global footprint, we are well positioned to meet these needs.
Competition
The solar energy and renewable energy sectors are highly competitive and continually evolving as participants in these sectors
strive to distinguish themselves within their markets and compete within the larger electric power industry. We face intense
competition for sales of solar modules, which has resulted in and may continue to result in reduced average selling prices and loss
of market share. With respect to our modules business, our primary sources of competition are crystalline silicon solar module
manufacturers. In addition, we expect to compete with future entrants into the PV solar industry and existing market participants
that offer new or differentiated technological solutions. For example, many crystalline silicon cell and wafer manufacturers have
transitioned from lower efficiency Back Surface Field (“BSF”) multi-crystalline cells (the legacy technology against which we have
generally competed) to higher efficiency Passivated Emitter Rear Contact (“PERC”) mono-crystalline cells at competitive cost
structures. Additionally, while conventional solar modules, including the solar modules we produce, are monofacial, meaning their
ability to produce energy is a function of direct and diffuse irradiance on their front side, certain manufacturers of mono-crystalline
PERC modules offer bifacial modules that also capture diffuse irradiance on the back side of a module. Within the larger electric
power industry, we compete with companies that currently offer or are developing other renewable energy technologies (including
wind, hydroelectric, geothermal, biomass, and tidal technologies), as well as traditional energy generation sources.
Certain of our existing or future competitors may have direct or indirect access to sovereign capital, which could enable such
competitors to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of time. Among PV solar module
manufacturers, the principal methods of competition include sales price per watt, wattage (through a larger form factor or an
improved conversion efficiency), energy yield, reliability, warranty terms, and customer payment terms. Our results of operations
could be adversely affected if competitors reduce module pricing to levels below their costs, bid aggressively low prices for module
sale agreements, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of time. We believe the solar
industry may from time to time experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand (i.e., where production
capacity exceeds global demand), and that such periods will also put pressure on pricing, which could adversely affect our results
of operations. For additional information, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar
value chain is intense, and could remain that way for an extended period of time. An increased global supply of PV modules has
caused and may continue to cause structural imbalances in which global PV module supply exceeds demand, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.”
Raw Materials
Our CdTe module manufacturing process uses approximately 30 types of raw materials and components to construct a solar
module. One critical raw material in our production process is CdTe. Other raw materials and components that are critical to our
manufacturing process include front glass coated with transparent conductive oxide, other semiconductor materials, organics such
as photo resist, tempered back glass, frames, packaging components such as interlayer, cord plate/cord plate cap, lead wire, and
solar connectors. Before we use these materials and components
11
Table of Contents
in our manufacturing process, a supplier must undergo rigorous qualification procedures, and we continually evaluate new suppliers
as part of our cost reduction roadmaps. When possible, we attempt to use suppliers that can provide a raw material supply source
that is near our manufacturing locations, reducing the cost and lead times for such materials. Several of our key raw materials and
components are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers.
Solar Module Collection and Recycling
We are committed to extended producer responsibility and take into account the environmental impact of our products over their
entire life cycle. As part of such efforts, we previously established the solar industry’s first global comprehensive module collection
and recycling program. Our module recycling process is designed to maximize the recovery of materials, including the glass and
encapsulated semiconductor material, for use in new modules or other products and enhances the sustainability profile of our
modules. Approximately 90% of each collected First Solar module can be recycled into materials for reuse. For certain legacy
customer sales contracts that were covered under this program, which has since been discontinued, we agreed to pay the costs for
the collection and recycling of qualifying solar modules, and the end users agreed to notify us, disassemble their solar power
systems, package the solar modules for shipment, and revert ownership rights over the modules back to us at the end of the
modules’ service lives. We currently have recycling facilities operating at each of our manufacturing facilities in the United States,
Malaysia, and Vietnam and at our former manufacturing facility location in Germany.
The EU’s Waste Electrical and Electronic Equipment (“WEEE”) Directive places the obligation of recycling (including collection,
treatment, and environmentally sound disposal) of electrical and electronic equipment products upon producers and is applicable to
all PV solar modules in EU member states. For modules covered under our program that were previously sold into and installed in
the EU, we continue to maintain a commitment to cover the estimated collection and recycling costs consistent with our historical
program. Additionally, as a result of the transposition of the WEEE Directive by the EU member states, we have adjusted our
recycling offerings, as required, in various EU member states to ensure compliance with specific EU member state WEEE
regulations.
Solar Module Warranties
We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal use and service
conditions for up to 12 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon specifications will
produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage reducing by a
degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years. Among other
things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. For additional information on our
solar module warranty programs, refer to Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to
incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages and/or warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and
prevent us from maintaining or increasing our market share.”
Systems Business
Project Development
Project development activities generally include (i) selecting, securing, and maintaining the project site; (ii) obtaining the requisite
interconnection and transmission studies; (iii) executing an interconnection agreement; (iv) obtaining environmental and land-use
permits; and (v) entering into a power purchase agreement (“PPA”) with an off-taker for the power to be generated by the project.
The sequence of such development activities varies by international location and, in certain locations, may begin by initially
bidding for PPA or off-take agreements. These activities culminate in receiving the right to construct and operate a PV solar power
system.
12
Table of Contents
Depending on the market opportunity or geographic location, we may acquire projects in various stages of development or acquire
project companies from developers in order to complete the development process, construct a system incorporating our modules,
and sell the system to a long-term owner. We may also collaborate with local partners in connection with these project development
activities. Depending on the type of project or geographic location, PPAs or feed-in-tariff (“FiT”) structures define the price and
terms the utility or customer will pay for power produced from the project. Depending primarily on the location, stage of
development upon our acquisition of the project, and/or other site attributes, the development cycle typically ranges from one to
two years but may be as long as five years. We may be required to incur significant costs for preliminary engineering, permitting,
legal, and other expenses before we can determine whether a project is feasible, economically attractive, or capable of being built.
If there is a delay in obtaining any required regulatory approvals, we may be forced to incur additional costs or impair our project
assets, and the termination rights of the off-taker under the PPA may be triggered.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our U.S. project development
business, we have determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to pursue the sale of this business. On January 24, 2021,
we entered into an agreement with OMERS for the sale of our U.S. project development operations, which comprises the business
of developing, contracting for the construction of, and selling utility-scale PV solar power systems. The transaction includes our
approximately 10 GW utility-scale solar project pipeline, including the advanced-stage Horizon, Madison, Ridgely, Rabbitbrush,
and Oak Trail projects that are expected to commence construction in the next two years; the 30 MW Barilla Solar project, which
is operational; and certain other equipment. In addition, OMERS has agreed to certain module purchase commitments. The
completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approval from
FERC, the expiration of the mandatory waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the transaction by CFIUS, and other
customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half
of 2021.
EPC Services
EPC services generally include (i) engineering design and related services, (ii) BoS procurement, and (iii) construction contracting
and management. In 2019, we transitioned from an internal EPC service model in the United States to an external model, in which
we leverage the capabilities of third-party EPC services in providing power plant solutions to our systems segment customers. The
shift to an external EPC service model in the United States aligns with our typical model in international markets and is facilitated,
in part, by our Series 6 module technology and its improved BoS compatibility. For systems we constructed, we typically provided
limited warranties for defects in engineering design, installation, and BoS part workmanship for a period of one to two years
following the substantial completion of a system or a block within the system. For certain systems we constructed, we have also
provided an energy performance test during the first or second year of a system’s operation to demonstrate that the actual energy
generation for the applicable year meets or exceeds the modeled energy expectation, after certain adjustments, such as irradiance,
weather, module degradation, soiling, curtailment, and other conditions that may affect a system’s energy output but are unrelated
to quality, design, or construction.
O&M Services
Our typical O&M service arrangements involve the performance of standard activities associated with operating and maintaining a
PV solar power system. We perform such activities pursuant to the scope of services outlined in the underlying contract. These
activities are considered necessary to optimize system performance and comply with PPAs, other agreements, and regulations.
Although the scope of our services varies by contract and jurisdiction, our O&M service arrangements generally include 24/7
system monitoring, compliance with various project agreements and/or regulatory agencies, energy forecasting, performance
engineering analysis, regular performance reporting, turn-key maintenance services including spare parts and corrective
maintenance repair, warranty management, and environmental services. As part of our O&M services, we also typically provide an
effective availability guarantee, which stipulates that a system will be available to generate a certain percentage of total possible
energy during aAC
AC
13
Table of Contents
specific period after adjusting for factors outside our control as the service provider, such as weather, curtailment, outages, force
majeure, and other conditions that may affect system availability.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services business,
we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to
pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with Clairvest for the sale of our North American
O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of
certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect
the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Customers
Our systems customers consist of utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial companies, and other system
owners, such as investors who are looking for long-term investment vehicles that are expected to generate consistent returns. Such
customers may purchase completed systems, which include our PV solar modules, or any combination of development, EPC,
and/or O&M services. We also seek to provide innovative power plant solutions to facilitate the adoption and optimize the use of
our technology. During 2020, the substantial majority of our systems business sales were in the United States and Japan, and the
principal customers of our systems business were Goldman Sachs Renewable Power, SMFL Mirai Partners, and Mitsui & Co., who
each accounted for more than 10% of our systems business net sales.
Competition
With respect to our systems business, we face competition from other providers of renewable energy solutions, including
developers of PV solar power systems and developers of other forms of renewable energy projects, such as wind, hydroelectric,
geothermal, biomass, and tidal projects. We may also compete with other developers that integrate energy storage solutions with
PV solar or wind projects, thereby enabling system owners to better align the delivery of energy with periods of peak demand. To
the extent other solar module manufacturers become more vertically integrated, we expect to face increased competition from such
companies as well. Certain current or potential future competitors may have a low cost of capital and/or access to sovereign capital.
The decline in module prices over the last several years has increased interest in solar energy worldwide, and there are limited
barriers to entry in certain parts of the PV solar value chain, depending on the geographic market. Accordingly, competition at the
system level can be intense, thereby exerting downward pressure on system-level selling prices industry-wide. See Item 1A. “Risk
Factors – Competition at the system level can be intense, thereby potentially exerting downward pressure on system-level profit
margins industry-wide, which could reduce our profitability and adversely affect our results of operations.”
Own and Operate
From time to time, we may temporarily own and operate, or retain interests in, certain of our systems for a period of time based on
strategic opportunities or market factors. The ability to do so provides certain potential benefits, including greater control over the
sales process and offering a lower risk profile to project buyers. As of December 31, 2020, we owned and operated a number of
systems in various geographic markets, including Chile, India, the United States, and the Asia-Pacific region. For more information
about the economics of such ownership and the impacts on our liquidity see Item 7. “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations – Liquidity and Capital Resources.”
14
Table of Contents
Intellectual Property
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to maintain and protect our proprietary technology and to conduct our business without
infringing on the proprietary rights of others. We rely primarily on a combination of patents, trademarks, and trade secrets, as well
as associate and third-party confidentiality agreements, to safeguard our intellectual property. We regularly file patent applications
to protect inventions arising from our R&D activities and are currently pursuing patent applications in the United States and other
countries. Our patent applications and any future patent applications may not result in a patent being issued with the scope of the
claims we seek, or at all, and any patents we may receive may be challenged, invalidated, or declared unenforceable. In addition,
we have registered and/or have applied to register trademarks and service marks in the United States and a number of foreign
countries for “First Solar.”
With respect to proprietary know-how that is not patentable and processes for which patents are difficult to enforce, we rely on,
among other things, trade secret protection and confidentiality agreements to safeguard our interests. We believe that many
elements of our PV solar module manufacturing processes, including our unique materials sourcing, involve proprietary know-how,
technology, or data that are not covered by patents or patent applications, including technical processes, equipment designs,
algorithms, and procedures. We have taken security measures to protect these elements. Our R&D personnel have entered into
confidentiality and proprietary information agreements with us. These agreements address intellectual property protection issues
and require our associates to assign to us all of the inventions, designs, and technologies they develop during the course of their
employment with us. We also require our customers and business partners to enter into confidentiality agreements before we
disclose sensitive aspects of our modules, technology, or business plans. We have not been subject to any material intellectual
property infringement or misappropriation claims.
Regulatory, Environmental, Health, and Safety Matters
We are subject to various federal, state, local, and international laws and regulations relating to modules, systems, and services, and
are often subject to oversight and regulation in accordance with national and local ordinances relating to building codes, safety,
environmental protection, land acquisition, utility interconnection and metering, and other matters. Our systems business is also
subject to regulatory oversight and liability if we fail to operate our PV solar power systems in compliance with electric reliability
rules. The impact of these laws and requirements may increase our overall costs and may delay, prevent, or increase the cost of
manufacturing PV modules or the construction and operation of the systems we intend to build. As we operate in the U.S. and
internationally, we are also subject to the application of U.S. trade laws and trade laws of other countries. Such tariffs and policies,
or any other U.S. or global trade remedies or other trade barriers that apply to us given our global operations, may directly or
indirectly affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. See Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Existing regulations and
policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical, regulatory, and economic barriers to the purchase
and use of PV solar products or systems, which may significantly reduce demand for our modules, systems, or services.”
We are also subject to the application of various anti-bribery laws, some of which prohibit improper payments to government and
non-government persons and entities, and others (e.g., the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (the “FCPA”) and the U.K. Bribery
Act) that extend their application to activities outside their country of origin. We compete against companies for contracts in China,
India, South America, and the Middle East, which require substantial government contact and where norms can differ from U.S.
standards, and not all competitors are subject to compliance with the same anti-bribery laws. See Item 1A. Risk Factors – “We
could be adversely affected by any violations of the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other foreign anti-bribery laws.”
We are also subject to various federal, state, local, and international laws and regulations relating to the protection of the
environment, including those governing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water; the use, management, and disposal of
hazardous materials and wastes; occupational health and safety; and the cleanup of contaminated sites. Our operations include the
use, handling, storage, transportation, generation, and disposal of hazardous
15
Table of Contents
materials and wastes. Therefore, we could incur substantial costs, including cleanup costs, fines, and civil or criminal sanctions and
costs arising from third-party property damage or personal injury claims as a result of violations of, or liabilities under,
environmental and occupational health and safety laws and regulations or non-compliance with environmental permits required for
our operations. We believe we are currently in substantial compliance with applicable environmental and occupational health and
safety requirements and do not expect to incur material expenditures for environmental and occupational health and safety controls
in the foreseeable future. However, future developments such as the implementation of new, more stringent laws and regulations,
more aggressive enforcement policies, or the discovery of unknown environmental conditions may require expenditures that could
have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, or results of operations. See Item 1A. “Risk Factors –
Environmental obligations and liabilities could have a substantial negative impact on our business, financial condition, and results
of operations.”
Corporate History
We were incorporated in Delaware in February 2006 and completed our initial public offering of common stock in November 2006.
Human Capital
As of December 31, 2020, we had approximately 5,100 associates (our term for full and part-time employees), including
approximately 4,000 in our modules business and approximately 400 associates that work directly in our systems business. The
majority of these associates work in the United States, Malaysia, and Vietnam. The remainder of our associates are in R&D, sales
and marketing, and general and administrative positions. As of December 31, 2020, we had approximately 300 associates that
support our North American O&M operations and U.S. project development, collectively. These associates will depart the
Company in conjunction with the timing of sale agreements described above in “Business Strategy.”
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we implemented safety protocols and new procedures to protect our associates and our
customers. In line with guidance from the World Health Organization, local health authorities and other governmental authorities,
we have implemented numerous preventative hygiene and safety measures at our global manufacturing, administrative, and other
sites and facilities. The vast majority of our associates who are capable of performing their function remotely are telecommuting
(i.e., working from home).
None of our associates are currently represented by labor unions or covered by a collective bargaining agreement. As we continue
to expand domestically and internationally, we may encounter either regional laws that mandate union representation or associates
who desire union representation or a collective bargaining agreement. We recognize that in the locations where we operate,
employees have the right to freely associate or not associate with third-party labor organizations, along with the right to bargain or
not to bargain collectively in accordance with local laws.
16
Table of Contents
Available Information
We maintain a website at www.firstsolar.com. We make available free of charge on our website our annual reports on Form 10-K,
quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K, proxy statements, and any amendments to those reports filed or
furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such
materials with, or furnish them to, the SEC. The information contained in or connected to our website is not incorporated by
reference into this report. We use our website as one means of disclosing material non-public information and for complying with
our disclosure obligations under the SEC’s Regulation FD. Such disclosures are typically included within the Investor Relations
section of our website at investor.firstsolar.com. Accordingly, investors should monitor such portions of our website in addition to
following our press releases, SEC filings, and public conference calls and webcasts. The SEC also maintains a website at
www.sec.gov that contains reports and other information regarding issuers, such as First Solar, that file electronically with the SEC.
Information about Our Executive Officers
Our executive officers and their ages and positions as of February 25, 2021 were as follows:
Name Age Position
Mark R. W idmar 55 Chief Executive Of ficer
Alexander R. Bradley 39 Chief Financial Of ficer
Geor ges Antoun 58 Chief Commercial Of ficer
Philip T ymen deJong 61 Chief Operations Of ficer
Michael Koralewski 49 Chief Manufacturing Operations Of ficer
Kuntal Kumar V erma 48 Chief Manufacturing Engineering Of ficer
Patrick Buehler 43 Chief Quality and Reliability Of ficer
Markus Gloeckler 47 Chief T echnology Of ficer
Jason Dymbort 43 General Counsel and Secretary
Caroline Stockdale 57 Chief People and Communications Of ficer
Mark R. Widmar was appointed Chief Executive Officer in July 2016. He joined First Solar in April 2011 as Chief Financial
Officer and also served as First Solar’s Chief Accounting Officer from February 2012 through June 2015. From March 2015 to
June 2016, Mr. Widmar served as the Chief Financial Officer and through June 2018, served as a director on the board of the
general partner of 8point3 Energy Partners LP (“8point3”), the joint yieldco formed by First Solar and SunPower Corporation in
2015 to own and operate a portfolio of selected solar generation assets. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Widmar served as Chief
Financial Officer of GrafTech International Ltd., a leading global manufacturer of advanced carbon and graphite materials, from
May 2006 through March 2011. Prior to joining GrafTech, Mr. Widmar served as Corporate Controller of NCR Inc. from 2005 to
2006, and was a Business Unit Chief Financial Officer for NCR from November 2002 to his appointment as Controller. He also
served as a Division Controller at Dell, Inc. from August 2000 to November 2002. Mr. Widmar also held various financial and
managerial positions with Lucent Technologies Inc., Allied Signal, Inc., and Bristol Myers/Squibb, Inc. He began his career in
1987 as an accountant with Ernst & Young. Mr. Widmar holds a Bachelor of Science in business accounting and a Masters of
Business Administration from Indiana University.
Alexander R. Bradley was appointed Chief Financial Officer in October 2016. He joined First Solar in May 2008, and previously
served as Vice President of both Treasury and Project Finance, leading or supporting the structuring, sale, and financing of over $10
billion and approximately 2.7 GW of the Company’s worldwide development assets, including several of the largest PV power
plant projects in North America. From June 2016 to June 2018, Mr. Bradley also served as an officer and board member of the
general partner of 8point3. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Bradley worked at HSBC in investment banking and leveraged finance,
in London and New York, covering the energy and utilities sector. He received his Master of Arts from the University of
Edinburgh, Scotland.DC
17
Table of Contents
Georges Antoun was appointed Chief Commercial Officer in July 2016. He joined First Solar in July 2012 as Chief Operating
Officer before being appointed as President, U.S. in July 2015. Mr. Antoun has over 30 years of operational and technical
experience, including leadership positions at several global technology companies. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Antoun served
as Venture Partner at Technology Crossover Ventures (“TCV”), a private equity and venture firm that he joined in July 2011. Before
joining TCV, Mr. Antoun was the Head of Product Area IP & Broadband Networks for Ericsson, based in San Jose, California. Mr.
Antoun joined Ericsson in 2007, when Ericsson acquired Redback Networks, a telecommunications equipment company, where
Mr. Antoun served as the Senior Vice President of World Wide Sales & Operations. After the acquisition, Mr. Antoun was
promoted to Chief Executive Officer of the Redback Networks subsidiary. Prior to Redback Networks, Mr. Antoun spent five years
at Cisco Systems, where he served as Vice President of Worldwide Systems Engineering and Field Marketing, Vice President of
Worldwide Optical Operations, and Vice President of Carrier Sales. Prior to Cisco Systems, he was the Director of Systems
Engineering at Newbridge Networks, a data and voice networking company. Mr. Antoun started his career at Nynex (now Verizon
Communications), where he was part of its Science and Technology Division. Mr. Antoun also served as a member of the board of
directors of Ruckus Wireless, Inc. and Violin Memory, Inc., both publicly-traded companies. He earned a Bachelor of Science
degree in engineering from the University of Louisiana at Lafayette and a Master’s degree in information systems engineering from
NYU Poly.
Philip Tymen deJong was appointed Chief Operating Officer in July 2015. Mr. deJong plans to retire as Chief Operating Officer,
effective April 2021, and currently has responsibility for overseeing priority projects for the Company. Mr. deJong is transitioning
responsibility for manufacturing, EPC services, O&M services, quality and reliability, supply chain, and information technology to
Michael Koralewski, Chief Manufacturing Operations Officer; Kuntal Kumar Verma, Chief Manufacturing Engineering Officer;
and Patrick Buehler, Chief Quality and Reliability Officer. Mr. deJong joined First Solar in January 2010 as Vice President, Plant
Management and served in several Senior Vice President roles in manufacturing and operations prior to being appointed Senior
Vice President, Manufacturing & EPC in January 2015. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. deJong was Vice President of
Assembly/Test Manufacturing for Numonyx Corporation. Prior to that, he worked for 25 years at Intel Corporation, holding various
positions in engineering, manufacturing, wafer fabrication management, and assembly/test manufacturing. Mr. deJong holds a
Bachelor of Science degree in industrial engineering/mechanical engineering from Oregon State University and has completed
advanced study at the University of New Mexico Anderson School of Management.
Michael Koralewski was appointed Chief Manufacturing Operations Officer in July 2020. Mr. Koralewski provides nearly 25 years
of global operational experience to the executive leadership team. Mr. Koralewski joined First Solar in 2006, serving in several
senior roles in operations and quality management, including Senior Vice President, Global Manufacturing since 2015; Vice
President, Global Site Operations and Plant Manager since 2011; and Vice President, Global Quality since 2009. In all of these
roles Mr. Koralewski has been significantly involved since the beginning of First Solar’s manufacturing scaling and expansion from
site selection through sustaining operations. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Koralewski worked at Dana Incorporated where he
held several positions with global responsibility in operations and quality management. He earned a Bachelor of Science in
chemical engineering from Case Western Reserve University and a Master of Business Administration from Bowling Green State
University.
Kuntal Kumar Verma was appointed Chief Manufacturing Engineering Officer in July 2020. Mr. Verma joined First Solar in 2002,
serving in progressively more senior roles in engineering and manufacturing, including Vice President, Global Manufacturing
Engineering since 2012. He is responsible for the global manufacturing performance and improvement roadmap, including global
technology transfer, new plant start-ups and strategic initiatives. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Verma held several engineering
and operations positions at Reliance Industries Limited, India. He is a Master Black Belt in Six Sigma/Lean Manufacturing with an
expert certification in Taguchi Methods (Robust Engineering) and a Certification in Production and Inventory Management from
American Production and Inventory Control Society. He earned a Bachelor of Science in mechanical engineering from the National
Institute of Technology in India, a Master of Science in industrial engineering from the University of Toledo, and a Master of
Business Administration from Bowling Green State University.
18
Table of Contents
Patrick Buehler was appointed Chief Quality and Reliability Officer in July 2020. Mr. Buehler joined First Solar in 2006, serving in
progressively more senior technical and operations roles in quality and reliability, including Vice President, Quality and Reliability
since 2019. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Buehler held several roles in manufacturing, engineering, maintenance, and product
development at DuPont de Nemours, Inc. and Cummins, Inc. He earned a Bachelor of Science in mechanical engineering from the
University of Cincinnati and a Master of Science in mechanical engineering from Purdue University.
Markus Gloeckler was appointed Chief Technology Officer in November 2020 after being appointed Co-Chief Technology Officer
in July 2020. He is focused on driving First Solar’s Series 6 thin film PV module platform. Mr. Gloeckler has extensive experience
guiding strategic research and development activities and has served First Solar as Vice President and Chief Scientist, before being
promoted to Senior Vice President, Module Research and Development. He was instrumental in enabling First Solar’s achievement
of various world records relating to conversion efficiency for CdTe solar cells. In his role as Vice President of Research, he led the
thin film technology transfer from General Electric to First Solar following the intellectual property acquisition in 2013. He joined
First Solar in 2005 in an engineering function supporting First Solar’s technology development after the initial launch of the Series
2 module. Mr. Gloeckler holds an undergraduate degree in microsystems engineering from the Regensburg University of Applied
Sciences in Germany, and a Doctor of Philosophy in physics from Colorado State University.
Jason Dymbort joined First Solar in March 2008, serving in a broad range of legal roles before being appointed General Counsel
and Secretary in July 2020. Between 2015 and 2018, Mr. Dymbort served as General Counsel and Secretary for the general partner
of 8point3 Energy Partners, then a publicly-traded yieldco and affiliate of First Solar. Before joining First Solar, Mr. Dymbort was a
corporate attorney at Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP. He holds a Juris Doctor degree from the University of Pennsylvania Law
School, where he was a member of the Penn Law Review, and a bachelor’s degree from Brandeis University.
Caroline Stockdale joined First Solar in October 2019 as Executive Vice President, Human Resources and Communications and
was appointed Chief People and Communications Officer in October 2020. Prior to joining First Solar, she served as the Chief
Executive Officer for First Perform, a provider of human resources services for a variety of customers, from Fortune 100
companies to cyber start-ups. Previously, she served as Chief Human Resources Officer for Medtronic from 2010 to 2013 and
Warner Music Group from 2005 to 2009. Before joining Warner Music Group, she served as the senior human resources leader in
global divisions of American Express from 2002 to 2005 and General Electric from 1997 to 2002. Ms. Stockdale is a member of
the Forbes Human Resources Council. Ms. Stockdale holds a Bachelor of Arts in political theories and institutions, and philosophy,
from the University of Sheffield, England.
19
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors
An investment in our stock involves a high degree of risk. You should carefully consider the following information, together with
the other information in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, before buying shares of our stock. If any of the following risks or
uncertainties occur, our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected and the
trading price of our stock could decline.
Summary of Risk Factors
The following is a summary of the principal risks and uncertainties that could materially adversely affect our business, financial
condition, and results of operations and make an investment in our stock speculative or risky. You should read this summary
together with the more detailed description of each risk factor contained below.
Risks Related to Our Markets and Customers
•Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense, and could remain that way for an
extended period of time. An increased global supply of PV modules has caused and may continue to cause structural
imbalances in which global PV module supply exceeds demand. If our competitors reduce module pricing to levels near or
below their manufacturing costs, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of
time, or if demand for PV modules does not grow sufficiently to justify the current production supply, our business,
financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
•PV solar and related technologies may not be suitable for continued adoption at economically attractive rates of return.
Sufficient additional demand for solar modules, related technologies, and systems may not develop or may take longer to
develop than we anticipate, causing our net sales and profit to flatten or decline and threatening our ability to sustain
profitability.
•The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy
targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other public policies could negatively impact
demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and systems. The imposition of tariffs on our products could materially
increase our costs to perform under our contracts with customers, which could adversely affect our results of operations.
•An increase in interest rates or tightening of the supply of capital in the global financial markets (including a reduction in
total tax equity availability) could make it difficult for customers to finance the cost of a PV solar power system and could
reduce the demand for our modules or systems and/or lead to a reduction in the average selling price for such offerings.
Risks Related to Our Operations, Manufacturing, and Technology
•We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules; if global supply exceeds global
demand, it could lead to a further reduction in the average selling price for PV solar modules, which could reduce our net
sales and adversely affect our results of operations.
•Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages
and/or warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and prevent us from maintaining or increasing our
market share.
•Our failure to further refine our technology, reduce module manufacturing and BoS costs, and develop and introduce
improved PV products could render our solar modules or systems uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability,
and/or market share.
20
Table of Contents
•Several of our key raw materials components, particularly CdTe, and manufacturing equipment are either single-sourced
or sourced from a limited number of suppliers, and their failure to perform could cause manufacturing delays and impair
our ability to deliver solar modules to customers in the required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.
Risks Related to Our Systems Business
•Project development or construction activities may not be successful; projects under development may not receive
required permits, real property rights, PPAs, interconnection, and transmission arrangements; or financing or construction
may not commence or proceed as scheduled, which could increase our costs and impair our ability to recover our
investments.
•We may be unable to acquire or lease land, obtain necessary interconnection and transmission rights, and/or obtain the
approvals, licenses, permits, and electric transmission grid interconnection and transmission rights necessary to build and
operate PV solar power systems in a timely and cost effective manner, and regulatory agencies, local communities, labor
unions, tribes, or other third parties may delay, prevent, or increase the cost of construction and operation of the system we
intend to build.
•We may not be able to obtain long-term contracts for the sale of power produced by our projects at prices and on other
terms favorable to attract financing and other investments, adversely affecting our results of operations.
•Lack of transmission capacity availability, potential upgrade costs to the transmission grid, and other system constraints
could significantly impact our ability to build PV solar power systems and generate solar electricity power sales.
Risks Related to Regulations
•Existing regulations and policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical, regulatory, and
economic barriers to the purchase and use of PV solar products or systems, which may significantly reduce demand for
our modules, systems, or services.
Risks Related to the COVID-19 Pandemic
•The extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic could impact us is highly uncertain and will depend largely on the severity
and duration of the pandemic, measures taken to contain the spread of the virus, and policies implemented by
governmental authorities to ease restrictions in a phased manner.
General Risk Factors
•If our long-lived assets or project related assets become impaired, we may be required to record significant charges to
earnings.
•Our credit agreements contain covenant restrictions that may limit our ability to operate our business.
21
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Our Markets and Customers
Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense, and could remain that way for an extended
period of time. An increased global supply of PV modules has caused and may continue to cause structural imbalances in which
global PV module supply exceeds demand, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and
results of operations.
In the aggregate, we believe manufacturers of solar cells and modules have significant installed production capacity, relative to
global demand, and the ability for additional capacity expansion. For example, we estimate that in 2020 approximately 50 GW of
capacity was added by solar module manufacturers, primarily but not exclusively in Asia. We believe the solar industry may from
time to time experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand (i.e., where production capacity exceeds global
demand), and that such periods will continue to put pressure on pricing. During the past several years, industry average selling
prices per watt have declined in many markets, at times significantly, both at the module and system levels, as competitors have
reduced prices to sell inventories worldwide. There may be additional pressure on global demand and average selling prices in the
future resulting from fluctuating demand in certain major solar markets, such as China. If our competitors reduce module pricing to
levels near or below their manufacturing costs, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods
of time, or if demand for PV modules does not grow sufficiently to justify the current production supply, our business, financial
condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
If PV solar and related technologies are not suitable for continued adoption at economically attractive rates of return or if
sufficient additional demand for solar modules, related technologies, and systems does not develop or takes longer to develop
than we anticipate, our net sales and profit may flatten or decline and we may be unable to sustain profitability.
In comparison to traditional forms of energy generation, the solar energy market continues to be at a relatively early stage of
development. If utility-scale PV solar technology proves unsuitable for continued adoption at economically attractive rates of return
or if additional demand for solar modules and systems fails to develop sufficiently or takes longer to develop than we anticipate, we
may be unable to grow our business or generate sufficient net sales to sustain profitability. In addition, demand for solar modules,
related technologies, and systems in our targeted markets may develop to a lesser extent than we anticipate. Many factors may
affect the viability of continued adoption of utility-scale PV solar technology in our targeted markets, as well as the demand for
solar modules and systems generally, including the following:
•cost-effectiveness of the electricity generated by PV solar power systems compared to conventional energy sources, such
as natural gas (which fuel source may be subject to significant price fluctuations from time to time), and other renewable
energy sources, such as wind, geothermal, and hydroelectric;
•changes in tax, trade remedies, and other public policy, as well as changes in economic, market, and other conditions that
affect the price of, and demand for, conventional energy resources, non-solar renewable energy resources (e.g., wind and
hydroelectric), and energy efficiency programs and products, including increases or decreases in the prices of natural gas,
coal, oil, and other fossil fuels and in the prices of competing renewable resources;
•the extent of competition, barriers to entry, and overall conditions and timing related to the development of solar in new
and emerging market segments such as commercial and industrial customers, community solar, community choice
aggregators, and other customer segments;
•availability, substance, and magnitude of support programs including federal, state, and local government subsidies,
incentives, targets, and renewable portfolio standards, among other policies and programs, to accelerate the development
of the solar industry;DC
22
Table of Contents
•performance, reliability, and availability of energy generated by PV solar power systems compared to conventional and
other non-solar renewable energy sources and products, particularly conventional energy generation capable of providing
24-hour, non-intermittent baseload power;
•the development, functionality, scale, cost, and timing of energy storage solutions; and
•changes in the amount and priorities of capital expenditures by end users of solar modules and systems (e.g., utilities),
which capital expenditures tend to decrease when the economy slows or when interest rates increase, thereby resulting in
redirection away from solar generation to development of competing forms of electric generation and to distribution (e.g.,
smart grid), transmission, and energy efficiency measures.
The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy
targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other public policies, such as tariffs or other trade
remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and
systems and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our
operating results.
Although we believe that solar energy will experience widespread adoption in those applications where it competes economically
with traditional forms of energy without any support programs, in certain markets our net sales and profits remain subject to
variability based on the availability and size of government subsidies and economic incentives. Federal, state, and local
governmental bodies in many countries have provided subsidies in the form of FiTs, rebates, tax incentives, and other incentives to
end users, distributors, system integrators, and manufacturers of PV solar products. Many of these support programs expire, phase
out over time, require renewal by the applicable authority, or may be amended. A summary of certain recent developments in the
major government support programs that may impact our business appears under Item 1. “Business – Support Programs.” To the
extent these support programs are reduced earlier than previously expected or are changed retroactively, such changes could
negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and systems, lead to a reduction in our net sales, and adversely
impact our operating results. Another consideration in the U.S. market, and to a lesser extent in other global markets, is the effect of
governmental land-use planning policies and environmental policies on utility-scale PV solar development. The adoption of
restrictive land-use designations or environmental regulations that proscribe or restrict the siting of utility-scale solar facilities
could adversely affect the marginal cost of such development.
Changes or threatened changes in U.S. regulatory policy may subject us to significant risks, including the following:
•a reduction or removal of clean energy programs and initiatives and the incentives they provide may diminish the market
for future solar energy off-take agreements, slow the retirement of aging fossil fuel plants, including the retirements of
coal generation plants, and reduce the ability for solar project developers to compete for off-take agreements, which may
reduce PV solar module sales;
•any limitations on the value or availability to potential investors of tax incentives that benefit solar energy projects such as
the ITC and accelerated depreciation deductions could result in reducing such investors’ economic returns, causing a
reduction in the availability of affordable financing, thereby reducing demand for PV solar modules; and
•any effort to overturn federal and state laws, regulations, or policies that are supportive of solar energy generation or that
remove costs or other limitations on other types of electricity generation that compete with solar energy projects could
negatively impact our ability to compete with traditional forms of electricity generation and materially and adversely
affect our business.
Application of U.S. trade laws, or trade laws of other countries, may also impact, either directly or indirectly, our operating results.
In some instances, the application of trade laws is currently beneficial to the Company, and changes in their application could have
an adverse impact.
23
Table of Contents
For example, the United States currently imposes different types of tariffs and/or other trade remedies on certain imported
crystalline silicon photovoltaic modules and cells from various countries. These tariffs include a global safeguard measure imposed
pursuant to Section 201 of the Trade Act of 1974 that provides for tariffs on imported crystalline silicon solar modules and a tariff-
rate quota on imported crystalline silicon solar cells. Between February 2021 and February 2022, the tariff rate is 18% for imported
crystalline silicon photovoltaic modules and imported crystalline silicon solar cells above the tariff rate quota. Thin film solar cell
products, such as our CdTe technology, are specifically excluded from the tariffs. The positive impact of this measure on our
operating results was reduced by a tariff exclusion for imports of bifacial modules that the U.S. Trade Representative granted in
June 2019 and that the U.S. President withdrew in October 2020. Further changes to the measure, including as a result of pending
litigation challenging the withdrawal of the exclusion, could further impact our operating results. In addition, the United States
currently imposes antidumping and countervailing duties on certain imported crystalline silicon photovoltaic cells and modules
from China and Taiwan. Such antidumping and countervailing duties can change over time pursuant to annual reviews conducted
by the U.S. Department of Commerce, and a decline in duty rates could have an adverse impact on our operating results.
In other instances, the application of U.S. trade laws has had, or could have, an adverse impact on our operating results by
increasing our costs or limiting the competitiveness of our products. Examples include tariffs the United States imposes on certain
imported aluminum and steel articles, generally at rates of 10% and 25%, respectively, under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion
Act of 1962; and potential tariffs on imports of goods from Vietnam under Section 301 of the Tariff Act of 1974. If such tariffs are
imposed on solar modules imported from Vietnam, it could negatively affect our business, financial condition, and results of
operations.
Internationally, in July 2018, the Indian government imposed a safeguard measure on solar cells and modules imported from
various countries, including member countries of the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (“OECD”), China,
and Malaysia, for a two-year period, starting at 25% through July 2019 and declining by five percentage points in each subsequent
six-month period. In July 2020, the Indian government announced an extension to the safeguard duty regime at a revised rate of
14.9% through December 2020 and declining to 14.5% through July 2021. These duties are applicable to imports from member
countries of the OECD, China, Vietnam, and Thailand, but imports from Malaysia have been exempted from the revised safeguard
measures.
Such tariffs and policies, or any other U.S. or global trade remedies or other trade barriers, may directly or indirectly affect U.S. or
global markets for solar energy and our business, financial condition, and results of operations. These examples show that
established markets for PV solar development face uncertainties arising from policy, regulatory, and governmental constraints.
While the expected potential of the markets we are targeting is significant, policy promulgation and market development are
especially vulnerable to governmental inertia, political instability, the imposition or lowering of trade remedies and other trade
barriers, geopolitical risk, fossil fuel subsidization, potentially stringent localization requirements, and limited available
infrastructure.
An increase in interest rates or tightening of the supply of capital in the global financial markets (including a reduction in total
tax equity availability) could make it difficult for customers to finance the cost of a PV solar power system and could reduce the
demand for our modules or systems and/or lead to a reduction in the average selling price for such offerings.
Many of our customers and our systems business depend on debt and/or equity financing to fund the initial capital expenditure
required to develop, build, and/or purchase a PV solar power system. As a result, an increase in interest rates, or a reduction in the
supply of project debt financing or tax equity investments, could reduce the number of solar projects that receive financing or
otherwise make it difficult for our customers or our systems business to secure the financing necessary to develop, build, purchase,
or install a PV solar power system on favorable terms, or at all, and thus lower demand for our solar modules, which could limit our
growth or reduce our net sales. See the Risk Factor entitled “The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies,
economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other
public
24
Table of Contents
policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price
levels for our solar modules and systems and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby
adversely impacting our operating results” for additional information. In addition, we believe that a significant percentage of our
customers install systems as an investment, funding the initial capital expenditure through a combination of equity and debt. An
increase in interest rates could lower an investor’s return on investment in a system, increase equity return requirements, or make
alternative investments more attractive relative to PV solar power systems and, in each case, could cause these customers to seek
alternative investments.
We may be unable to fully execute on our long-term strategic plans, which could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition, or results of operations.
We face numerous difficulties in executing on our long-term strategic plans, particularly in new foreign jurisdictions, including the
following:
•difficulty in competing against companies who may have greater financial resources and/or a more effective or established
localized business presence and/or an ability to operate with minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods
of time;
•difficulty in competing successfully with other technologies, such as bifacial modules and n-type mono-crystalline wafers
and cells;
•difficulty in accurately prioritizing geographic markets that we can most effectively and profitably serve with our PV solar
offerings, including miscalculations in overestimating or underestimating addressable market demand;
•adverse public policies in countries we operate in and/or are pursuing, including local content requirements, the imposition
of trade remedies, or capital investment requirements;
•business climates, such as that in China, that may have the effect of putting foreign companies at a disadvantage relative to
domestic companies;
•unstable economic, social, and/or operating environments in foreign jurisdictions, including social unrest, currency,
inflation, and interest rate uncertainties;
•the possibility of applying an ineffective commercial approach to targeted markets, including product offerings that may
not meet market needs;
•difficulty in generating sufficient sales volumes at economically sustainable profitability levels;
•difficulty in timely identifying, attracting, training, and retaining qualified sales, technical, and other personnel in
geographies targeted for expansion;
•difficulty in maintaining proper controls and procedures as we expand our business operations in terms of geographical
reach, including transitioning certain business functions to low-cost geographies, with any material control failure
potentially leading to reputational damage and loss of confidence in our financial reporting;
•difficulty in competing successfully for market share in overall solar markets as a result of the success of companies
participating in the global rooftop PV solar market, which is a segment in which we do not have significant historical
experience;
25
Table of Contents
•difficulty in establishing and implementing a commercial and operational approach adequate to address the specific needs
of the markets we are pursuing;
•difficulty in identifying effective local partners and developing any necessary partnerships with local businesses on
commercially acceptable terms;
•difficulty in balancing market demand and manufacturing production in an efficient and timely manner, potentially
causing our manufacturing capacity to be constrained in some future periods or over-supplied in others; and
•difficulty in obtaining the necessary regulatory approvals to consummate the sale of our U.S. project development
business.
Refer also to the Risk Factors entitled “Our substantial international operations subject us to a number of risks, including
unfavorable political, regulatory, labor, and tax conditions in the United States and/or foreign countries,” and “The reduction,
elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and other
support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other public policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar
cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and systems and limit our growth or
lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating results.”
The loss of any of our large customers, or the inability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their contracts
with us, could significantly reduce our net sales and negatively impact our results of operations.
Our customers include integrators and operators of systems, utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial
companies, and other system owners, who may experience intense competition at the system level, thereby constraining the ability
for such customers to sustain meaningful and consistent profitability. The loss of any of our large customers, their inability to
perform under their contracts, or their default in payment could significantly reduce our net sales and/or adversely impact our
operating results. While our contracts with customers typically have certain firm purchase commitments and may include
provisions for the payment of amounts to us in certain events of contract termination, these contracts may be subject to
amendments made by us or requested by our customers. These amendments may reduce the volume of modules to be sold under the
contract, adjust delivery schedules, or otherwise decrease the expected revenue under these contracts. Although we believe that we
can mitigate this risk, in part, by reallocating modules to other customers if the need arises, we may be unable, in whole or in part,
to do so on similar terms or at all. We may also mitigate this risk by requiring some form of payment security from our customers,
such as parent guarantees, bank guarantees, surety bonds, or commercial letters of credit. However, in the event the providers of
such payment security fail to perform their obligations, our operating results could be adversely impacted.
We may be unable to profitably provide new solar offerings or achieve sufficient market penetration with such offerings.
We may expand our portfolio of offerings to include solutions that build upon our core competencies but for which we have not had
significant historical experience, including variations in our traditional product offerings or other offerings related to commercial
and industrial customers and community solar. We cannot be certain that we will be able to ascertain and allocate the appropriate
financial and human resources necessary to grow these business areas. We could invest capital into growing these businesses but
fail to address market or customer needs or otherwise not experience a satisfactory level of financial return. Also, in expanding into
these areas, we may be competing against companies that previously have not been significant competitors, such as companies that
currently have substantially more experience than we do in the residential, commercial and industrial, or other targeted offerings. If
we are
26
Table of Contents
unable to achieve growth in these areas, our overall growth and financial performance may be limited relative to our competitors
and our operating results could be adversely impacted.
Risks Related to Our Operations, Manufacturing, and Technology
We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules; if global supply exceeds global demand, it
could lead to a further reduction in the average selling price for PV solar modules, which could reduce our net sales and
adversely affect our results of operations.
The solar and renewable energy industries are highly competitive and are continually evolving as participants strive to distinguish
themselves within their markets and compete with the larger electric power industry. Within the global PV solar industry, we face
intense competition from crystalline silicon solar module manufacturers. Existing or future solar module manufacturers might be
acquired by larger companies with significant capital resources, thereby further intensifying competition with us. In addition, the
introduction of a low cost disruptive technology could adversely affect our ability to compete, which could reduce our net sales and
adversely affect our results of operations.
Even if demand for solar modules continues to grow, the rapid manufacturing capacity expansion undertaken by many module
manufacturers in China and certain parts of Southeast Asia, particularly manufacturers of crystalline silicon cells, modules, and
wafers, has created and may continue to cause periods of structural imbalance in which supply exceeds demand. See the Risk
Factor entitled “Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense, and could remain that way for an
extended period of time. An increased global supply of PV modules has caused and may continue to cause structural imbalances in
which global PV module supply exceeds demand, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition,
and results of operations,” for additional information. In addition, we believe any significant decrease in the cost of silicon
feedstock or polysilicon would reduce the manufacturing cost of crystalline silicon modules and lead to further pricing pressure for
solar modules and potentially an oversupply of solar modules. We also believe many crystalline silicon cell and wafer
manufacturers have substantially transitioned from lower efficiency BSF multi-crystalline cells (the legacy technology against
which we have generally competed in our markets) to higher efficiency PERC mono-crystalline cells at competitive cost
structures. As a result, we expect that in the near future, our primary competition will be mono-crystalline PERC based modules
with higher conversion efficiencies. Additionally, while conventional solar modules, including the solar modules we produce, are
monofacial, meaning their ability to produce energy is a function of direct and diffuse irradiance on their front side, certain
manufacturers of mono-crystalline PERC solar modules offer bifacial modules that also capture diffuse irradiance on the back side
of a module. Such technology can improve the overall energy production of a module relative to nameplate front-side efficiency
when applied in certain applications and BoS configurations, which could potentially lower the overall levelized cost of electricity
(“LCOE”), meaning the net present value of a system’s total life cycle costs divided by the quantity of energy that is expected to be
produced over the system’s life, of a system when compared to systems using conventional solar modules, including the modules
we produce. Additionally, we believe that our competitors are evaluating the possibility of transitioning from p-type to n-type
mono-crystalline wafers and cells. If successful, such transition would further increase the efficiency and energy yield of their
product. Finally, many of our competitors are promoting modules with larger overall area based on the use of larger silicon wafers.
While the transition to such larger wafers would increase nameplate wattage, we believe the associated production cost would not
improve significantly.
During any such period, our competitors could decide to reduce their sales prices in response to competition, even below their
manufacturing costs, in order to generate sales, and may do so for a sustained period. Other competitors may have direct or indirect
access to sovereign capital, which could enable such competitors to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained
periods of time. As a result, we may be unable to sell our solar modules or systems at attractive prices, or for a profit, during any
period of excess supply of solar modules, which would reduce our net sales and adversely affect our results of operations.
Additionally, we may decide to lower our average selling
27
Table of Contents
prices to certain customers in certain markets in response to competition, which could also reduce our net sales and adversely affect
our results of operations.
Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages and/or
warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and prevent us from maintaining or increasing our market
share.
We perform a variety of module quality and life tests under different environmental conditions upon which we base our
assessments of future module performance over the duration of the warranty. However, if our thin film solar modules perform
below expectations, we could experience significant warranty and related expenses, damage to our market reputation, and erosion
of our market share. With respect to our modules, we provide a limited warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship
under normal use and service conditions for up to 12 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with
agreed-upon specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty
coverage reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30
years. Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. As an
alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level limited
module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems and
provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty. As a result of these warranty programs, we bear
the risk of product warranty claims long after we have sold our solar modules and recognized net sales.
If any of the assumptions used in estimating our module warranties prove incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional
expenses, which could adversely impact our financial position, operating results, and cash flows. Although we have taken
significant precautions to avoid a manufacturing excursion from occurring, any manufacturing excursions, including any
commitments made by us to take remediation actions in respect of affected modules beyond the stated remedies in our warranties,
could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
Although our module performance warranties extend for up to 30 years, our oldest solar modules manufactured during the
qualification of our pilot production line have only been in use since 2001. Accordingly, our warranties are based on a variety of
quality and life tests that enable predictions of durability and future performance. These predictions, however, could prove to be
materially different from the actual performance during the warranty period, causing us to incur substantial expense to repair or
replace defective solar modules or provide financial remuneration in the future. For example, our solar modules could suffer
various failure modes, including breakage, delamination, corrosion, or performance degradation in excess of expectations, and our
manufacturing operations or supply chain could be subject to materials or process variations that could cause affected modules to
fail or underperform compared to our expectations. These risks could be amplified as we implement design and process changes in
connection with our efforts to improve our products and accelerate module wattage as part of our long-term strategic plans. In
addition, if we increase the number of installations in extreme climates, we may experience increased failure rates due to
deployment into such field conditions. Any widespread product failures may damage our market reputation, cause our net sales to
decline, require us to repair or replace the defective modules or provide financial remuneration, and result in us taking voluntary
remedial measures beyond those required by our standard warranty terms to enhance customer satisfaction, which could have a
material adverse effect on our operating results.
In resolving claims under both the limited defect and power output warranties, we typically have the option of either repairing or
replacing the covered modules or, under the limited power output warranty, providing additional
28
Table of Contents
modules to remedy the power shortfall or making certain cash payments; however, historical versions of our module warranty did
not provide a refund remedy. Consequently, we may be obligated to repair or replace the covered modules under such historical
programs. As our manufacturing process may change from time-to-time in accordance with our technology roadmap, we may elect
to stop production of older versions of our modules that would constitute compatible replacement modules. In some jurisdictions,
our inability to provide compatible replacement modules could potentially expose us to liabilities beyond the limitations of our
module warranties, which could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
For PV solar power systems constructed for customers, we typically provide limited warranties for defects in engineering design,
installation, and BoS part workmanship for a period of one to two years following the substantial completion of a system or a block
within the system. In resolving claims under such BoS warranties, we have the option of remedying the defect through repair or
replacement. As with our modules, these warranties are based on a variety of quality and life tests that enable predictions of
durability and future performance. Any failures in BoS equipment or system construction beyond our expectations may also
adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
In addition, our contracts with customers may include provisions with particular product specifications, minimum wattage
requirements, and specified delivery schedules. These contracts may be terminated, or we may incur significant liquidated damages
or other damages, if we fail to perform our contractual obligations. In addition, our costs to perform under these contracts may
exceed our estimates, which could adversely impact our profitability. Any failures to comply with our contracts for the sale of our
modules could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
Our failure to further refine our technology, reduce module manufacturing and BoS costs, and develop and introduce improved
PV products could render our solar modules or systems uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability, and/or market
share.
We need to continue to invest significant financial resources in R&D to continue to improve our module conversion efficiencies,
lower the LCOE of our PV solar power systems, and otherwise keep pace with technological advances in the solar industry.
However, R&D activities are inherently uncertain, and we could encounter practical difficulties in commercializing our research
results. We seek to continuously improve our products and processes, including, for example, certain planned improvements to our
Series 6 module technology and manufacturing capabilities, such as the implementation of our copper replacement (or “CuRe”)
program or the increase to our module form factor (which we refer to as “Series 6 Plus”), and the resulting changes carry potential
risks in the form of delays, performance, additional costs, or other unintended contingencies. In addition, our significant
expenditures for R&D may not produce corresponding benefits. Other companies are developing a variety of competing PV
technologies, including advanced multi-crystalline silicon cells, PERC or advanced p-type crystalline silicon cells, high-efficiency
n-type crystalline silicon cells, bifacial solar modules, copper indium gallium diselenide thin films, amorphous silicon thin films,
and new emerging technologies such as hybrid perovskites, which could produce solar modules or systems that prove more cost-
effective or have better performance than our solar modules or systems.
In addition, other companies could potentially develop a highly reliable renewable energy system that mitigates the intermittent
power generation drawback of many renewable energy systems, or offer other value-added improvements from the perspective of
utilities and other system owners, in which case such companies could compete with us even if the LCOE associated with such new
systems is higher than that of our systems. As a result, our solar modules or systems may be negatively differentiated or rendered
obsolete by the technological advances of our competitors, which would reduce our net sales, profitability, and/or market share. In
addition, we often forward price our products and services in anticipation of future cost reductions and technology improvements,
and thus, an inability to further refine our technology and execute our module technology and cost reduction roadmaps could
adversely affect our operating results.
29
Table of Contents
Some of our manufacturing equipment is customized and sole sourced. If our manufacturing equipment fails or if our
equipment suppliers fail to perform under their contracts, we could experience production disruptions and be unable to satisfy
our contractual requirements.
Some of our manufacturing equipment, including manufacturing equipment related to the production of our Series 6 modules, is
customized to our production lines based on designs or specifications that we provide to equipment manufacturers, which then
undertake a specialized process to manufacture the custom equipment. As a result, the equipment is not readily available from
multiple vendors and would be difficult to repair or replace if it were to become delayed, damaged, or stop working. If any piece of
equipment fails, production along the entire production line could be interrupted. In addition, the failure of our equipment
manufacturers to supply equipment in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms could delay our expansion or
conversion plans, otherwise disrupt our production schedule, and/or increase our manufacturing costs, all of which would adversely
impact our operating results.
Several of our key raw materials and components are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers, and
their failure to perform could cause manufacturing delays and impair our ability to deliver solar modules to customers in the
required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.
Our failure to obtain raw materials and components that meet our quality, quantity, and cost requirements in a timely manner could
interrupt or impair our ability to manufacture our solar modules or increase our manufacturing costs. Several of our key raw
materials and components are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers. As a result, the failure of any of
our suppliers to perform could disrupt our supply chain and adversely impact our operations. In addition, some of our suppliers are
smaller companies that may be unable to supply our increasing demand for raw materials and components as we expand our
business. We may be unable to identify new suppliers or qualify their products for use on our production lines in a timely manner
and on commercially reasonable terms. A constraint on our production may result in our inability to meet our capacity plans and/or
our obligations under our customer contracts, which would have an adverse impact on our business. Additionally, reductions in our
production volume may put pressure on suppliers, resulting in increased material and component costs.
A disruption in our supply chain for CdTe could interrupt or impair our ability to manufacture solar modules and could
adversely impact our profitability and long-term growth prospects.
A key raw material used in our module production process is a CdTe compound. Tellurium, one of the main components of CdTe,
is mainly produced as a by-product of copper refining, and therefore, its supply is largely dependent upon demand for copper. Our
supply of CdTe could be limited if any of our current suppliers or any of our future suppliers fail to perform or are unable to acquire
an adequate supply of tellurium in a timely manner or at commercially reasonable prices. If our current suppliers or any of our
future suppliers cannot obtain sufficient tellurium, they could substantially increase prices or be unable to perform under their
contracts. Furthermore, if our competitors begin to use or increase their demand for tellurium, our requirements for tellurium
increase, new applications for tellurium become available, or adverse trade laws or policies restrict our ability to obtain tellurium
from foreign vendors or make doing so cost prohibitive, the supply of tellurium and related CdTe compounds could be reduced and
prices could increase. As we may be unable to pass such increases in the costs of our raw materials through to our customers, a
substantial increase in tellurium prices or any limitations in the supply of tellurium could adversely impact our profitability and
long-term growth objectives.
30
Table of Contents
Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand, convert
existing production facilities to support new product lines, decrease our cost per watt, and, when necessary, continue to build
new manufacturing plants over time in response to market demand, all of which are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand, convert existing
production facilities to support new product lines, decrease our cost per watt, and increase our manufacturing capacity in a cost-
effective and efficient manner. If we cannot do so, we may be unable to decrease our cost per watt, maintain our competitive
position, sustain profitability, expand our business, or create long-term shareholder value. Our ability to decrease our cost per watt,
expand production capacity, or convert existing production facilities to support new product lines is subject to significant risks and
uncertainties, including the following:
•failure to reduce manufacturing material, labor, or overhead costs;
•an inability to increase production throughput or the average power output per module;
•failure to effectively manage logistics costs associated with the shipping, handling, storage, and distribution of our
modules;
•delays and cost overruns as a result of a number of factors, many of which may be beyond our control, such as our
inability to secure successful contracts with equipment vendors;
•our custom-built equipment taking longer and costing more to manufacture than expected and not operating as designed;
•delays or denial of required approvals by relevant government authorities;
•an inability to hire qualified staff;
•failure to execute our expansion or conversion plans effectively;
•difficulty in balancing market demand and manufacturing production in an efficient and timely manner, potentially
causing our manufacturing capacity to be constrained in some future periods or over-supplied in others; and
•incurring manufacturing asset write-downs, write-offs, and other charges and costs, which may be significant, during those
periods in which we idle, slow down, shut down, convert, or otherwise adjust our manufacturing capacity.
If our estimates regarding the future costs of collecting and recycling CdTe solar modules covered by our solar module
collection and recycling program are incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional expenses and face a significant
unplanned cash burden.
As necessary, we fund any incremental amounts for our estimated collection and recycling obligations on an annual basis based on
the estimated costs of collecting and recycling covered modules, estimated rates of return on our restricted marketable securities,
and an estimated solar module life of 25 years less amounts already funded in prior years. We estimate the cost of our collection
and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules,
which includes estimates for the cost of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a
recycling center; material, labor, and capital costs; and by-product credits for certain materials recovered during the recycling
process. We base these estimates on our experience collecting and recycling solar modules and certain assumptions regarding costs
at the time the
31
Table of Contents
solar modules will be collected and recycled. If our estimates prove incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional expenses
and could also face a significant unplanned cash burden at the time we realize our estimates are incorrect or end users return their
modules, which could adversely affect our operating results. In addition, participating end users can return their modules covered
under the collection and recycling program at any time. As a result, we could be required to collect and recycle covered CdTe solar
modules earlier than we expect.
Our failure to protect our intellectual property rights may undermine our competitive position, and litigation to protect our
intellectual property rights or defend against third-party allegations of infringement may be costly.
Protection of our proprietary processes, methods, and other technology is critical to our business. Failure to protect and monitor the
use of our existing intellectual property rights could result in the loss of valuable technologies. We rely primarily on patents,
trademarks, trade secrets, copyrights, and contractual restrictions to protect our intellectual property. We regularly file patent
applications to protect certain inventions arising from our R&D and are currently pursuing such patent applications in various
countries in accordance with our strategy for intellectual property in that jurisdiction. Our existing patents and future patents could
be challenged, invalidated, circumvented, or rendered unenforceable. Our pending patent applications may not result in issued
patents, or if patents are issued to us, such patents may not be sufficient to provide meaningful protection against competitors or
against competitive technologies.
We also rely on unpatented proprietary manufacturing expertise, continuing technological innovation, and other trade secrets to
develop and maintain our competitive position. Although we generally enter into confidentiality agreements with our associates and
third parties to protect our intellectual property, such confidentiality agreements are limited in duration and could be breached and
may not provide meaningful protection for our trade secrets or proprietary manufacturing expertise. Adequate remedies may not be
available in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of our trade secrets and manufacturing expertise. In addition, others may
obtain knowledge of our trade secrets through independent development or legal means. The failure of our patents or
confidentiality agreements to protect our processes, equipment, technology, trade secrets, and proprietary manufacturing expertise,
methods, and compounds could have a material adverse effect on our business. In addition, effective patent, trademark, copyright,
and trade secret protection may be unavailable or limited in some foreign countries, especially any developing countries into which
we may expand our operations. In some countries, we have not applied for patent, trademark, or copyright protection.
Third parties may infringe or misappropriate our proprietary technologies or other intellectual property rights, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and operating results. Policing unauthorized use of proprietary
technology can be difficult and expensive. Additionally, litigation may be necessary to enforce our intellectual property rights,
protect our trade secrets, or determine the validity and scope of the proprietary rights of others. We cannot ensure that the outcome
of such potential litigation will be in our favor, and such litigation may be costly and may divert management attention and other
resources away from our business. An adverse determination in any such litigation may impair our intellectual property rights and
may harm our business, prospects, and reputation. In addition, we have no insurance coverage against such litigation costs and
would have to bear all costs arising from such litigation to the extent we are unable to recover them from other parties.
If any future production lines are not built in line with committed schedules, it may adversely affect our future growth plans. If
any future production lines do not achieve operating metrics similar to our existing production lines, our solar modules could
perform below expectations and cause us to lose customers.
If we are unable to systematically replicate our production lines over time and achieve operating metrics similar to our existing
production lines, our manufacturing capacity could be substantially constrained, our manufacturing costs per watt could increase,
and our growth could be limited. Such factors may result in lower net sales and lower net income than we anticipate. For instance,
future production lines could produce solar modules that have lower conversion efficiencies, higher failure rates, and/or higher
rates of degradation than solar modules from our existing
32
Table of Contents
production lines, and we could be unable to determine the cause of the lower operating metrics or develop and implement solutions
to improve performance.
Our substantial international operations subject us to a number of risks, including unfavorable political, regulatory, labor, and
tax conditions in the United States and/or foreign countries.
We have significant manufacturing, development, sales, and marketing operations both within and outside the United States and
expect to continue to expand our operations worldwide. As a result, we are subject to the legal, political, social, tax, and regulatory
requirements and economic conditions of many jurisdictions.
Risks inherent to international operations include, but are not limited to, the following:
•difficulty in enforcing agreements in foreign legal systems;
•varying degrees of protection afforded to foreign investments in the countries in which we operate and irregular
interpretations and enforcement of laws and regulations in such jurisdictions;
•foreign countries may impose additional income and withholding taxes or otherwise tax our foreign operations, impose
tariffs, or adopt other restrictions on foreign trade and investment, including currency exchange controls;
•fluctuations in exchange rates may affect demand for our products and services and may adversely affect our profitability
and cash flows in U.S. dollars to the extent that our net sales or our costs are denominated in a foreign currency and the
cost associated with hedging the U.S. dollar equivalent of such exposures is prohibitive; the longer the duration of such
foreign currency exposure, the greater the risk;
•anti-corruption compliance issues, including the costs related to the mitigation of such risk;
•risk of nationalization or other expropriation of private enterprises;
•changes in general economic and political conditions in the countries in which we operate, including changes in
government incentive provisions;
•unexpected adverse changes in U.S. or foreign laws or regulatory requirements, including those with respect to
environmental protection, import or export duties, and quotas;
•opaque approval processes in which the lack of transparency may cause delays and increase the uncertainty of project
approvals;
•difficulty in staffing and managing widespread operations;
•difficulty in repatriating earnings;
•difficulty in negotiating a successful collective bargaining agreement in applicable foreign jurisdictions;
•trade barriers such as export requirements, tariffs, taxes, local content requirements, anti-dumping regulations and
requirements, and other restrictions and expenses, which could increase the effective price of our solar modules and make
us less competitive in some countries or increase the costs to perform under our existing contracts; and
•difficulty of, and costs relating to, compliance with the different commercial and legal requirements of the overseas
countries in which we offer and sell our solar modules.
33
Table of Contents
Our business in foreign markets requires us to respond to rapid changes in market conditions in these countries. Our overall success
as a global business depends, in part, on our ability to succeed in differing legal, regulatory, economic, social, and political
conditions. We may not be able to timely develop and implement policies and strategies that will be effective in each location
where we do business.
Risks Related to Our Systems Business
Project development or construction activities may not be successful; projects under development may not receive required
permits, real property rights, PPAs, interconnection, and transmission arrangements; or financing or construction may not
commence or proceed as scheduled, which could increase our costs and impair our ability to recover our investments.
The development and construction of solar energy generation facilities and other energy infrastructure projects involve numerous
risks. We may be required to spend significant sums for land and interconnection rights, preliminary engineering, permitting, legal
services, and other expenses before we can determine whether a project is feasible, economically attractive, or capable of being
built. Success in developing a particular project is contingent upon, among other things:
•obtaining financeable land rights, including land rights for the project site, transmission lines, and environmental
mitigation;
•entering into financeable arrangements for the purchase of the electrical output, capacity, ancillary services, and renewable
energy attributes generated by the project;
•receipt from governmental agencies of required environmental, land-use, and construction and operation permits and
approvals;
•receipt of tribal government approvals for projects on tribal land;
•receipt of governmental approvals related to the presence of any protected or endangered species or habitats, migratory
birds, wetlands or other jurisdictional water resources, and/or cultural resources;
•negotiation of development agreements, public benefit agreements, and other agreements to compensate local
governments for project impacts;
•negotiation of state and local tax abatement and incentive agreements;
•receipt of rights to interconnect the project to the electric grid or to transmit energy;
•negotiation of satisfactory EPC agreements, including agreements with third-party EPC providers;
•securing necessary rights of way for access and transmission lines;
•securing necessary water rights for project construction and operation;
•securing appropriate title coverage, including coverage for mineral rights, mechanics’ liens, etc.;
•obtaining financing, including debt, equity, and funds associated with the monetization of tax credits and other tax
benefits;
•payment of PPA, interconnection, and other deposits (some of which are non-refundable);
34
Table of Contents
•providing required payment and performance security for the development of the project, such as through the provision of
letters of credit; and
•timely implementation and satisfactory completion of construction.
Successful completion of a particular project may be adversely affected, delayed and/or rendered infeasible by numerous factors,
including:
•delays in obtaining and maintaining required governmental permits and approvals, including appeals of approvals
obtained;
•potential permit and litigation challenges from project stakeholders, including local residents, environmental
organizations, labor organizations, tribes, and others who may oppose the project;
•in connection with any such permit and litigation challenges, grants of injunctive relief to stop development and/or
construction of a project;
•discovery of unknown impacts to protected or endangered species or habitats, migratory birds, wetlands or other
jurisdictional water resources, and/or cultural resources at project sites;
•discovery of unknown title defects;
•discovery of unknown environmental conditions;
•unforeseen engineering problems;
•construction delays and contractor performance shortfalls;
•work stoppages;
•cost over-runs;
•labor, equipment, and material supply shortages, failures, or disruptions;
•cost or schedule impacts arising from changes in federal, state, or local land-use or regulatory policies;
•changes in electric utility procurement practices;
•risks arising from potential transmission grid congestion, limited transmission capacity, and grid reliability constraints;
•project delays that could adversely impact our ability to maintain interconnection rights;
•additional complexities when conducting project development or construction activities in foreign jurisdictions (either on a
stand-alone basis or in collaboration with local business partners), including operating in accordance with the FCPA and
applicable local laws and customs;
•unfavorable tax treatment or adverse changes to tax policy;
•adverse weather conditions;
•water shortages;
35
Table of Contents
•adverse environmental and geological conditions;
•force majeure and other events out of our control;
•climate change; and
•change in law risks.
If we fail to complete the development of a solar energy project, fail to meet one or more agreed upon target construction milestone
dates, fail to achieve system-level capacity, or fail to meet other contract terms, we may be subject to forfeiture of significant
deposits under PPAs or interconnection agreements or termination of such agreements, incur significant liquidated damages,
penalties, and/or other obligations under other project related agreements, and may not be able to recover our investment in the
project. If we are unable to complete the development of a solar energy project, we may impair some or all of these capitalized
investments, which would have an adverse impact on our net income in the period in which the loss is recognized.
We may be unable to acquire or lease land, obtain necessary interconnection and transmission rights, and/or obtain the
approvals, licenses, permits, and electric transmission grid interconnection and transmission rights necessary to build and
operate PV solar power systems in a timely and cost effective manner, and regulatory agencies, local communities, labor unions,
tribes, or other third parties may delay, prevent, or increase the cost of construction and operation of the system we intend to
build.
In order to construct and operate our PV solar power systems, we need to acquire or lease land and rights of way, obtain
interconnection rights, negotiate agreements with affected transmission systems, and obtain all necessary federal, state, county,
local, and foreign approvals, licenses, and permits, as well as rights to interconnect the systems to the transmission grid and
transmit energy generated from the system. We may be unable to acquire the land or lease interests needed, may not obtain or
maintain satisfactory interconnection rights, may have difficulty reaching agreements with affected transmission systems and/or
incur unexpected network upgrade costs, may not receive or retain the requisite approvals, permits, licenses, and interconnection
and transmission rights, or may encounter other problems that could delay or prevent us from successfully constructing and
operating such systems.
Many of our proposed projects are located on or require access through public lands administered by federal and state agencies
pursuant to competitive public leasing and right-of-way procedures and processes. Our projects may also be located on tribal land
pursuant to land agreements that must be approved by tribal governments and federal agencies. The authorization for the use,
construction, and operation of systems and associated transmission facilities on federal, state, tribal, and private lands will also
require the assessment and evaluation of mineral rights, private rights-of-way, and other easements; environmental, agricultural,
cultural, recreational, and aesthetic impacts; and the likely mitigation of adverse impacts to these and other resources and uses. The
inability to obtain the required permits and other federal, state, local, and tribal approvals, and any excessive delays in obtaining
such permits and approvals due, for example, to litigation or third-party appeals, could potentially prevent us from successfully
constructing and operating such systems in a timely manner and could result in the potential forfeiture of any deposit we have made
with respect to a given project. Moreover, project approvals subject to project modifications and conditions, including mitigation
requirements and costs, could affect the financial success of a given project. Changing regulatory requirements and the discovery of
unknown site conditions could also affect the financial success of a given project.
In addition, local labor unions may increase the cost of project development in California and elsewhere. We may also be subject to
labor unavailability and/or increased union labor requirements due to multiple simultaneous projects in a geographic region.
36
Table of Contents
We may not be able to obtain long-term contracts for the sale of power produced by our projects at prices and on other terms
favorable to attract financing and other investments; with regard to projects for which electricity is or will be sold on an open
contract basis rather than under a PPA, our results of operations could be adversely affected to the extent prevailing spot
electricity prices decline in an unexpected manner.
Obtaining long-term contracts for the sale of power produced by our projects at prices and on other terms favorable to us is
essential for obtaining financing and commencing construction of our projects. We must compete for PPAs against other developers
of solar and renewable energy projects. This intense competition for PPAs has resulted in downward pressure on PPA pricing for
newly contracted projects. In addition, we believe the solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between
supply and demand that put downward pressure on module pricing. This downward pressure on module pricing also creates
downward pressure on PPA pricing for newly contracted projects. See the Risk Factor entitled “Competition at the system level can
be intense, thereby potentially exerting downward pressure on system-level profit margins industry-wide, which could reduce our
profitability and adversely affect our results of operations” for additional information. If falling PPA pricing results in forecasted
project revenue that is insufficient to generate returns anticipated to be demanded in the project sale market, our business, financial
condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
Other sources of power, such as natural gas-fired power plants, have historically been cheaper than the cost of solar power, and
certain types of generation projects, such as natural gas-fired power plants, can deliver power on a firm basis. The inability to
compete successfully against other power producers or otherwise enter into PPAs favorable to us would negatively affect our ability
to develop and finance our projects and negatively impact our revenue. In addition, the availability of PPAs is dependent on utility
and corporate energy procurement practices that could evolve and shift allocation of market risks over time. In addition, PPA
availability and terms are a function of a number of economic, regulatory, tax, and public policy factors, which are also subject to
change. Furthermore, certain of our projects may be scheduled for substantial completion prior to the commencement of a long-
term PPA with a major off-taker, in which case we would be required to enter into a stub-period PPA for the intervening time period
or sell down the project. We may not be able to do either on terms that are commercially attractive to us. Finally, the electricity
from certain of our projects is or is expected to be sold on an open contract basis for a period of time rather than under a PPA. If
prevailing spot electricity prices relating to any such project were to decline in an unexpected manner, such project may decline in
value and our results of operations could otherwise be adversely affected.
Even if we are able to obtain PPAs favorable to us, the ability of our off-take counterparties to fulfill their contractual obligations to
us depends, in part, on their creditworthiness. These counterparties, such as our investor-owned utility counterparties in the state of
California, which may have liability for damages associated with California’s recent wildfires, could suffer a deterioration of their
creditworthiness or become, and in one case has become, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, or liquidation proceedings or
otherwise. For example, in January 2019, PG&E Corporation and Pacific Gas and Electric Company filed voluntary petitions for
relief under chapter 11 of title 11 of the United States Code in the U.S. Bankruptcy Court for the Northern District of California. If
one or more of our counterparties becomes subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, or liquidation proceedings, or if the creditworthiness
of any counterparty deteriorates, we could experience an underpayment or nonpayment under PPA agreements and our ability to
attract debt or equity financing for our projects could be impaired.
Lack of transmission capacity availability, potential upgrade costs to the transmission grid, and other system constraints could
significantly impact our ability to build PV solar power systems and generate solar electricity power sales.
In order to deliver electricity from our PV solar power systems to our customers, our projects generally need to connect to the
transmission grid. The lack of available capacity on the transmission grid could substantially impact our projects and cause
reductions in project size, delays in project implementation, increases in costs from transmission upgrades, and potential forfeitures
of any deposit we have made with respect to a given project. In addition, there could be unexpected costs required to complete
transmission and network upgrades that adversely
37
Table of Contents
impact the economic viability of our PV solar power systems. These transmission and network issues and costs, as well as issues
relating to the availability of large equipment such as transformers and switchgear, could significantly impact our ability to
interconnect our systems to the transmission grid, build such systems, and generate solar electricity sales.
Competition at the system level can be intense, thereby potentially exerting downward pressure on system-level profit margins
industry-wide, which could reduce our profitability and adversely affect our results of operations.
The significant decline in PV solar module prices over the last several years continues to create a challenging environment for
module manufacturers, but it has also helped drive demand for solar electricity worldwide. Aided by such lower module prices, our
customers and potential customers have in many cases been willing and able to bid aggressively for new projects and PPAs, using
low cost assumptions for modules, BoS parts, installation, maintenance, and other costs as the basis for such bids. Relatively low
barriers to entry for solar project developers, including those we compete with, have led to, depending on the market and other
factors, intense competition at the system level, which may result in an environment in which system-level pricing falls rapidly,
thereby further increasing demand for solar energy solutions but constraining the ability for project developers, and diversified
companies such as First Solar to sustain meaningful and consistent profitability. Accordingly, while we believe our system offerings
and experience are positively differentiated in many cases from that of our competitors, we may fail to correctly identify our
competitive position, we may be unable to develop or maintain a sufficient magnitude of new system projects at economically
attractive rates of return, and we may not otherwise be able to achieve meaningful profitability under our long-term strategic plans.
Depending on the market opportunity, we may be at a disadvantage compared to potential system-level competitors. For example,
certain of our competitors may have a stronger and/or more established localized business presence in a particular geographic
region. Certain of our competitors may be larger entities that have greater financial resources and greater overall brand name
recognition than we do and, as a result, may be better positioned to impact customer behavior or adapt to changes in the industry or
the economy as a whole. Certain competitors may also have direct or indirect access to sovereign capital and/or other incentives,
which could enable such competitors to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of time.
Additionally, depending on the geographic area, certain potential customers may still be in the process of educating themselves
about the points of differentiation among various available providers of PV solar energy solutions, including a company’s proven
overall experience and bankability, system design and optimization expertise, grid interconnection and stabilization expertise, and
proven O&M capabilities. If we are unable over time to meaningfully differentiate our offerings at scale, or if available competitive
pricing is prioritized over the value we believe is added through our system offerings and experience, from the viewpoint of our
potential customer base, our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services business,
we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to
pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with Clairvest for the sale of our North American
O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of
certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect
the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our U.S. project development
business, we have determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to pursue the sale of this business. On January 24, 2021,
we entered into an agreement with OMERS for the sale of our U.S. project development operations, which comprises the business
of developing, contracting for the construction of, and selling utility-scale PV solar power systems. The transaction includes our
approximately 10 GW utility-scale solar project pipeline, including the advanced-stage Horizon, Madison, Ridgely, Rabbitbrush,
and Oak Trail projects that areAC
38
Table of Contents
expected to commence construction in the next two years; the 30 MW Barilla Solar project, which is operational; and certain
other equipment. In addition, OMERS has agreed to certain module purchase commitments. The completion of the transaction is
contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approval from FERC, the expiration of the
mandatory waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the transaction by CFIUS, and other customary closing conditions.
Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Our systems business is largely dependent on us and third parties arranging financing from various sources, which may not be
available or may only be available on unfavorable terms or in insufficient amounts.
The construction of large utility-scale solar power projects in many cases requires project financing, including non-recourse project
specific debt financing in the bank loan market and institutional debt capital markets. Uncertainties exist as to whether our planned
projects will be able to access the debt markets in a magnitude sufficient to finance their construction. If we, or purchasers of our
projects, are unable to arrange such financing or if it is only available on unfavorable terms, we may be unable to fully execute our
systems business plans. In addition, we generally expect to sell interests in our projects by raising project equity capital from tax-
oriented, strategic industry, and other equity investors. Such equity sources may not be available or may only be available in
insufficient amounts or on unfavorable terms, in which case our ability to sell interests in our projects may be delayed or limited,
and our business, financial condition, and results of operations may be adversely affected. Uncertainty in or adverse changes to tax
policy or tax law, including the amount of ITC or accelerated depreciation, and any limitations on the value or availability to
potential investors of tax incentives that benefit solar energy projects such as the ITC and accelerated depreciation deductions, as
well as the reduction of the U.S. corporate income tax rate to 21% under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act”) (which could
reduce the value of these tax related incentives) may reduce project values or negatively affect our ability to timely secure equity
investment for our projects.
Depending on prevailing conditions in the credit markets, interest rates and other factors, such financing may not be available or
may only be available on unfavorable terms or in insufficient amounts. If third parties are limited in their ability to access financing
to support their purchase of system construction services from us, we may not realize the cash flows that we expect from such sales,
which could adversely affect our ability to invest in our business and/or generate revenue. See also the Risk Factor above entitled
“An increase in interest rates or tightening of the supply of capital in the global financial markets (including a reduction in total tax
equity availability) could make it difficult for customers to finance the cost of a PV solar power system and could reduce the
demand for our modules or systems and/or lead to a reduction in the average selling price for such offerings.”
Developing solar power projects may require significant upfront investment prior to the signing of sales contracts, which could
adversely affect our business and results of operations.
Solar power project development cycles, which span the time between the identification of a site location and the construction of a
system, vary substantially and can take years to mature. As a result of these long project development cycles, we may need to make
significant up-front investments of resources (including, for example, payments for land rights, large transmission and PPA
deposits, or other payments, which may be non-refundable) in advance of the signing of sales contracts, receiving cash proceeds, or
recognizing any revenue. Our potential inability to enter into sales contracts with customers on favorable terms after making such
upfront investments could cause us to forfeit certain nonrefundable payments or otherwise adversely affect our business and results
of operations. Furthermore, we may become constrained in our ability to simultaneously fund our other business operations and
these systems investments through our long project development cycles.
Our liquidity may also be adversely affected to the extent the project sales market weakens and we are unable to sell interests in our
solar projects on pricing, timing, and other terms commercially acceptable to us. In such a scenario, we may choose to continue to
temporarily own and operate certain solar projects for a period of time, after which interests in the projects may be sold to third
parties.AC
39
Table of Contents
We may be subject to unforeseen costs, liabilities, or obligations when providing O&M services. In addition, certain of our
O&M agreements include provisions permitting the counterparty to terminate the agreement without cause.
We may provide ongoing O&M services to system owners under separate service agreements, pursuant to which we generally
perform standard activities associated with operating a PV solar power system, including 24/7 monitoring and control, compliance
activities, energy forecasting, and scheduled and unscheduled maintenance. Our costs to perform these services are estimated at the
time of entering into the O&M agreement for a particular project, and these are reflected in the price we charge our customers,
including certain agreements which feature fixed pricing. Should our estimates of O&M costs prove inaccurate (including any
unexpected serial defects, unavailability of parts, or increases in inflation, labor, or BoS costs), our growth strategy and results of
operations could be adversely affected. Because of the potentially long-term nature of these O&M agreements, the adverse impacts
on our results of operations could be significant, up to our limitation of liability capped under the terms of the agreements. In
addition, certain of our O&M agreements include provisions permitting the counterparty to terminate the agreement without cause
or for convenience. The exercise of such termination rights, or the use of such rights as leverage to re-negotiate terms and
conditions of an O&M agreement, including pricing terms, could adversely impact our results of operations. We may also be
subject to substantial costs in the event we do not achieve certain thresholds under the effective availability guarantees included in
our O&M agreements.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services business,
we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to
pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with Clairvest for the sale of our North American
O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of
certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect
the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Our systems business is subject to regulatory oversight and liability if we fail to operate PV solar power systems in compliance
with electric reliability rules.
The ongoing O&M services that we provide for system owners may subject us to regulation by the North American Electric
Reliability Corporation (“NERC”), or its designated regional representative, as a generator operator (“GOP”) under electric
reliability rules filed with FERC. Our failure to comply with the reliability rules applicable to GOPs could subject us to substantial
fines by NERC, subject to FERC’s review. In addition, the system owners that receive our O&M services may be regulated by
NERC as generator owners (“GO”) and we may incur liability for GO violations and fines levied by NERC, subject to FERC’s
review, based on the terms of our O&M agreements. As a system owner and operator, we may in the future be subject to regulation
by NERC as a GO.
40
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Regulations
Existing regulations and policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical, regulatory, and
economic barriers to the purchase and use of PV solar products or systems, which may significantly reduce demand for our
modules, systems, or services.
The market for electricity generation products is heavily influenced by federal, state, local, and foreign government regulations and
policies concerning the electric utility industry, as well as policies promulgated by electric utilities. These regulations and policies
often relate to electricity pricing and interconnection of customer-owned electricity generation. In the United States and in a
number of other countries, these regulations and policies have been modified in the past and may be modified again in the future.
These regulations and policies could deter end-user purchases of PV solar products or systems and investment in the R&D of PV
solar technology. For example, without a mandated regulatory exception for PV solar power systems, system owners are often
charged interconnection or standby fees for putting distributed power generation on the electric utility grid. To the extent these
interconnection standby fees are applicable to PV solar power systems, it is likely that they would increase the cost of such
systems, which could make the systems less desirable, thereby adversely affecting our business, financial condition, and results of
operations. In addition, with respect to utilities that utilize a peak-hour pricing policy or time-of-use pricing methods whereby the
price of electricity is adjusted based on electricity supply and demand, electricity generated by PV solar power systems currently
benefits from competing primarily with expensive peak-hour electricity, rather than the less expensive average price of electricity.
Modifications to the peak-hour pricing policies of utilities, such as to a flat rate for all times of the day, would require PV solar
power systems to have lower prices in order to compete with the price of electricity from other sources, which could adversely
impact our operating results.
Our modules, systems, and services are often subject to oversight and regulation in accordance with national and local ordinances
relating to building codes, safety, environmental protection, utility interconnection and metering, and other matters, and tracking
the requirements of individual jurisdictions is complex. Any new government regulations or utility policies pertaining to our
modules, systems, or services may result in significant additional expenses to us or our customers and, as a result, could cause a
significant reduction in demand for our modules, systems, or services. In addition, any regulatory compliance failure could result in
significant management distraction, unplanned costs, and/or reputational damage.
We could be adversely affected by any violations of the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other foreign anti-bribery laws.
The FCPA generally prohibits companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non-U.S. government
officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Other countries in which we operate also have anti-bribery laws, some
of which prohibit improper payments to government and non-government persons and entities, and others (e.g., the FCPA and the
U.K. Bribery Act) extend their application to activities outside their country of origin. Our policies mandate compliance with all
applicable anti-bribery laws. We currently operate in, and may further expand into, key parts of the world that have experienced
governmental corruption to some degree and, in certain circumstances, strict compliance with anti-bribery laws may conflict with
local customs and practices. In addition, due to the level of regulation in our industry, our operations in certain jurisdictions,
including China, India, South America, and the Middle East, require substantial government contact, either directly by us or
through intermediaries over whom we have less direct control, such as subcontractors, agents, and partners (such as joint venture
partners), where norms can differ from U.S. standards. Although we have implemented policies, procedures, and, in certain cases,
contractual arrangements designed to facilitate compliance with these anti-bribery laws, our officers, directors, associates,
subcontractors, agents, and partners may take actions in violation of our policies, procedures, contractual arrangements, and anti-
bribery laws. Any such violation, even if prohibited by our policies, could subject us and such persons to criminal and/or civil
penalties or other sanctions potentially by government prosecutors from more than one country, which could have a material
adverse effect on our business, financial condition, cash flows, and reputation.
41
Table of Contents
Environmental obligations and liabilities could have a substantial negative impact on our business, financial condition, and
results of operations.
Our operations involve the use, handling, generation, processing, storage, transportation, and disposal of hazardous materials and
are subject to extensive environmental laws and regulations at the national, state, local, and international levels. These
environmental laws and regulations include those governing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water, the use, management,
and disposal of hazardous materials and wastes, the cleanup of contaminated sites, and occupational health and safety. As we
expand our business into foreign jurisdictions worldwide, our environmental compliance burden may continue to increase both in
terms of magnitude and complexity. We have incurred and may continue to incur significant costs in complying with these laws and
regulations. In addition, violations of, or liabilities under, environmental laws or permits may result in restrictions being imposed
on our operating activities or in our being subject to substantial fines, penalties, criminal proceedings, third-party property damage
or personal injury claims, cleanup costs, or other costs. While we believe we are currently in substantial compliance with applicable
environmental requirements, future developments such as more aggressive enforcement policies, the implementation of new, more
stringent laws and regulations, or the discovery of presently unknown environmental conditions may require expenditures that
could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Our solar modules contain CdTe and other semiconductor materials. Elemental cadmium and certain of its compounds are regulated
as hazardous materials due to the adverse health effects that may arise from human exposure. Based on existing research, the risks
of exposure to CdTe are not believed to be as serious as those relating to exposure to elemental cadmium due to CdTe’s limited
bioavailability. In our manufacturing operations, we maintain engineering controls to minimize our associates’ exposure to
cadmium compounds and require our associates who handle cadmium compounds to follow certain safety procedures, including the
use of personal protective equipment such as respirators, chemical goggles, and protective clothing. Relevant studies and third-
party peer reviews of our technology have concluded that the risk of exposure to cadmium or cadmium compounds from our end-
products is negligible. In addition, the risk of exposure is further minimized by the encapsulated nature of these materials in our
products, the physical properties of cadmium compounds used in our products, and the recycling or responsible disposal of our
modules. While we believe that these factors and procedures are sufficient to protect our associates, end users, and the general
public from adverse health effects that may arise from cadmium exposure, we cannot ensure that human or environmental exposure
to cadmium or cadmium compounds used in our products will not occur. Any such exposure could result in future third-party
claims against us, damage to our reputation, and heightened regulatory scrutiny, which could limit or impair our ability to sell and
distribute our products. The occurrence of future events such as these could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition, and results of operations.
The use of cadmium or cadmium compounds in various products is also coming under increasingly stringent governmental
regulation. Future regulation in this area could impact the manufacturing, sale, collection, and recycling of solar modules and could
require us to make unforeseen environmental expenditures or limit our ability to sell and distribute our products. For example,
European Union Directive 2011/65/EU on the Restriction of the Use of Hazardous Substances (“RoHS”) in electrical and electronic
equipment (the “RoHS Directive”) restricts the use of certain hazardous substances, including cadmium and its compounds, in
specified products. Other jurisdictions, such as China, have adopted similar legislation or are considering doing so. Currently, PV
solar modules are explicitly excluded from the scope of RoHS (Article 2), as adopted by the European Parliament and the Council
in June 2011. The next general review of the RoHS Directive is scheduled for 2021, involving a broader discussion of the existing
scope. In preparation for the next RoHS revision, the European Commission has started a number of pre-regulatory studies and
assessments relating to the addition of new substances to the existing RoHS framework, as well as the revision and optimization of
the exemption process. It is unclear to what extent the existing scope exclusions will be discussed or maintained in future
directives. If PV modules were to be included in the scope of future RoHS revisions without an exemption or exclusion, we would
be required to redesign our solar modules to reduce cadmium and other affected hazardous substances to the maximum allowable
concentration thresholds in the RoHS Directive in order to continue to offer them for sale within the EU. As such actions would be
42
Table of Contents
impractical, this type of regulatory development would effectively close the EU market to us, which could have a material adverse
effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Risks Related to the COVID-19 Pandemic
The COVID-19 pandemic could materially impact our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
The COVID-19 pandemic has continued to have an unprecedented impact on the United States, Malaysia, and other countries
throughout the world, including those in which we do business or have operations. Although as of the date of this filing, we have
not been materially impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, the pandemic could materially impact our business, financial condition,
and results of operations in the future. The extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic could impact us continues to be highly
uncertain and cannot be predicted, and will depend largely on subsequent developments, including the severity and duration of the
pandemic, measures taken to contain the spread of the virus, such as restrictions on travel and gatherings of people and temporary
closures of or limitations on businesses and other commercial activities, and the timing and nature of policies implemented by
governmental authorities to ease such measures.
As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and these related containment measures and reopening policies, we may be subject to
significant risks, which have the potential to materially and adversely impact our business, financial condition, and results of
operations, including the following:
•the continued economic disruption caused by the COVID-19 pandemic may result in a long-term tightening of the supply
of capital in global financial markets (including, in the United States, a reduction in total tax equity availability), which
could make it difficult for purchasers of our modules or our development projects to secure the debt or equity capital
necessary to finance a PV solar power system, thereby delaying or reducing demand for our modules or these projects;
•purchasers of PV modules may delay module procurement in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, which may result in
additional pressure on global demand and average selling prices for modules, and may exacerbate structural imbalances
between global PV module supply and demand;
•we may at any time be ordered by governmental authorities, or we may determine, based on our understanding of the
recommendations or orders of governmental authorities, that we have to curtail or cease business operations or activities,
including manufacturing;
•the failure of our suppliers or vendors to supply materials or equipment, or the failure of our vendors to install, repair, or
replace our specialized equipment, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, related containment measures, or limitations on
logistics providers’ ability to operate, may idle, slowdown, shutdown, or otherwise cause us to adjust our manufacturing
capacity. We have incurred manufacturing charges associated with the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic;
•the COVID-19 pandemic and related containment measures may result in us incurring delays in obtaining, or failing to
obtain, the approvals or rights that are required for our development projects to proceed, such as permitting,
interconnection, or land usage approvals or rights, and the COVID-19 pandemic and related containment measures may
delay or prevent the performance by third parties of activities related to the development of these projects, such as
interconnection, engineering, procurement, construction, and other activities;
•we perform substantial R&D to continue to improve our module wattage (or conversion efficiency), lower our module cost
per watt, lower the overall LCOE of our PV solar power systems, and otherwise keep pace with technological advances in
the solar industry. The COVID-19 pandemic and related containment
43
Table of Contents
measures, including the unavailability of our personnel and third-party partners who are engaged in R&D activities, may
inhibit our R&D efforts or our ability to timely advance or commercialize these efforts; and
•in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the vast majority of our associates who are capable of performing their function
remotely are telecommuting (i.e., working from home). While we have instituted security measures to minimize the
likelihood and impact of a cybersecurity incident with respect to associates utilizing technological communications tools,
these measures may be inadequate to prevent a cybersecurity breach because of the unprecedented number of associates
continuously using these tools. Recently, there have been reports of a surge in widespread cyber-attacks during the
COVID-19 pandemic. Any increase in the frequency or scope of cyber-attacks during the COVID-19 pandemic may
exacerbate the aforementioned cybersecurity risks. In addition, while we have, among other things, established enhanced
cleaning procedures at our facilities and protocols for responding when our associates are infected, we cannot assure these
will be sufficient to mitigate the risks faced by our work force or the liability we may face as a result of any outbreaks of
COVID-19.
If the severity and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic does not abate and related containment measures are not lifted, are eased
more slowly than anticipated, or are reinstituted, many of the other risks described herein may have a significant impact on our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.
General Risk Factors
If our long-lived assets or project related assets become impaired, we may be required to record significant charges to earnings.
We may be required to record significant charges to earnings should we determine that our long-lived assets or project related
assets are impaired. Such charges may have a material impact on our financial position and results of operations. We review long-
lived and project related assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of
such assets may not be recoverable. We consider a project commercially viable or recoverable if it is anticipated to be sold for a
profit once it is either fully developed or fully constructed or if the expected operating cash flows from future power generation
exceed the cost basis of the asset. If our projects are not considered commercially viable, we would be required to impair the
respective assets.
Our credit agreements contain covenant restrictions that may limit our ability to operate our business.
We may be unable to respond to changes in business and economic conditions, engage in transactions that might otherwise be
beneficial to us, and obtain additional financing, if needed, because the senior secured credit facility made available under our
amended and restated credit agreement with several financial institutions as lenders and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as
administrative agent (the “Revolving Credit Facility”) and certain of our project financing arrangements contain, and other future
debt agreements may contain, covenant restrictions that limit our ability to, among other things:
•incur additional debt, assume obligations in connection with letters of credit, or issue guarantees;
•create liens;
•enter into certain transactions with our affiliates;
•sell certain assets; and
•declare or pay dividends, make other distributions to stockholders, or make other restricted payments.
44
Table of Contents
Under our Revolving Credit Facility and certain of our project financing arrangements, we are also subject to certain financial
covenants. Our ability to comply with covenants under our credit agreements is dependent on our future performance or the
performance of specifically financed projects, which will be subject to many factors, some of which are beyond our control,
including prevailing economic conditions. In addition, our failure to comply with these covenants could result in a default under
these agreements and any of our other future debt agreements, which if not cured or waived, could permit the holders thereof to
accelerate such debt and could cause cross-defaults under our other facility agreements and the possible acceleration of debt under
such agreements, as well as cross-defaults under certain of our key project and operational agreements and could also result in
requirements to post additional security instruments to secure future obligations. In addition, certain events that occur within the
Company, or in the industry or the economy as a whole, may constitute material adverse effects under these agreements. If it is
determined that a material adverse effect has occurred, the lenders can, under certain circumstances, restrict future borrowings or
accelerate the due date of outstanding amounts. If any of our debt is accelerated, we may experience cross-defaults under our other
debt or operational agreements, which could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of
operations.
Cyber-attacks or other breaches of our information systems, or those of third parties with which we do business, could have a
material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Our operations rely on our computer systems, hardware, software, and networks, as well as those of third parties with which we do
business, to securely process, store, and transmit proprietary, confidential, and other information, including intellectual property.
We also rely heavily on these information systems to operate our manufacturing lines and PV solar power plants. These information
systems may be compromised by cyber-attacks, computer viruses, and other events that could be materially disruptive to our
business operations and could put the security of our information, and that of the third parties with which we do business, at risk of
misappropriation or destruction. In recent years, such cyber incidents have become increasingly frequent and sophisticated,
targeting or otherwise affecting a wide range of companies. While we have instituted security measures to minimize the likelihood
and impact of a cyber incident, there is no assurance that these measures, or those of the third parties with which we do business,
will be adequate in the future. If these measures fail, valuable information may be lost; our manufacturing, development,
construction, O&M, and other operations may be disrupted; we may be unable to fulfill our customer obligations; and our
reputation may suffer. For example, any cyber incident affecting our automated manufacturing lines could adversely affect our
ability to produce solar modules or otherwise affect the quality and performance of the modules produced. We may also be subject
to litigation, regulatory action, remedial expenses, and financial losses beyond the scope or limits of our insurance coverage. These
consequences of a failure of security measures could, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.
As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, the vast majority of our associates who are capable of performing their function remotely
are telecommuting, which may exacerbate the aforementioned cybersecurity risks. See the Risk Factor entitled “The COVID-19
pandemic could materially impact our business, financial condition, and results of operations.”
We may not realize the anticipated benefits of past or future business combinations or acquisition transactions, and integration
of business combinations may disrupt our business and management.
We have made several acquisitions in prior years and in the future we may acquire additional companies, project pipelines,
products, equity interests, or technologies or enter into joint ventures or other strategic initiatives. We may not realize the
anticipated benefits of such business combinations or acquisitions, and each transaction has numerous risks, which may include the
following:
•difficulty in assimilating the operations and personnel of the acquired or partner company;
45
Table of Contents
•difficulty in effectively integrating the acquired products or technologies with our current products or technologies;
•difficulty in achieving profitable commercial scale from acquired technologies;
•difficulty in maintaining controls, procedures, and policies during the transition and integration;
•disruption of our ongoing business and distraction of our management and associates from other opportunities and
challenges due to integration issues;
•difficulty integrating the acquired or partner company’s accounting, management information, and other administrative
systems;
•difficulty managing joint ventures with our partners, potential litigation with joint venture partners, and reliance upon joint
ventures that we do not control;
•inability to retain key technical and managerial personnel of the acquired business;
•inability to retain key customers, vendors, and other business partners of the acquired business;
•inability to achieve the financial and strategic goals for the acquired and combined businesses, as a result of insufficient
capital resources or otherwise;
•incurring acquisition-related costs or amortization costs for acquired intangible assets that could impact our operating
results;
•potential impairment of our relationships with our associates, customers, partners, distributors, or third-party providers of
products or technologies;
•potential failure of the due diligence processes to identify significant issues with product quality, legal and financial
liabilities, among other things;
•potential inability to assert that internal controls over financial reporting are effective;
•potential inability to obtain, or obtain in a timely manner, approvals from governmental authorities, which could delay or
prevent such acquisitions; and
•potential delay in customer purchasing decisions due to uncertainty about the direction of our product offerings.
Mergers and acquisitions of companies are inherently risky, and ultimately, if we do not complete the integration of acquired
businesses successfully and in a timely manner, we may not realize the anticipated benefits of the acquisitions to the extent
anticipated, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition, or results of operations. In addition, we may seek to
dispose of our interests in acquired companies, project pipelines, products, or technologies. We may not recover our initial
investment in such interests, in part or at all, which could adversely affect our business, financial condition, or results of operations.
Our future success depends on our ability to retain our key associates and to successfully integrate them into our management
team.
We are dependent on the services of our executive officers and other members of our senior management team. The loss of one or
more of these key associates or any other member of our senior management team could have a
46
Table of Contents
material adverse effect on our business. We may not be able to retain or replace these key associates and may not have adequate
succession plans in place. Several of our current key associates including our executive officers are subject to employment
conditions or arrangements that contain post-employment non-competition provisions. However, these arrangements permit the
associates to terminate their employment with us upon little or no notice.
If we are unable to attract, train, and retain key personnel, our business may be materially and adversely affected.
Our future success depends, to a significant extent, on our ability to attract, train, and retain management, operations, sales, and
technical personnel, including personnel in foreign jurisdictions. Recruiting and retaining capable personnel, particularly those with
expertise in the PV solar industry across a variety of technologies, are vital to our success. There is substantial competition for
qualified technical personnel, and while we continue to benchmark our organization against the broad spectrum of business in our
market space to remain economically competitive, there can be no assurances that we will be able to attract and retain our technical
personnel. If we are unable to attract and retain qualified associates, or otherwise experience unexpected labor disruptions within
our business, we may be materially and adversely affected.
We may be exposed to infringement or misappropriation claims by third parties, which, if determined adversely to us, could
cause us to pay significant damage awards or prohibit us from the manufacture and sale of our solar modules or the use of our
technology.
Our success depends largely on our ability to use and develop our technology and know-how without infringing or
misappropriating the intellectual property rights of third parties. The validity and scope of claims relating to PV solar technology
patents involve complex scientific, legal, and factual considerations and analysis and, therefore, may be highly uncertain. We may
be subject to litigation involving claims of patent infringement or violation of intellectual property rights of third parties. The
defense and prosecution of intellectual property suits, patent opposition proceedings, and related legal and administrative
proceedings can be both costly and time consuming and may significantly divert the efforts and resources of our technical and
management personnel. An adverse determination in any such litigation or proceedings to which we may become a party could
subject us to significant liability to third parties, require us to seek licenses from third parties, which may not be available on
reasonable terms, or at all, or pay ongoing royalties, require us to redesign our solar modules, or subject us to injunctions
prohibiting the manufacture and sale of our solar modules or the use of our technologies. Protracted litigation could also result in
our customers or potential customers deferring or limiting their purchase or use of our solar modules until the resolution of such
litigation.
Currency translation and transaction risk may negatively affect our results of operations.
Although our reporting currency is the U.S. dollar, we conduct certain business and incur costs in the local currency of most
countries in which we operate. As a result, we are subject to currency translation and transaction risk. For example, certain of our
net sales in 2020 were denominated in foreign currencies, such as Japanese yen and Euro, and we expect to continue to have net
sales denominated in foreign currencies in the future. Joint ventures or other business arrangements with strategic partners outside
the United States have involved, and in the future may involve, significant investments denominated in local currencies. Changes in
exchange rates between foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar could affect our results of operations and result in exchange gains or
losses. We cannot accurately predict the impact of future exchange rate fluctuations on our results of operations.
We could also expand our business into emerging markets, many of which have an uncertain regulatory environment relating to
currency policy. Conducting business in such emerging markets could cause our exposure to changes in exchange rates to increase,
due to the relatively high volatility associated with emerging market currencies and potentially longer payment terms for our
proceeds.
Our ability to hedge foreign currency exposure is dependent on our credit profile with the banks that are willing and able to do
business with us. Deterioration in our credit position or a significant tightening of the credit market
47
Table of Contents
conditions could limit our ability to hedge our foreign currency exposures; and therefore, result in exchange gains or losses.
Unanticipated changes in our tax provision, the enactment of new tax legislation, or exposure to additional income tax
liabilities could affect our profitability.
We are subject to income taxes in the jurisdictions in which we operate. In March 2020, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic
Security Act (the “CARES Act”) was signed into law. The changes included in the CARES Act are broad and complex, and the
final effects of the CARES Act may differ from the amounts provided elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, possibly
materially, due to, among other things, changes in regulations related to the CARES Act, any legislative action to address questions
that arise because of the CARES Act, any changes in accounting standards for income taxes or related interpretations in response to
the CARES Act, or actions we may take as a result of the CARES Act. Additionally, longstanding international tax laws that
determine each country’s jurisdictional tax rights in cross-border international trade continue to evolve as a result of the base
erosion and profit shifting reporting requirements recommended by the OECD. As these and other tax laws and regulations change,
our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
We are subject to potential tax examinations in various jurisdictions, and taxing authorities may disagree with our interpretations of
U.S. and foreign tax laws and may assess additional taxes. We regularly assess the likely outcomes of these examinations in order
to determine the appropriateness of our tax provision; however, the outcome of tax examinations cannot be predicted with certainty.
Therefore, the amounts ultimately paid upon resolution of such examinations could be materially different from the amounts
previously included in our income tax provision, which could have a material impact on our results of operations and cash flows.
In addition, our future effective tax rate could be adversely affected by changes to our operating structure, losses of tax holidays,
changes in the jurisdictional mix of earnings among countries with tax holidays or differing statutory tax rates, changes in the
valuation of deferred tax assets and liabilities, changes in tax laws, and the discovery of new information in the course of our tax
return preparation process. Any changes in our effective tax rate may materially and adversely impact our results of operations.
We have been and may be subject to or involved in litigation or threatened litigation, the outcome of which may be difficult to
predict, and which may be costly to defend, divert management attention, require us to pay damages, or restrict the operation of
our business.
From time to time, we have been and may be subject to disputes and litigation, with and without merit, that may be costly and
which may divert the attention of our management and our resources in general, whether or not any dispute actually proceeds to
litigation. The results of complex legal proceedings are difficult to predict. Moreover, complaints filed against us may not specify
the amount of damages that plaintiffs seek, and we therefore may be unable to estimate the possible range of damages that might be
incurred should these lawsuits be resolved against us. Even if we are able to estimate losses related to these actions, the ultimate
amount of loss may be materially higher than our estimates. Any resolution of litigation, or threatened litigation, could involve the
payment of damages or expenses by us, which may be significant, involve an agreement with terms that restrict the operation of our
business, or adversely impact our ability to proceed with the construction or sale of a given project. Even if any future lawsuits are
not resolved against us, the costs of defending such lawsuits may be significant. These costs may exceed the dollar limits of our
insurance policies or may not be covered at all by our insurance policies. Because the price of our common stock has been, and
may continue to be, volatile, we can provide no assurance that additional securities or other litigation will not be filed against us in
the future. See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies – Legal Proceedings” to our consolidated financial statements for more
information on our legal proceedings.
48
Table of Contents
Changes in, or any failure to comply with, privacy laws, regulations, and standards may adversely affect our business.
Personal privacy and data security have become significant issues in the United States, Europe, and in many other jurisdictions in
which we operate. The regulatory framework for privacy and security issues worldwide is rapidly evolving and is likely to remain
uncertain for the foreseeable future. Furthermore, federal, state, or foreign government bodies or agencies have in the past adopted,
and may in the future adopt, laws and regulations affecting data privacy, all of which may be subject to invalidation by relevant
foreign judicial bodies. Industry organizations also regularly adopt and advocate for new standards in this area.
In the United States, these include rules and regulations promulgated or pending under the authority of federal agencies, state
attorneys general, legislatures, and consumer protection agencies. Internationally, many jurisdictions in which we operate have
established their own data security and privacy legal framework with which we, relevant suppliers, and customers must comply.
For example, the General Data Protection Regulation, a broad-based data privacy regime enacted by the European Parliament,
which became effective in May 2018, imposes new requirements on how we collect, process, transfer, and store personal data, and
also imposes additional obligations, potential penalties, and risk upon our business. Additionally, the California Consumer Privacy
Act, which became effective in January 2020, imposes similar data privacy requirements. In many jurisdictions, enforcement
actions and consequences for noncompliance are also rising. In addition to government regulation, privacy advocates and industry
groups may propose new and different self-regulatory standards that either legally or contractually apply to us. Although we have
implemented policies, procedures, and, in certain cases, contractual arrangements designed to facilitate compliance with applicable
privacy and data security laws and standards, any inability or perceived inability to adequately address privacy and security
concerns, even if unfounded, or comply with applicable privacy and data security laws, regulations, and policies, could result in
additional fines, costs, and liabilities to us, damage our reputation, inhibit sales, and adversely affect our business.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Item 2. Properties
As of December 31, 2020, our principal properties consisted of the following:
NaturePrimary Segment(s) Using
Property Location Held
Corporate headquarters Modules & Systems Tempe, Arizona, United States Lease
Manufacturing plant, R&D facility , and
administrative of fices (1)Modules Perrysbur g, Ohio, United States Own
Administrative of fices Systems San Francisco, California, United States Lease
R&D facility Modules & Systems Santa Clara, California, United States Lease
Manufacturing plant and administrative
officesModules Kulim, Kedah, Malaysia Lease land, own
buildings
Administrative of fices Modules & Systems Geor getown, Penang, Malaysia Lease
Manufacturing plant Modules Ho Chi Minh City , Vietnam Lease land, own
buildings
Manufacturing plant (2) Modules Frankfurt/Oder , Germany Own
——————————
(1) Includes our manufacturing plant located in Lake T ownship, Ohio, a short distance from our plant in Perrysbur g, Ohio.
(2) In December 2012, we ceased manufacturing at our German plant. Since its closure, we have, from time to time, marketed such
property for sale.
49
Table of Contents
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies – Legal Proceedings” to our consolidated financial statements for information
regarding legal proceedings and related matters.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
None.
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Market Information
Our common stock is listed on The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC under the symbol FSLR.
Holders
As of February 19, 2021, there were 47 record holders of our common stock, which does not reflect beneficial owners of our
shares.
Dividend Policy
We have never paid and do not expect to pay dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future. Furthermore, our
Revolving Credit Facility imposes restrictions on our ability to declare or pay dividends. The declaration and payment of dividends
is subject to the discretion of our board of directors and depends on various factors, including our net income, financial condition,
cash requirements, and future prospects as well as the restrictions under our Revolving Credit Facility and other factors considered
relevant by our board of directors. We expect to prioritize our working capital requirements, capacity expansion and other capital
expenditure needs, project development and construction, and merger and acquisition opportunities prior to returning capital to our
shareholders.
Stock Price Performance Graph
The following graph compares the five-year cumulative total return on our common stock relative to the cumulative total returns of
the S&P 500 Index and the Invesco Solar ETF, which represents a peer group of solar companies. For purposes of the graph, an
investment of $100 (with reinvestment of all dividends) is assumed to have been made in our common stock, the S&P 500 Index,
and the Invesco Solar ETF on December 31, 2015, and its relative performance is tracked through December 31, 2020. This graph
is not “soliciting material,” is not deemed filed with the SEC, and is not to be incorporated by reference in any filing by us under
the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, whether made before or after the date hereof, and irrespective of any general incorporation
language in any such filing. The stock price performance shown in the graph represents past performance and is not necessarily
indicative of future stock price performance.
50
Table of Contents
COMPARISON OF FIVE-YEAR CUMULATIVE TOTAL RETURN*
Among First Solar, the S&P 500 Index,
and the Invesco Solar ETF
——————————
*    $100 invested on December 31, 2015 in stock or index, including reinvestment of dividends. Index calculated on a month-end basis.
Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities
None.
Purchases of Equity Securities by the Issuer and Affiliate Purchases
None.
51
Table of Contents
Item 6. Selected Financial Data
The following tables set forth our selected financial data for the periods and at the dates indicated. The selected financial data from
the consolidated statements of operations and consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019,
and 2018 and the selected financial data from the consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 have been derived
from the audited consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. The selected financial data from
the consolidated statements of operations and consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2017 and
2016 and the selected financial data from the consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 have been
derived from audited consolidated financial statements not included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. The information
presented below should also be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and the related notes thereto and
Item 7. “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.”
 Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
Net sales $ 2,711,332 $ 3,063,1 17 $ 2,244,044 $ 2,941,324 $ 2,904,563 
Gross profit 680,673 549,212 392,177 548,947 638,418 
Operating income (loss) 317,489 (161,785) 40,113 177,851 (568,151)
Net income (loss) 398,355 (114,933) 144,326 (165,615) (416,1 12)
Net income (loss) per share:      
Basic $ 3.76 $ (1.09) $ 1.38 $ (1.59) $ (4.05)
Diluted $ 3.73 $ (1.09) $ 1.36 $ (1.59) $ (4.05)
Cash dividends declared per common share $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
     
Net cash provided by (used in) operating
activities $ 37,120 $ 174,201 $ (326,809) $ 1,340,677 $ 206,753 
Net cash (used in) provided by investing
activities (131,227) (362,298) (682,714) (626,802) 144,520 
Net cash (used in) provided by financing
activities (82,587) 74,943 255,228 192,045 (136,393)
December 31,
2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
(In thousands)
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,227,002 $ 1,352,741 $ 1,403,562 $ 2,268,534 $ 1,347,155 
Marketable securities 520,066 811,506 1,143,704 720,379 607,991 
Total assets 7,108,931 7,515,689 7,121,362 6,864,501 6,824,368 
Total long-term debt 279,231 471,697 466,791 393,540 188,388 
Total liabilities 1,588,003 2,418,922 1,908,959 1,765,804 1,606,019 
Total stockholders’ equity 5,520,928 5,096,767 5,212,403 5,098,697 5,218,349 
52
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read in conjunction with our
consolidated financial statements and the related notes thereto included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. In addition to
historical financial information, the following discussion and analysis contains forward-looking statements that involve risks,
uncertainties, and assumptions as described under the “Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements” that appears earlier in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our actual results could differ materially from those anticipated by these forward-looking statements
as a result of many factors, including those discussed under Item 1A. “Risk Factors,” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form
10-K. This discussion and analysis does not address certain items in respect of the year ended December 31, 2018 in reliance on
amendments to disclosure requirements adopted by the SEC in 2019. See Item 7. “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2019 for
comparative discussions of our results of operations and liquidity and capital resources for the years ended December 31, 2019 and
2018.
Executive Overview
We are a leading global provider of PV solar energy solutions. We design, manufacture, and sell PV solar modules with an
advanced thin film semiconductor technology and also develop and sell PV solar power systems that primarily use the modules we
manufacture. Additionally, in certain markets we provide O&M services to system owners. We have substantial, ongoing R&D
efforts focused on various technology innovations. We are the world’s largest thin film PV solar module manufacturer and one of
the world’s largest PV solar module manufacturers.
Certain of our financial results and other key operational developments for the year ended December 31, 2020 include the
following:
•Net sales for 2020 decreased by 11% to $2.7 billion compared to $3.1 billion in 2019. The decrease in net sales was
primarily attributable to the completion of substantially all construction activities at the Sun Streams, Phoebe, Sunshine
Valley, Rosamond, Seabrook, and Lake Hancock projects in 2019, the sale of the Beryl and Little Bear projects in 2019,
and lower construction activities at the GA Solar 4 project in the current period, partially offset by the sale of the Ishikawa,
American Kings, Miyagi, Anamizu, Tungabhadra, and Anantapur projects in 2020 and an increase in the volume of
modules sold to third parties.
•Gross profit increased 7.2 percentage points to 25.1% during 2020 from 17.9% during 2019 primarily due to higher gross
profit on third-party module sales and improved throughput of our manufacturing facilities from the successful ramp of
various Series 6 manufacturing lines, partially offset by the higher benefit from reductions to our product warranty liability
in the prior period and an impairment loss for certain module manufacturing equipment.
•During late 2020, we completed the capacity expansion of our manufacturing facility in Perrysburg, Ohio. As of
December 31, 2020 we had 6.3 GW of total installed Series 6 nameplate production capacity across all our facilities. We
produced 6.1 GW of solar modules during 2020, which represented a 59% increase in Series 6 module production from
2019. The increase in Series 6 production was primarily driven by the production capacity added in 2019 at our second
facility in Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam and our facility in Lake Township, Ohio as well as higher throughput at various
facilities. We expect to produce between 7.4 GW and 7.6 GW of Series 6 modules during 2021.
•In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, governmental authorities have recommended or ordered the limitation or
cessation of certain business or commercial activities in jurisdictions in which we operate, including the United States,
Malaysia, and Vietnam. At this time, such limitations have had limited effect on our Series 6 manufacturing facilities.
However, these orders are subject to continuous revision, and ourDC
DC
DC DC
53
Table of Contents
understanding of the applicability of these orders and any potential exemptions may change at any time. To enable the
continuity of our operations, we have implemented a wide range of safety measures intended to inhibit the spread of
COVID-19 at our manufacturing, administrative, and other sites and facilities.
•Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services
business, we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our
stockholders to pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with Clairvest for the
sale of our North American O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing
conditions, including the receipt of certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming
satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
•Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our U.S. project
development business, we have determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to pursue the sale of this business.
On January 24, 2021, we entered into an agreement with OMERS for the sale of our U.S. project development operations,
which comprises the business of developing, contracting for the construction of, and selling utility-scale PV solar power
systems. The transaction includes our approximately 10 GW utility-scale solar project pipeline, including the advanced-
stage Horizon, Madison, Ridgely, Rabbitbrush, and Oak Trail projects that are expected to commence construction in the
next two years; the 30 MW Barilla Solar project, which is operational; and certain other equipment. In addition,
OMERS has agreed to certain module purchase commitments. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a
number of closing conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approval from FERC, the expiration of the mandatory
waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the transaction by CFIUS, and other customary closing conditions.
Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
•In January 2020, we entered into a Memorandum of Understanding (“MOU”) to settle a class action lawsuit filed in 2012
in the United States District Court for the District of Arizona (hereafter “Arizona District Court”) against the Company
and certain of our current and former officers and directors (the “Class Action”). Pursuant to the MOU, we paid a total of
$350 million to settle the claims brought on behalf of all persons who purchased or otherwise acquired the Company’s
shares during a specified period, in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice of the complaint upon
court approval of the settlement. The settlement contained no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any
of the parties. The Arizona District Court entered an order in June 2020 that granted final approval of the settlement and
dismissed the Class Action with prejudice.
•In June 2020, we entered into an agreement in principle to settle certain claims filed in 2015 in the Arizona District Court
by putative stockholders that opted out of the Class Action (the “Opt-Out Action”). In July 2020, the parties executed a
definitive settlement agreement pursuant to which we agreed to pay a total of $19 million in exchange for mutual releases
and a dismissal with prejudice of the Opt-Out Action. The agreement contained no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or
responsibility by any of the parties. In July 2020, First Solar funded the settlement and the parties filed a joint stipulation
of dismissal. In September 2020, the Arizona District Court entered an order dismissing the case with prejudice.
Market Overview
The solar industry continues to be characterized by intense pricing competition, both at the module and system levels. In particular,
module average selling prices in many global markets have declined in recent years and are expected to continue to decline in the
future. Furthermore, the COVID-19 pandemic has adversely affected certain purchasers of modules and systems, which may result
in additional pressure on demand and average selling prices. In the aggregate, we believe manufacturers of solar cells and modules
have significant installed production capacity, relative to global demand, and the ability for additional capacity expansion.
Accordingly, we believe the solarAC
AC
54
Table of Contents
industry may from time to time experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand (i.e., where production
capacity exceeds global demand), and that such periods will also put pressure on pricing, which may be exacerbated by the
COVID-19 pandemic’s disruption of the global economy. Additionally, intense competition at the system level may result in an
environment in which pricing falls rapidly, thereby potentially increasing demand for solar energy solutions but constraining the
ability for project developers and diversified module manufacturers to sustain meaningful and consistent profitability. In light of
such market realities, we continue to focus on our strategies and points of differentiation, which include our advanced module
technology, our manufacturing process, our diversified capabilities, our financial viability, and the sustainability advantage of our
modules and systems.
Global solar markets continue to expand and develop, in part aided by demand elasticity resulting from declining average selling
prices, both at the module and system levels, which have promoted the widespread adoption of solar energy. As a result of such
market opportunities, we are expanding our manufacturing capacity and developing solar projects in certain markets as we execute
on our utility-scale project pipeline. See the tables under “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations – Systems Project Pipeline” for additional information about projects within our advanced-stage pipeline.
Although we expect a meaningful portion of our future consolidated net sales, operating income, and cash flows to be derived from
such projects, we expect third-party module sales to continue to have a more significant impact on our operating results as we
expand capacity and leverage the benefits of our Series 6 module technology.
Lower industry module and system pricing is expected to contribute to diversification in global electricity generation and further
demand for solar energy. Over time, however, declining average selling prices may adversely affect our results of operations to the
extent we have not already entered into contracts for future module or system sales. Our results of operations could also be
adversely affected if competitors reduce pricing to levels below their costs, bid aggressively low prices for module sale agreements
or PPAs, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of time. For certain of our
competitors, such actions may be enabled by their direct or indirect access to sovereign capital or other forms of state-owned
support. In certain markets in California and elsewhere, an oversupply imbalance at the grid level may reduce short-to-medium
term demand for new solar installations relative to prior years, lower PPA pricing, and lower margins on module and system sales
to such markets. However, we believe the effects of such imbalance can be mitigated by modern solar power plants and energy
storage solutions that offer a flexible operating profile, thereby promoting greater grid stability and enabling a higher penetration of
solar energy. We continue to address these uncertainties, in part, by executing on our module technology improvements, partnering
with grid operators and utility companies, and implementing certain other cost reduction initiatives.
We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules and developers of solar power projects. Solar
module manufacturers compete with one another on price and on several module value attributes, including wattage (through a
larger form factor or an improved conversion efficiency), energy yield, and reliability, and developers of systems compete on
various factors such as net present value, return on equity, and LCOE. Many crystalline silicon cell and wafer manufacturers have
transitioned from lower efficiency BSF multi-crystalline cells (the legacy technology against which we have generally competed) to
higher efficiency PERC mono-crystalline cells at competitive cost structures. Additionally, while conventional solar modules,
including the solar modules we produce, are monofacial, meaning their ability to produce energy is a function of direct and diffuse
irradiance on their front side, certain manufacturers of mono-crystalline PERC modules offer bifacial modules that also capture
diffuse irradiance on the back side of a module. The cost effective manufacture of bifacial PERC modules has been enabled, in part,
by the expansion of inexpensive crystal growth and diamond wire saw capacity in China. Bifaciality compromises nameplate
efficiency, but by converting both front and rear side irradiance, such technology may improve the overall energy production of a
module relative to nameplate efficiency when applied in certain applications, which, after considering the incremental BoS and
other costs, could potentially lower the overall LCOE of a system when compared to systems using conventional solar modules,
including the modules we produce.
We believe we are among the lowest cost module manufacturers in the solar industry on a module cost per watt basis, based on
publicly available information. This cost competitiveness allows us to compete favorably in markets
55
Table of Contents
where pricing for modules and systems is highly competitive. Our cost competitiveness is based in large part on our advanced thin-
film semiconductor technology, module wattage (or conversion efficiency), proprietary manufacturing process (which enables us to
produce a CdTe module in a matter of hours using a continuous and highly automated industrial manufacturing process, as opposed
to a batch process), and our focus on operational excellence. In addition, our CdTe modules use approximately 1-2% of the amount
of semiconductor material that is used to manufacture conventional crystalline silicon solar modules. The cost of polysilicon is a
significant driver of the manufacturing cost of crystalline silicon solar modules, and the timing and rate of change in the cost of
silicon feedstock and polysilicon could lead to changes in solar module pricing levels. In recent years, polysilicon consumption per
cell has been reduced through various initiatives, such as the adoption of diamond wire saw technology, which have contributed to
declines in our relative manufacturing cost competitiveness over conventional crystalline silicon module manufacturers.
In terms of energy yield, in many climates our CdTe solar modules provide an energy production advantage over crystalline silicon
solar modules of equivalent efficiency rating. For example, our CdTe solar modules provide a superior temperature coefficient,
which results in stronger system performance in typical high insolation climates as the majority of a system’s generation, on
average, occurs when module temperatures are well above 25°C (standard test conditions). In addition, our CdTe solar modules
provide a superior spectral response in humid environments where atmospheric moisture alters the solar spectrum relative to
laboratory standards. Our CdTe solar modules also provide a better partial shading response than conventional crystalline silicon
solar modules, which may experience significantly lower energy generation than CdTe solar modules when partial shading occurs.
As a result of these and other factors, our PV solar modules typically produce more annual energy in real world field conditions
than conventional modules with the same nameplate capacity. Furthermore, our thin-film CdTe semiconductor technology is
immune to cell cracking and its resulting power output loss, a common failure often observed in crystalline silicon modules caused
by poor manufacturing, handling, weather, or other conditions.
While our modules and systems are generally competitive in cost, reliability, and performance attributes, there can be no guarantee
such competitiveness will continue to exist in the future to the same extent or at all. Any declines in the competitiveness of our
products could result in further declines in the average selling prices of our modules and systems and additional margin
compression. We continue to focus on enhancing the competitiveness of our solar modules and systems by accelerating progress
along our module technology and cost reduction roadmaps.
Certain Trends and Uncertainties
We believe that our business, financial condition, and results of operations may be favorably or unfavorably impacted by the
following trends and uncertainties. See Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for discussions
of other risks that may affect us.
Our long-term strategic plans are focused on our goal to create long-term shareholder value through a balance of growth,
profitability, and liquidity. In executing such plans, we are focusing on providing utility-scale PV solar energy solutions in key
geographic markets that we believe have a compelling need for mass-scale PV solar electricity, including markets throughout the
United States, Japan, Europe, India, and certain other strategic markets. While these markets are expected to exhibit strong long-
term demand for solar energy, the economic disruption caused by the COVID-19 pandemic has adversely affected near-term
demand for electricity at the grid level. As a result, such temporary decline in load may adversely affect demand for specific forms
of generation, such as our PV solar energy solutions, depending on the severity and duration of the economic disruption. Given
these market dynamics, we continue to focus on opportunities in which our PV solar energy solutions compete directly with
traditional forms of energy generation on an LCOE or similar basis, or complement such generation offerings. These opportunities
include the retirement and replacement of aging fossil fuel-based generation resources with utility-scale PV solar energy solutions.
For example, cumulative global retirements of coal generation plants are expected to approximate 900 GW by 2040, representing
a significant increase in the potential market for solar energy.DC
56
Table of Contents
This focus on our core module and utility-scale offerings exists within a current market environment that includes rooftop and
distributed generation solar, particularly in the United States. While it is unclear how rooftop and distributed generation solar might
impact our core utility-scale based offerings over the next several years, we believe that utility-scale solar will continue to be a
compelling offering for companies with technology and cost leadership and will continue to represent an increasing portion of the
overall electricity generation mix. However, our module offerings in certain international markets may be driven, in part, by future
demand for rooftop and distributed generation solar solutions.
Our ability to provide utility-scale offerings on economically attractive terms depends, in part, on market factors outside our
control, such as the availability of debt and/or equity financing (including, in the United States, tax equity financing), interest rate
fluctuations, domestic or international trade policies, and government support programs. Adverse changes in these factors could
increase the cost of utility-scale systems, which could reduce demand for such systems and limit the number of potential buyers.
For example, we generally sell projects we have developed within our systems business to purchasers that depend on financing to
fund the initial capital expenditures required to develop, build, and/or purchase a system. Although governments and central banks
around the world have implemented significant measures to support capital markets, the economic disruption caused by the
COVID-19 pandemic may result in a long-term tightening of the supply of capital in global financial markets (including, in the
United States, a reduction in total tax equity availability). A reduction in the supply of project debt or equity financing (including,
in the United States, tax equity financing) caused by the COVID-19 pandemic could make it difficult for our customers to secure
the financing necessary to develop, build, purchase, or install systems. Similarly, purchasers of modules may cease or significantly
reduce business operations, cease or delay module procurement, encounter an inability to obtain financing, including due to a
reduction in the supply of project debt financing or equity investments (including, in the United States, tax equity financing),
conserve capital resources, or take other actions in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, which may reduce demand and average
selling prices for our modules.
In certain markets, demand for our utility-scale offerings may be affected by specific regulations or policies of governmental bodies
or utility regulators. For example, in June 2020, the Japanese legislature enacted an amendment to the Electricity Business Law
Enforcement Order for the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry of Japan which, among other things, is expected to invalidate
the feed-in-tariff certificates for projects that fail to achieve construction plan acceptance, submit an interconnection application,
and/or achieve commercial operation within a set period of time following dates specified in their respective certificates. The
amendment, which becomes effective in April 2022, applies to all projects regardless of generation type and is intended to release
grid capacity reserved for delayed projects to enable other newly developed projects to utilize such capacity at a lower cost of
electricity to consumers. The deadline by which a project must achieve construction plan acceptance, submit an interconnection
application, and/or achieve commercial operation varies by project, but is no earlier than March 2023. Any deadlines that precede
the expected construction plan acceptance and/or commercial operation dates of our various projects in Japan could adversely affect
the value of such projects and our ability to secure any related project financing.
We intend to focus our resources in those markets and energy applications in which solar power can be a least-cost, best-fit energy
solution, particularly in regions with significant current or projected electricity demand, relatively high existing electricity prices,
strong demand for renewable energy generation, and high solar resources. As a result, we closely evaluate and monitor the
appropriate level of resources required to support such markets and their associated sales opportunities. We have dedicated, and
intend to continue to dedicate, significant capital and human resources to reduce the total installed cost of PV solar energy and to
ensure that our solutions integrate well into the overall electricity ecosystem of each specific market.
Creating or maintaining a market position in certain strategically targeted markets and energy applications also requires us to adapt
to new and changing market conditions, including changes in the market set of potential buyers of our modules and solar projects.
Market environments with few potential project buyers and a higher cost of capital would generally exert downward pressure on
the potential revenue from such offerings, whereas, conversely, market environments with many potential project buyers and a
lower cost of capital would likely have a favorable
57
Table of Contents
impact on the potential revenue from such offerings. For example, the emergence of utility-owned generation has increased the
number of potential project buyers as such utility customers benefit from a potentially low cost of capital available through rate-
based utility investments. Given their long-term ownership profile, utility-owned generation customers typically seek to partner
with diversified and stable companies that can provide a broad spectrum of utility-scale generation solutions, including reliable PV
solar technology, thereby mitigating their long-term ownership risks.
On occasion, we may elect to develop partially contracted or uncontracted systems for which there is a partial or no PPA with an
off-taker, such as a utility, but rather an intent to sell some portion of the electricity produced by the system on an open contract
basis until the system is sold. Expected revenue from projects without a PPA for the full off-take of the system is subject to greater
variability and uncertainty based on market factors and is typically lower than projects with a PPA for the full off-take of the
system. Furthermore, all system pricing is affected by the pricing of energy to be sold on an open contract basis following the
termination of the PPA (i.e., merchant pricing curves), and changes in market assumptions regarding future open contract sales,
including potential changes in energy demand caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, may also result in significant variability and
uncertainty in the value of our systems projects.
We continually evaluate forecasted global demand, competition, and our addressable market and seek to effectively balance
manufacturing capacity with market demand and the nature and extent of our competition. We continue to increase the nameplate
production capacity of our existing manufacturing facilities by improving our production throughput, increasing module wattage
(or conversion efficiency), and improving manufacturing yield losses. As we evaluate the potential for future capacity expansion,
we may also seek to further diversify our manufacturing presence, although we have made no decisions to do so at this time. Such
additional capacity, and any other potential investments to add or otherwise modify our existing manufacturing capacity in response
to market demand and competition, may require significant internal and possibly external sources of capital, and may be subject to
certain risks and uncertainties described in Item 1A. “Risk Factors,” including those described under the headings “Our future
success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand, convert existing production
facilities to support new product lines, decrease our cost per watt, and, when necessary, continue to build new manufacturing plants
over time in response to market demand, all of which are subject to risks and uncertainties” and “If any future production lines are
not built in line with committed schedules, it may adversely affect our future growth plans. If any future production lines do not
achieve operating metrics similar to our existing production lines, our solar modules could perform below expectations and cause
us to lose customers.”
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, governmental authorities have recommended or ordered the limitation or cessation of
certain business or commercial activities in jurisdictions in which we do business or have operations. While some of these orders
permit the continuation of essential business operations, or permit the performance of minimum business activities, these orders are
subject to continuous revision or may be revoked or superseded, or our understanding of the applicability of these orders and
exemptions may change at any time. In addition, due to contraction of the virus, or concerns about becoming ill from the virus, we
may experience reductions in the availability of our operational workforce, such as our manufacturing personnel. As a result, we
may at any time be ordered by governmental authorities, or we may determine, based on our understanding of the recommendations
or orders of governmental authorities or the availability of our personnel, that we have to curtail or cease business operations or
activities altogether, including manufacturing, fulfillment, project development, construction, operating or maintenance operations,
or research and development activities. At this time, such limitations have had a limited effect on our manufacturing facilities and
certain project construction activities, and we have implemented a wide range of safety measures intended to enable the continuity
of our operations and inhibit the spread of COVID-19 at our manufacturing, administrative, and other sites and facilities, including
those in the United States, Malaysia, and Vietnam.
To address the near-term business disruption caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, many governments have proposed policies or
support programs intended to stimulate their respective economies. Such support programs may include additional incentives for
renewable energy projects, including PV solar power systems, over several years. While we
58
Table of Contents
compete in many markets that do not require solar-specific government subsidies or support programs, our net sales and profits
remain subject to variability based on the availability and size of government subsidies and economic incentives.
Systems Project Pipeline
The following tables summarize, as of February 25, 2021, our approximately 1.3 GW advanced-stage project pipeline. The actual
volume of modules installed in our projects will be greater than the project size in MW as module volumes required for a project
are based upon MW, which will be greater than the MW size pursuant to a DC-AC ratio typically ranging from 1.1 to 1.4. Such
ratio varies across different projects due to many factors, including PPA pricing and the location, design, and costs of the system.
Projects are typically removed from our advanced-stage project pipeline tables below once we substantially complete construction
of the project and after substantially all of the associated project revenue is recognized. A project, or a portion of a project, may
also be removed from the tables below in the event the project is not able to be sold due to the changing economics of the project or
other factors or we decide to temporarily own and operate the project based on strategic opportunities or market factors.
Projects under Sales Agreements
The following table includes uncompleted sold projects and projects under contracts subject to conditions precedent:
Project/LocationProject
Size in
MW PPA Contracted Partner CustomerExpected Year
Revenue
Recognition Will
Be Completed% of Revenue
Recognized as of
December 31,
2020
Horizon, T exas 200 (2) (4) (4) (4)
Madison, Ohio (1) 196 Verizon Communications (4) (4) (4)
Ridgely , Tennessee 177 Tennessee V alley Authority (4) (4) (4)
Sun Streams 2, Arizona 150 Microsoft Corporation (5) 2021 (5) —%
Rabbitbrush, California 100 (3) (4) (4) (4)
Oak T rail, North Carolina 100 Verizon Communications (4) (4) (4)
Total 923 
Projects with Confirmed Offtake Agreements Not under Sales Agreements
Project/LocationProject
Size in
MW PPA Contracted Partner Primary Permits ObtainedExpected or
Actual
Substantial
Completion Year% Complete as of
December 31,
2020
Luz del Norte, Chile 141 (6) Yes 2016 100%
Sun Streams PVS, Arizona 65 (7) Yes 2022 8%
Kyoto, Japan 38 Chubu Electric Power
CompanyYes 2022 33%
Japan (multiple locations) 160 (8) Yes 2021/2023 22%
Total 404 
——————————
(1) Previously known as the Big Plain Solar project
(2) 150 MW  of the plant’ s capacity is contracted with Dow Pipeline Company; remaining capacity to be sold on an open contract basis
(3) Central Coast Community Ener gy – 60 MW  and Silicon V alley Clean Ener gy – 40 MWAC
AC
DC AC
AC
AC
AC
AC AC
59
Table of Contents
(4) Project includ ed in the sale of our U.S. project development business. Refer to Item 1. “Business – Offerings and Capabilities” for
further information.
(5) Contracted but not specified. Project sale completed in February 2021.
(6) Approximately 70 MW  of the plant’ s capacity is contracted under various PPAs; remaining capacity to be sold on an open contract
basis
(7) The project’ s PPA was terminated in February 2021. W e continue to market the project for sale.
(8) 11 MW  has been contracted with Tokyo Electric Power Company . The remaining 149 MW  has secured feed-in-tarif f rights, and the
related PP As for such projects will be executed at a later date.
Results of Operations
The following table sets forth our consolidated statements of operations as a percentage of net sales for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
Net sales 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
Cost of sales 74.9 % 82.1 % 82.5 %
Gross profit 25.1 % 17.9 % 17.5 %
Selling, general and administrative 8.2 % 6.7 % 7.9 %
Research and development 3.5 % 3.2 % 3.8 %
Production start-up 1.5 % 1.5 % 4.0 %
Litigation loss 0.2 % 11.9 % — %
Operating income (loss) 11.7 % (5.3) % 1.8 %
Foreign currency (loss) income, net (0.2) % 0.1 % — %
Interest income 0.6 % 1.6 % 2.7 %
Interest expense, net (0.9) % (0.9) % (1.2) %
Other (expense) income, net (0.4) % 0.6 % 1.8 %
Income tax benefit (expense) 4.0 % 0.2 % (0.2) %
Equity in earnings, net of tax (0.1) % — % 1.5 %
Net income (loss) 14.7 % (3.8) % 6.4 %
Segment Overview
We operate our business in two segments. Our modules segment involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules
to third parties, and our systems segment includes the development, construction contracting and management, operation,
maintenance, and sale of PV solar power systems, including any modules installed in such systems and any revenue from energy
generated by such systems.
Net sales
Modules Business
We generally price and sell our solar modules on a per watt basis. During 2020, Longroad Energy, NextEra Energy, and Softbank
each accounted for more than 10% of our modules business net sales, and the majority of our solar modules were sold to integrators
and operators of systems in the United States and France. Substantially all of our modules business net sales during 2020 were
denominated in U.S. dollars and Euro. We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of
the modules to the customer, which typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying contracts.
The revenue recognitionAC
AC AC
60
Table of Contents
policies for module sales are further described in Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” to our consolidated
financial statements.
Systems Business
During 2020, Goldman Sachs Renewable Power, SMFL Mirai Partners, and Mitsui & Co. each accounted for more than 10% of our
systems business net sales, and the majority of our systems business net sales were in the United States and Japan. Substantially all
of our systems business net sales during 2020 were denominated in U.S. dollars and Japanese yen. We recognize revenue for sales
of solar power systems using cost based input methods, which result in revenue being recognized as work is performed based on
the relationship between actual costs incurred compared to the total estimated costs for a given contract. We may also recognize
revenue for the sale of a development project, which excludes EPC services, or for the sale of a completed system when we enter
into the associated sales contract with the customer. The revenue recognition policies for our systems business are further described
in Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” to our consolidated financial statements.
The following table shows net sales by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Modules $ 1,736,060 $ 1,460,116 $ 502,001 $ 275,944 19 %$ 958,115 191 %
Systems 975,272 1,603,001 1,742,043 (627,729) (39)% (139,042) (8)%
Net sales $ 2,711,332 $ 3,063,117 $ 2,244,044 $ (351,785) (11)%$ 819,073 36 %
Net sales from our modules segment increased by $275.9 million in 2020 primarily due to a 21% increase in the volume of watts
sold, partially offset by a 2% decrease in the average selling price per watt. Net sales from our systems segment decreased by
$627.7 million in 2020 primarily due to the completion of substantially all construction activities at the Sun Streams, Phoebe,
Sunshine Valley, Rosamond, Seabrook, and Lake Hancock projects in 2019, the sale of the Beryl and Little Bear projects in 2019,
and lower construction activities at the GA Solar 4 project in the current period, partially offset by the sale of the Ishikawa,
American Kings, Miyagi, Anamizu, Tungabhadra, and Anantapur projects in 2020.
Cost of sales
Modules Business
Our modules business cost of sales includes the cost of raw materials and components for manufacturing solar modules, such as
glass, transparent conductive coatings, CdTe and other thin film semiconductors, laminate materials, connector assemblies, edge
seal materials, and frames. In addition, our cost of sales includes direct labor for the manufacturing of solar modules and
manufacturing overhead, such as engineering, equipment maintenance, quality and production control, and information technology.
Our cost of sales also includes depreciation of manufacturing plant and equipment, facility-related expenses, environmental health
and safety costs, and costs associated with shipping, warranties, and solar module collection and recycling (excluding accretion).
Systems Business
For our systems business, project-related costs include development costs (legal, consulting, transmission upgrade, interconnection,
permitting, and other similar costs), EPC costs (consisting primarily of solar modules, inverters, electrical and mounting hardware,
project management and engineering, and construction labor), and site specific costs.
61
Table of Contents
The following table shows cost of sales by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Modules $ 1,306,929 $ 1,170,037 $ 552,468 $ 136,892 12 %$ 617,569 112 %
Systems 723,730 1,343,868 1,299,399 (620,138) (46)% 44,469 3 %
Cost of sales $ 2,030,659 $ 2,513,905 $ 1,851,867 $ (483,246) (19)%$ 662,038 36 %
% of net sales 74.9 % 82.1 % 82.5 %  
Cost of sales decreased $483.2 million, or 19%, and decreased 7.2 percentage points as a percent of net sales when comparing 2020
with 2019. The decrease in cost of sales was driven by a $620.1 million decrease in our systems segment cost of sales primarily due
to the lower volume of projects under construction during the period. Such decrease in our systems segment cost of sales was
partially offset by a $136.9 million increase in our modules segment cost of sales primarily as a result of the following:
•higher costs of $247.4 million from an increase in the volume of modules sold;
•an impairment loss of $17.4 million for certain module manufacturing equipment, including framing and assembly tools,
which were no longer compatible with our long-term module technology roadmap;
•manufacturing related charges of $15.1 million associated with the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic; and
•a reduction to our product warranty liability of $80.0 million in 2019 due to revised module return rates; partially offset by
•a reduction to our product warranty liability of $19.7 million in 2020 due to lower-than-expected settlements for our older
series of module technology and revisions to projected settlements;
•lower under-utilization and certain other charges associated with the initial ramp of certain Series 6 manufacturing lines,
which decreased cost of sales by $61.7 million compared to 2019;
•a reduction in our module collection and recycling liability of $18.9 million primarily due to changes to the estimated
timing of cash flows associated with capital, labor, and maintenance costs and updates to certain valuation assumptions;
and
•continued module cost reductions, which decreased cost of sales by $157.2 million.
Gross profit
Gross profit may be affected by numerous factors, including the selling prices of our modules and systems, our manufacturing
costs, project development costs, BoS costs, the capacity utilization of our manufacturing facilities, and foreign exchange rates.
Gross profit may also be affected by the mix of net sales from our modules and systems businesses.
The following table shows gross profit for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Gross profit $ 680,673 $ 549,212 $ 392,177 $ 131,461 24 %$ 157,035 40 %
% of net sales 25.1 % 17.9 % 17.5 %   
Gross profit increased 7.2 percentage points to 25.1% during 2020 from 17.9% during 2019 primarily due to higher gross profit on
third-party module sales and improved throughput of our manufacturing facilities from the successful ramp of various Series 6
manufacturing lines, partially offset by the lower benefit from reductions to our product warranty liability and the impairment loss
for certain module manufacturing equipment described above.
62
Table of Contents
Selling, general and administrative
Selling, general and administrative expense consists primarily of salaries and other personnel-related costs, professional fees,
insurance costs, and other business development and selling expenses.
The following table shows selling, general and administrative expense for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Selling, general and
administrative $ 222,918 $ 205,471 $ 176,857 $ 17,447 8 %$ 28,614 16 %
% of net sales 8.2 % 6.7 % 7.9 %   
Selling, general and administrative expense in 2020 increased compared to 2019 primarily due to higher charges for impairments of
certain project assets and an increase in professional fees, partially offset by lower project development and travel expenses.
Research and development
Research and development expense consists primarily of salaries and other personnel-related costs; the cost of products, materials,
and outside services used in our R&D activities; and depreciation and amortization expense associated with R&D specific facilities
and equipment. We maintain a number of programs and activities to improve our technology and processes in order to enhance the
performance and reduce the costs of our solar modules.
The following table shows research and development expense for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Research and development $ 93,738 $ 96,611 $ 84,472 $ (2,873) (3)%$ 12,139 14 %
% of net sales 3.5 % 3.2 % 3.8 %   
Research and development expense in 2020 decreased compared to 2019 primarily as a result of lower employee compensation
expense due to reductions in R&D headcount for our systems business, partially offset by increased material and module testing
costs.
Production start-up
Production start-up expense consists primarily of employee compensation and other costs associated with operating a production
line before it is qualified for full production, including the cost of raw materials for solar modules run through the production line
during the qualification phase and applicable facility related costs. Costs related to equipment upgrades and implementation of
manufacturing process improvements are also included in production start-up expense as well as costs related to the selection of a
new site, related legal and regulatory costs, and costs to maintain our plant replication program to the extent we cannot capitalize
these expenditures. In general, we expect production start-up expense per production line to be higher when we build an entirely
new manufacturing facility compared with the addition or replacement of production lines at an existing manufacturing facility,
primarily due to the additional infrastructure investment required when building an entirely new facility.
63
Table of Contents
The following table shows production start-up expense for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Production start-up $ 40,528 $ 45,915 $ 90,735 $ (5,387) (12)%$ (44,820) (49)%
% of net sales 1.5 % 1.5 % 4.0 %   
During 2020, we incurred production start-up expense for the transition to Series 6 module manufacturing at our second facility in
Kulim, Malaysia and the capacity expansion of our manufacturing facility in Perrysburg, Ohio. During 2019, we incurred
production start-up expense at our new facility in Lake Township, Ohio and our second facility in Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam,
which commenced commercial production in early 2019.
Litigation loss
The following table shows litigation loss for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Litigation loss $ 6,000 $ 363,000 $ — $ (357,000) (98)%$ 363,000 100 %
% of net sales 0.2 % 11.9 % — %   
In January 2020, we entered into an MOU to settle a class action lawsuit filed in 2012 in the Arizona District Court against the
Company and certain of our current and former officers and directors. Pursuant to the MOU, we agreed to pay a total of $350
million to settle the claims brought on behalf of all persons who purchased or otherwise acquired the Company’s shares during a
specified period, in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice of the complaint upon court approval of the
settlement. The settlement contains no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the parties. As a result of the
entry into the MOU, we accrued a loss for the above-referenced settlement in 2019, and paid the $350 million settlement in
January 2020. In June 2020, the Arizona District Court entered an order that granted final approval of the settlement and dismissed
the Class Action with prejudice.
In June 2020, we entered into an agreement in principle to settle the claims in the Opt-Out Action filed in 2015 in the Arizona
District Court by putative stockholders that opted out of the Class Action. In July 2020, the parties executed a definitive settlement
agreement pursuant to which we agreed to pay a total of $19 million in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice
of the Opt-Out Action. The agreement contains no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the parties. In
July 2020, First Solar funded the settlement and the parties filed a joint stipulation of dismissal. In September 2020, the Arizona
District Court entered an order dismissing the case with prejudice. As of December 31, 2019, we had accrued $13 million of
estimated losses for this action. As a result of the settlement, we accrued an incremental $6 million litigation loss during 2020.
See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for additional information on these
matters.
Foreign currency (loss) income, net
Foreign currency (loss) income, net consists of the net effect of gains and losses resulting from holding assets and liabilities and
conducting transactions denominated in currencies other than our subsidiaries’ functional currencies.
64
Table of Contents
The following table shows foreign currency (loss) income, net for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Foreign currency (loss) income,
net $ (4,890)$ 2,291 $ (570)$ (7,181) 313 %$ 2,861 502 %
Foreign currency loss increased in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to higher costs associated with hedging activities related
to our subsidiaries in Japan and Europe and differences between our economic hedge positions and the underlying exposures.
Interest income
Interest income is earned on our cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, restricted cash, and restricted marketable securities.
Interest income also includes interest earned from notes receivable and late customer payments.
The following table shows interest income for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Interest income $ 16,559 $ 48,886 $ 59,788 $ (32,327) (66)%$ (10,902) (18)%
Interest income during 2020 decreased compared to 2019 primarily due to lower interest rates on cash and cash equivalents and
lower average balances and interest rates associated with time deposits and marketable securities.
Interest expense, net
Interest expense, net is primarily comprised of interest incurred on long-term debt, settlements of interest rate swap contracts, and
changes in the fair value of interest rate swap contracts that do not qualify for hedge accounting in accordance with Accounting
Standards Codification (“ASC”) 815. We may capitalize interest expense to our project assets or property, plant and equipment
when such costs qualify for interest capitalization, which reduces the amount of net interest expense reported in any given period.
The following table shows interest expense, net for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Interest expense, net $ (24,036)$ (27,066)$ (25,921)$ 3,030 (11)%$ (1,145) 4 %
Interest expense, net in 2020 decreased compared to 2019 primarily due to lower interest expense associated with project debt,
partially offset by higher amortization of debt discounts and issuance costs and a decrease in capitalized interest.
Other (expense) income, net
Other (expense) income, net is primarily comprised of miscellaneous items and realized gains and losses on the sale of marketable
securities and restricted marketable securities.
65
Table of Contents
The following table shows other (expense) income, net for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Other (expense) income, net $ (11,932)$ 17,545 $ 39,737 $ (29,477) (168)%$ (22,192) (56)%
Other expense, net increased in 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to lower realized gains from sales of restricted marketable
securities and expected credit losses associated with certain notes receivable, partially offset by prior period charges associated with
certain letter of credit arrangements and the impairment of a strategic investment. See Note 7. “Consolidated Balance Sheet
Details” to our consolidated financial statements for further information about the allowance for credit losses for our notes
receivable.
Income tax benefit (expense)
Income tax expense or benefit, deferred tax assets and liabilities, and liabilities for unrecognized tax benefits reflect our best
estimate of current and future taxes to be paid. We are subject to income taxes in both the United States and numerous foreign
jurisdictions in which we operate, principally Japan, Malaysia, and Vietnam. Significant judgments and estimates are required to
determine our consolidated income tax expense. The statutory federal corporate income tax rate in the United States is 21%, and the
tax rates in Japan, Malaysia, and Vietnam are 30.6%, 24%, and 20%, respectively. In Malaysia, we have been granted a long-term
tax holiday, scheduled to expire in 2027, pursuant to which substantially all of our income earned in Malaysia is exempt from
income tax, conditional upon our continued compliance with certain employment and investment thresholds. In Vietnam, we have
been granted a tax incentive, scheduled to expire at the end of 2025, pursuant to which income earned in Vietnam is subject to
reduced tax rates.
The following table shows income tax benefit (expense) for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Income tax benefit (expense) $ 107,294 $ 5,480 $ (3,441) $ 101,814 1,858 %$ 8,921 (259)%
Effective tax rate (36.6)% 4.6 % 3.0 %   
Our tax rate is affected by recurring items, such as tax rates in foreign jurisdictions and the relative amounts of income we earn in
those jurisdictions. The rate is also affected by discrete items that may occur in any given period, but are not consistent from period
to period. Income tax benefit increased by $101.8 million during 2020 compared to 2019 primarily due to a tax benefit from the
effect of tax law changes associated with the CARES Act, the reversal of uncertain tax positions due to the expiration of the statute
of limitations, and the release of the valuation allowance associated with our Vietnamese subsidiary due to its current year
operating income, partially offset by higher pretax income.
Equity in earnings, net of tax
Equity in earnings, net of tax represents our proportionate share of the earnings or losses from equity method investments as well as
any gains or losses on the sale or disposal of such investments.
The following table shows equity in earnings, net of tax for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2020 2019 2018 2020 over 2019 2019 over 2018
Equity in earnings, net of tax $ (2,129)$ (284)$ 34,620 $ (1,845) 650 %$ (34,904) (101)%
Equity in earnings, net of tax in 2020 was consistent with equity in earnings, net of tax in 2019.
66
Table of Contents
Liquidity and Capital Resources
As of December 31, 2020, we believe that our cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, cash flows from operating activities,
contracts with customers for the future sale of solar modules, and advanced-stage project pipeline will be sufficient to meet our
working capital, capital expenditure, and systems project investment needs for at least the next 12 months. As needed, we also
believe we will have adequate access to the capital markets. In addition, we have availability under our Revolving Credit Facility,
under which we have made no borrowings as of December 31, 2020. We monitor our working capital to ensure we have adequate
liquidity, both domestically and internationally.
We intend to maintain appropriate debt levels based upon cash flow expectations, our overall cost of capital, and expected cash
requirements for operations, such as systems project development activities in certain international regions. However, our ability to
raise capital on terms commercially acceptable to us could be constrained if there is insufficient lender or investor interest due to
company-specific, industry-wide, or broader market concerns, such as a tightening of the supply of capital due to the COVID-19
pandemic and related containment measures. Any incremental debt financings could result in increased debt service expenses
and/or restrictive covenants, which could limit our ability to pursue our strategic plans.
As of December 31, 2020, we had $1.7 billion in cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities compared to $2.2 billion as of
December 31, 2019. The decrease in cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities was primarily driven by purchases of
property, plant and equipment; the $350 million settlement payment associated with our prior class action lawsuit; the timing of
cash receipts from certain third-party module sales, for which proceeds were received in late 2019 prior to the step down in the U.S.
investment tax credit from 30% to 26%; and other operating expenditures; partially offset by cash proceeds from the sale and
construction of certain systems projects. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, $1.1 billion and $0.9 billion, respectively, of our cash,
cash equivalents, and marketable securities was held by our foreign subsidiaries and was primarily based in U.S. dollar, Japanese
yen, and Indian rupee denominated holdings.
We utilize a variety of tax planning and financing strategies in an effort to ensure that our worldwide cash is available in the
locations in which it is needed. If certain international funds were needed for our operations in the United States, we may be
required to accrue and pay certain U.S. and foreign taxes to repatriate such funds. We maintain the intent and ability to permanently
reinvest our accumulated earnings outside the United States, with the exception of our subsidiaries in Canada and Germany. In
addition, changes to foreign government banking regulations may restrict our ability to move funds among various jurisdictions
under certain circumstances, which could negatively impact our access to capital, resulting in an adverse effect on our liquidity and
capital resources.
We continually evaluate forecasted global demand and seek to balance our manufacturing capacity with such demand. We continue
to increase the nameplate production capacity of our existing manufacturing facilities by improving our production throughput,
increasing module wattage (or conversion efficiency), and improving manufacturing yield losses. During 2021, we expect to spend
$425 million to $475 million for capital expenditures, including upgrades to machinery and equipment that we believe will further
increase our module wattage and expand capacity and throughput at our manufacturing facilities.
We also expect to commit significant working capital to purchase various raw materials used in our module manufacturing process.
Our failure to obtain raw materials and components that meet our quality, quantity, and cost requirements in a timely manner could
interrupt or impair our ability to manufacture our solar modules or increase our manufacturing costs. Accordingly, we may enter
into long-term supply agreements to mitigate potential risks related to the procurement of key raw materials and components, and
such agreements may be noncancelable or cancelable with a significant penalty. For example, we have entered into long-term
supply agreements for the purchase of certain specified minimum volumes of substrate glass and cover glass for our PV solar
modules. Our remaining purchases under these supply agreements are expected to be approximately $1.8 billion of substrate glass
and $410 million of cover glass. We have the right to terminate these agreements upon payment of specified
67
Table of Contents
termination penalties (which, in aggregate, are up to $390 million as of December 31, 2020 and decline over the remaining supply
periods).
Our systems business is expected to continue to have significant liquidity requirements in the future. From time to time, we enter
into commercial commitments in the form of letters of credit, bank guarantees, and surety bonds to provide financial and
performance assurance to third parties, the majority of which support our systems projects. Our Revolving Credit Facility provides
us with a sub-limit of $400.0 million to issue letters of credit, subject to certain additional limits depending on the currencies of
such letters of credit. The net amount of our project assets and related portions of deferred revenue and long-term debt, which
approximates our net capital investment in the development and construction of systems projects, was $260.6 million as of
December 31, 2020. Solar power project development cycles, which span the time between the identification of a site location and
the commercial operation of a system, vary substantially and can take many years to mature. As a result of these long project cycles
and strategic decisions to finance the development of certain projects using our working capital, we may need to make significant
up-front investments of resources in advance of the receipt of any cash from the sale of such projects. Delays in construction or in
completing the sale of our systems projects that we are self-financing may also impact our liquidity. In certain circumstances, we
may need to finance construction costs exclusively using working capital, if project financing becomes unavailable due to market-
wide, regional, or other concerns.
From time to time, we may develop projects in certain markets around the world where we may hold all or a significant portion of
the equity in a project for several years. Given the duration of these investments and the currency risk relative to the U.S. dollar in
some of these markets, we continue to explore local financing alternatives. Should these financing alternatives be unavailable or too
cost prohibitive, we could be exposed to significant currency risk and our liquidity could be adversely impacted.
Additionally, we may elect to retain an ownership interest in certain systems projects after they become operational if we determine
it would be of economic and strategic benefit to do so. If, for example, we cannot sell a system at economics that are attractive to us
or potential customers are unwilling to assume the risks and rewards typical of system ownership, we may instead elect to
temporarily own and operate such system until we can sell it on economically attractive terms. The decision to retain ownership of
a system impacts our liquidity depending upon the size and cost of the project. As of December 31, 2020, we had $243.4 million of
net PV solar power systems that had been placed in service, primarily in international markets. We have elected, and may in the
future elect, to enter into temporary or long-term project financing to reduce the impact on our liquidity and working capital with
regard to such systems.
From time to time, we may be party to legal matters and claims against us. In January 2020, we entered into an MOU to settle a
class action lawsuit filed in the Arizona District Court. Pursuant to the MOU, among other things, we agreed to pay a total of $350
million to settle the claims in the lawsuit in exchange for mutual releases and dismissal with prejudice of the complaint upon court
approval of the settlement. In February 2020, we subsequently entered into a Stipulation and Agreement of Settlement (the
“Settlement Agreement”) with certain named plaintiffs on terms and conditions that were consistent with the MOU. Pursuant to the
Settlement Agreement, among other things, (i) we contributed $350 million in cash to a settlement fund that will be used to pay all
settlement fees and expenses, attorneys’ fees and expenses, and cash payments to members of the settlement class and (ii) the
settlement class has agreed to release us, the other defendants named in the class action, and certain of their respective related
parties from any and all claims concerning, based on, arising out of, or in connection with the class action. The Settlement
Agreement contained no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the parties. On June 30, 2020, the Arizona
District Court entered an order granting final approval of the settlement and dismissed the Class Action with prejudice.
68
Table of Contents
Cash Flows
The following table summarizes key cash flow activity for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities $ 37,120 $ 174,201 $ (326,809)
Net cash used in investing activities (131,227) (362,298) (682,714)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities (82,587) 74,943 255,228 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 3,778 (2,959) (13,558)
Net decrease in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash $ (172,916) $ (116,113) $ (767,853)
Operating Activities
The decrease in net cash provided by operating activities during 2020 was primarily driven by the $350 million settlement payment
associated with our prior class action lawsuit as described above and the timing of cash receipts from certain third-party module
sales, for which proceeds were received in late 2019 prior to the step down in the U.S. investment tax credit, partially offset by
higher cash proceeds from the sale of systems projects in Japan and the United States.
Investing Activities
The decrease in net cash used in investing activities during 2020 was primarily due to lower purchases of property, plant and
equipment.
Financing Activities
The increase in net cash used in financing activities during 2020 was primarily due to the repayment of the Ishikawa Credit
Agreement, partially offset by proceeds from borrowings under project specific debt financings associated with the construction of
certain projects in Japan.
Contractual Obligations
The following table presents the payments due by fiscal year for our outstanding contractual obligations as of December 31, 2020
(in thousands), excluding certain obligations we expect to transfer to Clairvest upon the closing of the sale of our North American
O&M business and to OMERS upon the closing of the sale of our U.S. project development business:
  Payments Due by Year
TotalLess Than
 1 Year1 - 3
 Years3 - 5
 YearsMore Than
 5 Years
Long-term debt obligations $ 287,149 $ 41,801 $ 23,932 $ 62,287 $ 159,129 
Interest payments (1) 116,030 11,433 21,881 19,818 62,898 
Operating lease obligations 252,771 17,858 34,861 33,884 166,168 
Purchase obligations (2) 1,058,664 590,516 198,993 161,730 107,425 
Recycling obligations 130,688 — — — 130,688 
Contingent consideration (3) 2,243 2,243 — — — 
Other obligations (4) 3,541 2,122 1,119 300 — 
Total $ 1,851,086 $ 665,973 $ 280,786 $ 278,019 $ 626,308 
——————————
(1) Includes estim ated cash interest to be paid over the remaining terms of the underlying debt. Interest paym ents are based on fixed and
floating rates as of December 31, 2020.
69
Table of Contents
(2) Purchase obligations represent agreements to purchase goods or services, including open purchase orders and contracts with fixed
volume commitments, that are noncancelable or cancelable with a significant penalty . Purchase obligations for our long-term supply
agreements for the purchas e of substrate glass and cover glass represent specified termination penalties, which are up to $390 million in
the aggregate  under the agreements. Our remaining purchases under these supply agreements are expected to be approximately $1.8
billion of substrate glass and $410 million of cover glass.
(3) In connection  with business or project acquisitions, we may agree to pay additional amounts to the selling parties upon achievement of
certain milestones. See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
(4) Includes expected letter of credit fees and unused revolver fees.
We have excluded $5.4 million of unrecognized tax benefits from the amounts presented above as the timing of such obligations is
uncertain.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
As of December 31, 2020, we had no off-balance sheet debt or similar obligations, other than financial assurance related
instruments and operating leases, which are not classified as debt. We do not guarantee any third-party debt. See Note 13.
“Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for further information about our financial assurance
related instruments.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
See Note 3. “Recent Accounting Pronouncements” to our consolidated financial statements for a summary of recent accounting
pronouncements.
Critical Accounting Estimates
In preparing our consolidated financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States
(“U.S. GAAP”), we make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts of reported assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenses,
as well as the disclosure of contingent liabilities. Some of our accounting policies require the application of significant judgment in
the selection of the appropriate assumptions for making these estimates. By their nature, these judgments are subject to an inherent
degree of uncertainty. We base our judgments and estimates on our historical experience, our forecasts, and other available
information as appropriate. The actual results experienced by us may differ materially and adversely from our estimates. To the
extent there are material differences between our estimates and the actual results, our future results of operations will be affected.
Our significant accounting policies are described in Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” to our consolidated
financial statements. The accounting policies that require the most significant judgment and estimates include the following:
Revenue Recognition – Solar Power System Sales and/or EPC Services. We recognize revenue for the sale of a development
project, which excludes EPC services, or for the sale of a completed system when we enter into the associated sales contract with
the customer. For EPC services, or sales of solar power systems with EPC services, we generally recognize revenue over time as
our performance creates or enhances an energy generation asset controlled by the customer. Furthermore, the sale of a solar power
system combined with EPC services represents a single performance obligation for the development and construction of a single
generation asset. For such arrangements, we recognize revenue and gross profit as work is performed using cost based input
methods, for which we determine our progress toward contract completion based on the relationship between actual costs incurred
and total estimated costs (including solar module costs) of the contract. Such revenue recognition is also dependent, in part, on our
customers’ commitment to perform their obligations under the contract, which is typically measured through the receipt of cash
deposits or other forms of financial security issued by creditworthy financial institutions or parent entities.
70
Table of Contents
Cost based input methods of revenue recognition are considered a faithful depiction of our efforts to satisfy long-term construction
contracts and therefore reflect the transfer of goods to a customer under such contracts. Costs incurred that do not contribute to
satisfying our performance obligations (“inefficient costs”) are excluded from our input methods of revenue recognition as the
amounts are not reflective of our transferring control of the system to the customer. Costs incurred toward contract completion may
include costs associated with solar modules, direct materials, labor, subcontractors, and other indirect costs related to contract
performance. We recognize solar module and direct material costs as incurred when such items have been installed in a system.
Cost based input methods of revenue recognition require us to make estimates of net contract revenues and costs to complete our
projects. In making such estimates, significant judgment is required to evaluate assumptions related to the amount of net contract
revenues, including the impact of any performance incentives, liquidated damages, and other payments to customers. Significant
judgment is also required to evaluate assumptions related to the costs to complete our projects, including materials, labor,
contingencies, and other system costs. If the estimated total costs on any contract, including any inefficient costs, are greater than
the net contract revenues, we recognize the entire estimated loss in the period the loss becomes known. The cumulative effect of
revisions to estimates related to net contract revenues or costs to complete contracts are recorded in the period in which the
revisions to estimates are identified and the amounts can be reasonably estimated. The effect of the changes on future periods are
recognized as if the revised estimates had been used since revenue was initially recognized under the contract. Such revisions could
occur in any reporting period, and the effects may be material depending on the size of the contracts or the changes in estimates.
As part of our solar power system sales, we conduct performance testing of a system prior to substantial completion to confirm the
system meets its operational and capacity expectations noted in the EPC agreement. In addition, we may provide an energy
performance test during the first or second year of a system’s operation to demonstrate that the actual energy generation for the
applicable period meets or exceeds the modeled energy expectation, after certain adjustments. These tests are based on
meteorological, energy, and equipment performance data measured at the system’s location as well as certain projections of such
data over the remaining measurement period. In certain instances, a bonus payment may be received at the end of the applicable
test period if the system performs above a specified level. Conversely, if there is an underperformance event with regards to these
tests, we may incur liquidated damages as a percentage of the EPC contract price. Such performance guarantees represent a form of
variable consideration and are estimated at contract inception at their most likely amount and updated at the end of each reporting
period as additional performance data becomes available and only to the extent that it is probable that a significant reversal of any
incremental revenue will not occur.
Revenue Recognition – Operations and Maintenance. We recognize revenue for standard, recurring O&M services over time as
customers receive and consume the benefits of such services. Costs of O&M services are expensed in the period in which they are
incurred. As part of our O&M service offerings, we typically offer an effective availability guarantee, which stipulates that a system
will be available to generate a certain percentage of total possible energy during a specific period after adjusting for factors outside
our control as the service provider. These tests are based on meteorological, energy, and equipment performance data measured at
the system’s location as well as certain projections of such data over the remaining measurement period. If system availability
exceeds a contractual threshold, we may receive a bonus payment, or if system availability falls below a separate threshold, we may
incur liquidated damages for certain lost energy under the PPA. Such bonuses or liquidated damages represent a form of variable
consideration and are estimated and recognized over time as customers receive and consume the benefits of the O&M services.
Accrued Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability. We previously established a module collection and recycling program,
which has since been discontinued, to collect and recycle modules sold and covered under such program once the modules reach
the end of their service lives. For legacy customer sales contracts that were covered under this program, we recognized expense at
the time of sale for the estimated cost of our obligations to collect and recycle such modules. We estimate the cost of our collection
and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules,
which includes estimates for the cost of
71
Table of Contents
packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a recycling center; material, labor, and capital
costs; and by-product credits for certain materials recovered during the recycling process. We base these estimates on our
experience collecting and recycling solar modules and certain assumptions regarding costs at the time the solar modules will be
collected and recycled. In the periods between the time of sale and the related settlement of the collection and recycling obligation,
we accrete the carrying amount of the associated liability and classify the corresponding expense within “Selling, general and
administrative” expense on our consolidated statements of operations. We periodically review our estimates of expected future
recycling costs and may adjust our liability accordingly.
Product Warranties. We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal
use and service conditions for up to 12 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon
specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage
reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years.
Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking.
As an alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level
limited module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems
and provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty. 
In addition to our limited solar module warranties described above, for PV solar power systems we construct, we typically provide
limited warranties for defects in engineering design, installation, and BoS part workmanship for a period of one to two years
following the substantial completion of a system or a block within the system.
When we recognize revenue for module or system sales, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our limited
warranty obligations. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the number of our solar modules under warranty
installed at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty claims, and our estimated per-module
replacement costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain quality and reliability testing and
actual performance in certain field installation sites. In general, we expect the return rates for our newer series of module
technology to be lower than our older series. We estimate that the return rate for such newer series of module technology will be
less than 1%.
Income Taxes. We are subject to the income tax laws of the United States, its states and municipalities, and those of the foreign
jurisdictions in which we have significant business operations. Such tax laws are complex and subject to different interpretations by
the taxpayer and the relevant taxing authorities. We make judgments and interpretations regarding the application of these
inherently complex tax laws when determining our provision for income taxes and also make estimates about when in the future
certain items are expected to affect taxable income in the various tax jurisdictions. Disputes over interpretations of tax laws may be
settled with the relevant taxing authority upon examination or audit. We regularly evaluate the likelihood of assessments in each of
our taxing jurisdictions resulting from current and future examinations, and we record tax liabilities as appropriate.
In preparing our consolidated financial statements, we calculate our income tax provision based on our interpretation of the tax
laws and regulations in the various jurisdictions where we conduct business. This requires us to estimate our current tax
obligations, assess uncertain tax positions, and assess temporary differences between the financial statement carrying amounts and
the tax basis of assets and liabilities. These temporary differences result in deferred tax assets and liabilities. We must also assess
the likelihood that each of our deferred tax assets will be realized. To
72
Table of Contents
the extent we believe that realization of any of our deferred tax assets is not more likely than not, we establish a valuation
allowance. When we establish a valuation allowance or increase this allowance in a reporting period, we generally record a
corresponding tax expense. Conversely, to the extent circumstances indicate that a valuation allowance is no longer necessary, that
portion of the valuation allowance is reversed, which generally reduces our overall income tax expense.
We establish liabilities for potential additional taxes based on our assessment of the outcome of our tax positions. Once established,
we adjust these liabilities when additional information becomes available or when an event occurs requiring an adjustment.
Significant judgment is required in making these estimates and the actual cost of a tax assessment, fine, or penalty may ultimately
be materially different from our recorded liabilities, if any.
We continually explore initiatives to better align our tax and legal entity structure with the footprint of our global operations and
recognize the tax impact of these initiatives, including changes in the assessment of uncertain tax positions, indefinite reinvestment
exception assertions, and the realizability of deferred tax assets, in the period when we believe all necessary internal and external
approvals associated with such initiatives have been obtained, or when the initiatives are materially complete.
Asset Impairments. We assess long-lived assets classified as “held and used,” including our property, plant and equipment; PV solar
power systems; project assets; operating lease assets; and intangible assets for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances arise, including consideration of technological obsolescence, that may indicate that the carrying amount of such
assets may not be recoverable, and these assessments require significant judgment in determining whether such events or changes
have occurred. These events or changes in circumstances may include a significant decrease in the market price of a long-lived
asset; a significant adverse change in the extent or manner in which a long-lived asset is being used or in its physical condition; a
significant adverse change in the business climate that could affect the value of a long-lived asset; an accumulation of costs
significantly in excess of the amount originally expected for the acquisition or construction of a long-lived asset; a current-period
operating or cash flow loss combined with a history of such losses or a projection of future losses associated with the use of a long-
lived asset; or a current expectation that, more likely than not, a long-lived asset will be sold or otherwise disposed of significantly
before the end of its previously estimated useful life. For purposes of recognition and measurement of an impairment loss, long-
lived assets are grouped with other assets and liabilities at the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely independent
of the cash flows of other assets and liabilities, and we must also exercise judgment in assessing such groupings and levels.
When impairment indicators are present, we compare undiscounted future cash flows, including the eventual disposition of the
asset group at market value, to the asset group’s carrying value to determine if the asset group is recoverable. If the carrying value
of the asset group exceeds the undiscounted future cash flows, we measure any impairment by comparing the fair value of the asset
group to its carrying value. Fair value is generally determined by considering (i) internally developed discounted cash flows for the
asset group, (ii) third-party valuations, and/or (iii) information available regarding the current market value for such assets. If the
fair value of an asset group is determined to be less than its carrying value, an impairment in the amount of the difference is
recorded in the period that the impairment indicator occurs. Estimating future cash flows requires significant judgment, and such
projections may vary from the cash flows eventually realized.
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
Foreign Currency Exchange Risk
Cash Flow Exposure. We expect certain of our subsidiaries to have future cash flows that will be denominated in currencies other
than the subsidiaries’ functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and
the other currencies in which they transact will cause fluctuations in the cash flows we expect to receive or pay when these cash
flows are realized or settled. Accordingly, we enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to hedge a portion of these forecasted
cash flows. These foreign exchange forward
73
Table of Contents
contracts qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815 and we designated them as such. We initially
report unrealized gains or losses for such contracts in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and subsequently reclassify
amounts into earnings when the hedged transaction occurs and impacts earnings. For additional details on our derivative hedging
instruments and activities, see Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements.
Certain of our international operations, such as our manufacturing facilities in Malaysia and Vietnam, pay a portion of their
operating expenses, including associate wages and utilities, in local currencies, which exposes us to foreign currency exchange risk
for such expenses. Our manufacturing facilities are also exposed to foreign currency exchange risk for purchases of certain
equipment from international vendors. To the extent we expand into new markets, particularly emerging markets, our total foreign
currency exchange risk, in terms of both size and exchange rate volatility, and the number of foreign currencies we are exposed to
could increase significantly.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, 22% of our net sales were denominated in foreign currencies, including Japanese yen and
Euro. As a result, we have exposure to foreign currencies with respect to our net sales, which has historically represented one of our
primary foreign currency exchange risks. A 10% change in the U.S. dollar to Japanese yen and Euro exchange rates would have
had an aggregate impact on our net sales of $53.8 million, excluding the effect of our hedging activities.
Transaction Exposure. Many of our subsidiaries have assets and liabilities (primarily cash, receivables, deferred taxes, payables,
accrued expenses, and solar module collection and recycling liabilities) that are denominated in currencies other than the
subsidiaries’ functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the
other currencies in which these assets and liabilities are denominated will create fluctuations in our reported consolidated
statements of operations and cash flows. We may enter into foreign exchange forward contracts or other financial instruments to
economically hedge assets and liabilities against the effects of currency exchange rate fluctuations. The gains and losses on such
foreign exchange forward contracts will economically offset all or part of the transaction gains and losses that we recognize in
earnings on the related foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities. For additional details on our economic hedging
instruments and activities, see Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements.
As of December 31, 2020, a 10% change in the U.S. dollar relative to our primary foreign currency exposures would not have had a
significant impact to our net foreign currency income or loss, including the effect of our hedging activities.
Interest Rate Risk
Variable Rate Debt Exposure. We are exposed to interest rate risk as certain of our project specific debt financings have variable
interest rates, exposing us to variability in interest expense and cash flows. See Note 12. “Debt” to our consolidated financial
statements for additional information on our long-term debt borrowing rates. An increase in relevant interest rates would increase
the cost of borrowing under certain of our project specific debt financings. If such variable interest rates changed by 100 basis
points, our interest expense for the year ended December 31, 2020 would have changed by $1.2 million, including the effect of our
hedging activities.
Customer Financing Exposure. We are also indirectly exposed to interest rate risk because many of our customers depend on debt
financings to purchase modules or systems. An increase in interest rates could make it challenging for our customers to obtain the
capital necessary to make such purchases on favorable terms, or at all. Such factors could reduce demand or lower the price we can
charge for our modules and systems, thereby reducing our net sales and gross profit. In addition, we believe that a significant
percentage of our customers purchase systems as an investment, funding the initial capital expenditure through a combination of
equity and debt. An increase in interest rates could lower an investor’s return on investment in a system or make alternative
investments more attractive relative to PV solar power systems, which, in either case, could cause these end-users to seek
alternative investments with higher risk-adjusted returns.
74
Table of Contents
Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities Exposure. We invest in various debt securities, which exposes us to
interest rate risk. The primary objectives of our investment activities are to preserve principal and provide liquidity, while at the
same time maximizing the return on our investments. Many of the securities in which we invest may be subject to market risk.
Accordingly, a change in prevailing interest rates may cause the market value of such investments to fluctuate. For example, if we
hold a security that was issued with an interest rate fixed at the then-prevailing rate and the prevailing interest rate subsequently
rises, the market value of our investment may decline.
For the year ended December 31, 2020, our marketable securities earned a return of 2%, including the impact of fluctuations in the
price of the underlying securities, and had a weighted-average maturity of 8 months as of the end of the period. Based on our
investment positions as of December 31, 2020, a hypothetical 100 basis point change in interest rates would have resulted in a $0.8
million change in the market value of our investment portfolio. For the year ended December 31, 2020, our restricted marketable
securities earned a return of 19%, including the impact of fluctuations in the price of the underlying securities, and had a weighted-
average maturity of approximately 15 years as of the end of the period. Based on our restricted marketable securities positions as of
December 31, 2020, a hypothetical 100 basis point change in interest rates would have resulted in a $40.2 million change in the
market value of our restricted marketable securities portfolio.
Commodity and Component Risk
We are exposed to price risks for the raw materials, components, services, and energy costs used in the manufacturing and
transportation of our solar modules and BoS parts used in our systems. Additionally, some of our raw materials and components are
sourced from a limited number of suppliers or a single supplier. We evaluate our suppliers using a robust qualification process. In
some cases, we also enter into long-term supply contracts for raw materials and components. Accordingly, we are exposed to price
changes in the raw materials and components used in our solar modules and systems. From time to time, we may utilize derivative
hedging instruments to mitigate such raw material price changes. In addition, the failure of a key supplier could disrupt our supply
chain, which could result in higher prices and/or a disruption in our manufacturing or construction processes. We may be unable to
pass along changes in the costs of the raw materials and components for our modules and systems to our customers and may be in
default of our delivery obligations if we experience a manufacturing or construction disruption.
Credit Risk
We have certain financial and derivative instruments that subject us to credit risk. These consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents,
marketable securities, accounts receivable, restricted cash and investments, notes receivable, foreign exchange forward contracts,
and commodity swap contracts. We are exposed to credit losses in the event of nonperformance by the counterparties to our
financial and derivative instruments. We place cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, restricted cash, restricted marketable
securities, foreign exchange forward contracts, and commodity swap contracts with various high-quality financial institutions and
limit the amount of credit risk from any one counterparty. We continuously evaluate the credit standing of our counterparty
financial institutions. We monitor the financial condition of our customers and perform credit evaluations whenever considered
necessary. Depending upon the sales arrangement, we may require some form of payment security from our customers, including,
but not limited to, advance payments, parent guarantees, standby letters of credit, bank guarantees, surety bonds, or commercial
letters of credit. We also have PPAs that subject us to credit risk in the event our off-take counterparties are unable to fulfill their
contractual obligations, which may adversely affect our project assets and certain receivables. Accordingly, we closely monitor the
credit standing of existing and potential off-take counterparties to limit such risks.
75
Table of Contents
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Consolidated Financial Statements
Our consolidated financial statements as required by this item are included in Item 15. “Exhibits and Financial Statement
Schedules.” See Item 15(a) for a list of our consolidated financial statements.
Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
The following selected quarterly financial data should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and the
related notes thereto and Item 7. “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.” This
information has been derived from our unaudited consolidated financial statements that, in our opinion, reflect all recurring
adjustments necessary to fairly present the information when read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements. The
results of operations for any quarter are not necessarily indicative of the results to be expected for any future period.
 Quarters Ended
 
  Dec 31,
 2020Sep 30,
 2020Jun 30,
 2020Mar 31,
 2020Dec 31,
2019Sep 30,
 2019Jun 30,
 2019Mar 31,
 2019
 (In thousands, except per share amounts)
Net sales $ 609,232 $ 927,565 $ 642,411 $ 532,124 $1,399,377 $ 546,806 $ 584,956 $ 531,978 
Gross profit 159,860 293,015 137,460 90,338 333,555 138,363 77,182 112 
Production start-up 16,716 13,019 6,311 4,482 7,351 18,605 10,437 9,522 
Litigation loss — — 6,000 — 363,000 — — — 
Operating income (loss) 57,774 207,163 50,896 1,656 (117,866) 41,304 (8,584) (76,639)
Net income (loss) 115,703 155,037 36,911 90,704 (59,408) 30,622 (18,548) (67,599)
Net income (loss) per share:      
Basic $ 1.09 $ 1.46 $ 0.35 $ 0.86 $ (0.56)$ 0.29 $ (0.18)$ (0.64)
Diluted $ 1.08 $ 1.45 $ 0.35 $ 0.85 $ (0.56)$ 0.29 $ (0.18)$ (0.64)
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of management, including our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of our “disclosure controls and procedures” as defined in Exchange Act
Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e). Based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that as
of December 31, 2020 our disclosure controls and procedures were effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time
periods specified in SEC rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our management,
including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required
disclosure.
76
Table of Contents
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate “internal control over financial reporting,” as defined in
Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). We also carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of our internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 based on the criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”). Our internal control over financial
reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. GAAP. Based on such evaluation, our management concluded
that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2020. The effectiveness of our internal control
over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 has also been audited by PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered
public accounting firm, as stated in its report which appears herein.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We also carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of management, including our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of our “internal control over financial reporting” to determine whether any changes in our
internal control over financial reporting occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2020 that materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Based on that evaluation, there were no such
changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2020.
Limitations on the Effectiveness of Controls
Control systems, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the control
systems’ objectives are being met. Further, the design of any system of controls must reflect the fact that there are resource
constraints, and the benefits of all controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations in all
control systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any,
within our Company have been detected. These inherent limitations include the realities that judgments in decision-making can be
faulty and that breakdowns can occur because of error or mistake. Control systems can also be circumvented by the individual acts
of some persons, by collusion of two or more people, or by management override of the controls. The design of any system of
controls is also based in part upon certain assumptions about the likelihood of future events, and there can be no assurance that any
design will succeed in achieving its stated goals under all potential future conditions. Over time, controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions or deterioration in the degree of compliance with policies or procedures.
Item 9B. Other Information
None.
77
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance
For information with respect to our executive officers, see Item 1. “Business – Information about Our Executive Officers.”
Information concerning our board of directors and audit committee of our board of directors will appear in our 2021 Proxy
Statement, under the sections “Directors” and “Corporate Governance,” and information concerning Section 16(a) beneficial
ownership reporting compliance will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership
Reporting Compliance.” We have adopted a Code of Business Conduct and Ethics that applies to all directors, officers, and
associates of First Solar. Information concerning this code will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section “Corporate
Governance.” The information in such sections of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
Item 11. Executive Compensation
Information concerning executive compensation and related information will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section
“Executive Compensation,” and information concerning the compensation committee of our board of directors (the “compensation
committee”) will appear under the sections “Corporate Governance” and “Compensation Committee Report.” The information in
such sections of the 2021 Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
Information concerning the security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related stockholder matters,
including certain information regarding our equity compensation plans, will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section
“Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.” The information in such
section of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Equity Compensation Plans
The following table sets forth certain information as of December 31, 2020 concerning securities authorized for issuance under our
equity compensation plans:
Plan CategoryNumber of Securities to
be Issued Upon Exercise
of Outstanding Options
and Rights
 (a)(1)Weighted-Average
Exercise Price of
Outstanding Options
and Rights
 (b)(2)Number of Securities
Remaining Available for
Future Issuance Under
Equity Compensation
Plans (Excluding
Securities Reflected in
Column (a))
 (c)
Equity compensation plans approved by stockholders 1,852,256 $ — 6,608,877
Equity compensation plans not approved by stockholders — — — 
Total 1,852,256 $ — 6,608,877
——————————
(1) Includes 1,852,256 shares issuable upon vesting of restricted stock units (“RSUs”) granted under our 2020 Omnibus Incentive
Compensation Plan (“2020 Omnibus Plan”).
(2) The weighted-average exercise price does not take into account the shares issuable upon vesting of outstanding RSUs, which have no
exercise price.
78
Table of Contents
See Note 16. “Share-Based Compensation” to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion on our equity
compensation plans.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
Information concerning certain relationships and related party transactions will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the
section “Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions,” and information concerning director independence will appear in
our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section “Corporate Governance.” The information in such sections of the Proxy Statement is
incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services
Information concerning principal accounting fees and services and the audit committee of our board of directors’ pre-approval
policies and procedures for these items will appear in our 2021 Proxy Statement under the section “Principal Accounting Fees and
Services.” The information in such section of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
(a)Documents. The following documents are filed as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Consolidated Balance Sheets
Consolidated Statements of Operations
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(b)Exhibits. Unless otherwise noted, the exhibits listed on the accompanying Index to Exhibits are filed with or incorporated by
reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(c)Financial Statement Schedules. All financial statement schedules have been omitted as the required information is not
applicable or is not material to require presentation of the schedule, or because the information required is included in the
consolidated financial statements and notes thereto of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
79
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of First Solar, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of First Solar, Inc. and its subsidiaries (“the Company”) as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ equity
and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, including the related notes (collectively referred
to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position
of the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2020 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting appearing under Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express
opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based
on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(“PCAOB”) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk.
Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
80
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated
financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate
opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability
As described in Note 11 to the consolidated financial statements, certain of the Company’s legacy sales were covered by a module
collection and recycling program, which was previously established to collect and recycle modules sold and covered under such
program once the modules reach the end of their useful lives. The Company’s accrued solar module collection and recycling
liability was $130.7 million as of December 31, 2020. Management estimates the cost of collection and recycling obligations based
on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules, which includes estimates for the cost
of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a recycling center; material, labor, and capital
costs; and by-product credits for certain materials recovered during the recycling process. Management bases these estimates on
experience collecting and recycling the solar modules and certain assumptions regarding costs at the time the solar modules will be
collected and recycled.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the solar module collection and recycling
liability is a critical audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management when developing the estimated costs of this
program; and (ii) a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures to evaluate audit evidence
related to management’s significant assumptions related to the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a recycling
center, capital costs, present value assumptions, and the assumption regarding costs at the time the solar modules will be collected
and recycled, and evaluating audit evidence related to the results of those procedures.
81
Table of Contents
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to
valuation of the solar module collection and recycling liability. These procedures also included, among others, testing
management’s process for developing the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules including evaluating
the reasonableness of the significant assumptions used by management related to the cost of freight from the solar module
installation sites to a recycling center, capital costs, present value assumptions, and the assumption regarding costs at the time the
solar modules will be collected and recycled. Evaluating the reasonableness of the significant assumptions involved (i) testing
actual recycling costs incurred, (ii) obtaining and evaluating evidence from third parties, and (iii) evaluating other underlying input
data considered by management in the development of its recycling liability.
Product Warranty Liability
As described in Notes 2 and 13 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company provides a limited PV solar module warranty
which covers defects in materials and workmanship for up to 12 years and warrants that modules will produce at least a specified
minimum percentage of their labeled power output rating, on either an individual module or system-level basis, for up to 30 years.
The Company’s product warranty liability was $95.1 million as of December 31, 2020. Product warranty estimates are based
primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty installed at customer locations, historical experience with and projections
of warranty claims, and estimated per-module replacement costs.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the product warranty liability is a critical
audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management in estimating the projections of warranty claims; and (ii) a high degree
of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures to evaluate the projections of warranty claims and related
audit evidence.
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to
valuation of the product warranty liability. These procedures also included, among others, testing the appropriateness of the
methodology used and the reasonableness of the significant assumptions used by management in developing these estimates related
to projections of warranty claims. Evaluating whether the significant assumptions relating to the product warranty liability were
reasonable involved (i) testing historical warranty claims and settlements, (ii) evaluating the reasonableness and appropriateness of
factors considered by management in estimating the final settlement of open customer claims, and (iii) evaluating the
reasonableness and appropriateness of the methodology used by management to determine return rates used in the valuation of the
product warranty liability.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Phoenix, Arizona
February 25, 2021
We have served as the Company’s or its predecessor’s auditor since 2000, which includes periods before the Company became
subject to SEC reporting requirements.
82
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except share data)
December 31,
2020 2019
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,227,002 $ 1,352,741 
Marketable securities (amortized cost of $519,844 and allowance for credit losses of $121 at
December 31, 2020) 520,066 811,506 
Accounts receivable trade 269,095 476,425 
Less: allowance for credit losses (3,009) (1,386)
Accounts receivable trade, net 266,086 475,039 
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage 26,673 183,473 
Less: allowance for credit losses (303) — 
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net 26,370 183,473 
Inventories 567,587 443,513 
Balance of systems parts 30 53,583 
Project assets — 3,524 
Assets held for sale 155,685 — 
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 251,709 276,455 
Total current assets 3,014,535 3,599,834 
Property, plant and equipment, net 2,402,285 2,181,149 
PV solar power systems, net 243,396 476,977 
Project assets 373,377 333,596 
Deferred tax assets, net 104,099 130,771 
Restricted marketable securities (amortized cost of $247,628 and allowance for credit losses of $13 at December
31, 2020) 265,280 223,785 
Goodwill 14,462 14,462 
Intangible assets, net 56,138 64,543 
Inventories 201,229 160,646 
Other assets 434,130 329,926 
Total assets $ 7,108,931 $ 7,515,689 
LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Accounts payable $ 183,349 $ 218,081 
Income taxes payable 14,571 17,010 
Accrued expenses 310,467 351,260 
Current portion of long-term debt 41,540 17,510 
Deferred revenue 188,813 323,217 
Accrued litigation — 363,000 
Liabilities held for sale 25,621 — 
Other current liabilities 83,037 28,130 
Total current liabilities 847,398 1,318,208 
Accrued solar module collection and recycling liability 130,688 137,761 
Long-term debt 237,691 454,187 
Other liabilities 372,226 508,766 
Total liabilities 1,588,003 2,418,922 
Commitments and contingencies
Stockholders’ equity:
Common stock, $0.001 par value per share; 500,000,000 shares authorized; 105,980,466 and 105,448,921 shares
issued and outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively 106 105 
Additional paid-in capital 2,866,786 2,849,376 
Accumulated earnings 2,715,762 2,326,620 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (61,726) (79,334)
Total stockholders’ equity 5,520,928 5,096,767 
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $ 7,108,931 $ 7,515,689 
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
83
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
Net sales $ 2,711,332  $ 3,063,1 17 $ 2,244,044  
Cost of sales 2,030,659  2,513,905  1,851,867  
Gross profit 680,673  549,212  392,177  
Operating expenses:
Selling, general and administrative 222,918  205,471  176,857  
Research and development 93,738  96,61 1 84,472  
Production start-up 40,528  45,915  90,735  
Litigation loss 6,000  363,000  — 
Total operating expenses 363,184  710,997  352,064  
Operating income (loss) 317,489  (161,785 ) 40,113 
Foreign currency (loss) income, net (4,890 ) 2,291  (570)
Interest income 16,559  48,886  59,788  
Interest expense, net (24,036 ) (27,066 ) (25,921 )
Other (expense) income, net (11,932 ) 17,545  39,737  
Income (loss) before taxes and equity in earnings 293,190  (120,129 ) 113,147  
Income tax benefit (expense) 107,294  5,480  (3,441 )
Equity in earnings, net of tax (2,129 ) (284) 34,620  
Net income (loss) $ 398,355  $ (114,933 )$ 144,326  
Net income (loss) per share:
Basic $ 3.76 $ (1.09)$ 1.38 
Diluted $ 3.73 $ (1.09)$ 1.36 
Weighted-average number of shares used in per share calculations:
Basic 105,867  105,310  104,745  
Diluted 106,686  105,310  106,1 13 
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
84
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) $ 398,355  $ (114,933 )$ 144,326  
Other comprehensive income (loss):
Foreign currency translation adjustments (2,810 ) (7,049 ) (1,034 )
Unrealized gain (loss) on marketable securities and restricted marketable securities,
net of tax of $(1,231), $3,046, and $3,735 21,659  (15,670 ) (57,747 )
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative instruments, net of tax of $(31), $142, and
$(996) (1,241 ) (2,149 ) 2,056  
Other comprehensive income (loss) 17,608  (24,868 ) (56,725 )
Comprehensive income (loss) $ 415,963  $ (139,801 )$ 87,601  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
85
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
(In thousands)
 Common StockAdditional
 Paid-In
 CapitalAccumulated
EarningsAccumulated
 Other
 Comprehensive
(Loss) IncomeTotal
 Equity  Shares Amount
Balance at December 31, 2017 104,468  $ 104 $ 2,799,107  $ 2,297,227  $ 2,259  $ 5,098,697  
Net income — — — 144,326  — 144,326  
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (56,725 ) (56,725 )
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 588 1 3,425  — — 3,426  
Tax withholding related to vesting
of restricted stock (171) — (11,175 ) — — (11,175 )
Share-based compensation
expense — — 33,854  — — 33,854  
Balance at December 31, 2018 104,885  105 2,825,21 1 2,441,553  (54,466 ) 5,212,403  
Net loss — — — (114,933 ) — (114,933 )
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (24,868 ) (24,868 )
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 869 1 3,433  — — 3,434  
Tax withholding related to vesting
of restricted stock (305) (1) (16,089 ) — — (16,090 )
Share-based compensation
expense — — 36,821  — — 36,821  
Balance at December 31, 2019 105,449  105 2,849,376  2,326,620  (79,334 ) 5,096,767  
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment for
the adoption of ASU 2016-13 — — — (9,213 ) — (9,213 )
Net income — — — 398,355  — 398,355  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 17,608  17,608  
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 814 1 1,362  — — 1,363  
Tax withholding related to vesting
of restricted stock (283) — (13,118) — — (13,118)
Share-based compensation
expense — — 29,166  — — 29,166  
Balance at December 31, 2020 105,980  $ 106 $ 2,866,786  $ 2,715,762  $ (61,726 )$ 5,520,928  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
86
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 Years Ended December 31,
2020 2019 2018
Cash flows from operating activities:    
Net income (loss) $ 398,355 $ (114,933)$ 144,326 
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) to cash provided by (used in) operating activities:
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 232,925 205,475 130,736 
Impairments and net losses on disposal of long-lived assets 35,806 7,577 8,065 
Share-based compensation 29,267 37,429 34,154 
Equity in earnings, net of tax 2,129 284 (34,620)
Distributions received from equity method investments — — 12,394 
Remeasurement of monetary assets and liabilities 1,359 919 8,740 
Deferred income taxes 36,013 (59,917) (10,112)
Gains on sales of marketable securities and restricted marketable securities (15,346) (40,621) (55,405)
Liabilities assumed by customers for the sale of systems (136,745) (88,050) (240,865)
Other, net 15,809 759 2,121 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Accounts receivable, trade, unbilled and retainage 345,150 (73,594) (202,298)
Prepaid expenses and other current assets (992) (34,528) (53,488)
Inventories and balance of systems parts (145,396) (83,528) (257,229)
Project assets and PV solar power systems 106,867 (20,773) 49,939 
Other assets (32,073) 28,728 (11,920)
Income tax receivable and payable (177,431) 8,035 (49,169)
Accounts payable (43,285) (336) 96,443 
Accrued expenses and other liabilities (606,111) 397,527 132,382 
Accrued solar module collection and recycling liability (9,181) 3,748 (31,003)
Net cash provided by (used in) operating activities 37,120 174,201 (326,809)
Cash flows from investing activities:
Purchases of property, plant and equipment (416,635) (668,717) (739,838)
Purchases of marketable securities and restricted marketable securities (901,924) (1,177,336) (1,369,036)
Proceeds from sales and maturities of marketable securities and restricted marketable securities 1,192,832 1,486,631 1,135,984 
Proceeds from sales of equity method investments — — 247,595 
Payments received on notes receivable, affiliates — — 48,729 
Other investing activities (5,500) (2,876) (6,148)
Net cash used in investing activities (131,227) (362,298) (682,714)
Cash flows from financing activities:
Repayment of long-term debt (225,344) (30,099) (18,937)
Proceeds from borrowings under long-term debt, net of discounts and issuance costs 156,679 120,132 290,925 
Payments of tax withholdings for restricted shares (13,118) (16,089) (11,175)
Other financing activities (804) 999 (5,585)
Net cash (used in) provided by financing activities (82,587) 74,943 255,228 
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash 3,778 (2,959) (13,558)
Net decrease in cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash (172,916) (116,113) (767,853)
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, beginning of the period 1,446,510 1,562,623 2,330,476 
Cash, cash equivalents and restricted cash, end of the period $ 1,273,594 $ 1,446,510 $ 1,562,623 
Supplemental disclosure of noncash investing and financing activities:    
Property, plant and equipment acquisitions funded by liabilities $ 110,576 $ 76,148 $ 138,270 
Sale of system previously accounted for as sale-leaseback financing $ — $ — $ 31,992 
Accrued interest capitalized to long-term debt $ — $ — $ 3,512 
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
87
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
1. First Solar and Its Business
We are a leading global provider of PV solar energy solutions. We design, manufacture, and sell PV solar modules with an
advanced thin film semiconductor technology. In certain markets, we also develop and sell PV solar power systems that primarily
use the modules we manufacture and provide O&M services to system owners. We have substantial, ongoing R&D efforts focused
on various technology innovations. We are the world’s largest thin film PV solar module manufacturer and the largest PV solar
module manufacturer in the Western Hemisphere.
2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation. These consolidated financial statements include the accounts of First Solar, Inc. and its subsidiaries and are
prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. We eliminated all intercompany transactions and balances during consolidation. Certain
prior year balances were reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates. The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires us to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and the accompanying notes.
On an ongoing basis, we evaluate our estimates, including those related to inputs used to recognize revenue over time, accrued
solar module collection and recycling liabilities, product warranties, accounting for income taxes, and long-lived asset impairments.
Despite our intention to establish accurate estimates and reasonable assumptions, actual results could differ materially from such
estimates and assumptions.
Fair Value Measurements. We measure certain assets and liabilities at fair value, which is defined as the price that would be
received from the sale of an asset or paid to transfer a liability (i.e., an exit price) on the measurement date in an orderly transaction
between market participants in the principal or most advantageous market for the asset or liability. Our fair value measurements use
the following hierarchy, which prioritizes valuation inputs based on the extent to which the inputs are observable in the market.
•Level 1 – Valuation techniques in which all significant inputs are unadjusted quoted prices from active markets for assets
or liabilities that are identical to the assets or liabilities being measured.
•Level 2 – Valuation techniques in which significant inputs include quoted prices from active markets for assets or
liabilities that are similar to the assets or liabilities being measured and/or quoted prices for assets or liabilities that are
identical or similar to the assets or liabilities being measured from markets that are not active. Also, model-derived
valuations in which all significant inputs are observable in active markets are Level 2 valuation techniques.
•Level 3 – Valuation techniques in which one or more significant inputs are unobservable. Such inputs reflect our estimate
of assumptions that market participants would use to price an asset or liability.
Cash and Cash Equivalents. We consider highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less at the time of
purchase to be cash equivalents with the exception of time deposits, which are presented as marketable securities.
88
Table of Contents
Restricted Cash. Restricted cash consists of cash and cash equivalents held by various banks to secure certain of our letters of credit
and other such deposits designated for the construction or operation of systems projects as well as the payment of amounts related
to project specific debt financings. Restricted cash also includes cash and cash equivalents held in custodial accounts to fund the
estimated future costs of our solar module collection and recycling obligations.
Restricted cash for our letters of credit is classified as current or noncurrent based on the maturity date of the corresponding letter
of credit. Restricted cash for project construction, operation, and financing is classified as current or noncurrent based on the
intended use of the restricted funds. Restricted cash held in custodial accounts is classified as noncurrent to align with the nature of
the corresponding collection and recycling liabilities.
Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities. We determine the classification of our marketable securities and
restricted marketable securities at the time of purchase and reevaluate such designation at each balance sheet date. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, all of our marketable securities and restricted marketable securities were classified as available-for-
sale debt securities. Accordingly, we record them at fair value and account for the net unrealized gains and losses as part of
“Accumulated other comprehensive loss” until realized. We record realized gains and losses on the sale of our marketable securities
and restricted marketable securities in “Other (expense) income, net” computed using the specific identification method.
We may sell marketable securities prior to their stated maturities after consideration of our liquidity requirements. We view
unrestricted securities with maturities beyond 12 months as available to support our current operations and, accordingly, classify
such securities as current assets under “Marketable securities” in the consolidated balance sheets. Restricted marketable securities
consist of long-term duration marketable securities that we hold in custodial accounts to fund the estimated future costs of our solar
module collection and recycling obligations. Accordingly, we classify restricted marketable securities as noncurrent assets under
“Restricted marketable securities” in the consolidated balance sheets.
Accounts Receivable Trade. We record trade accounts receivable for our unconditional rights to consideration arising from our
performance under contracts with customers. The carrying value of such receivables, net of the allowance for credit losses,
represents their estimated net realizable value. Our module and other equipment sales generally include up to 45-day payment
terms following the transfer of control of the products to the customer. In addition, certain module and equipment sale agreements
may require a down payment for a portion of the transaction price upon or shortly after entering into the agreement or related
purchase order. Payment terms for sales of our solar power systems, EPC services, and operations and maintenance services vary
by contract but are generally due upon demand or within several months of satisfying the associated performance obligations. As a
practical expedient, we do not adjust the promised amount of consideration for the effects of a significant financing component
when we expect, at contract inception, that the period between our transfer of a promised product or service to a customer and when
the customer pays for that product or service will be one year or less. We typically do not include extended payment terms in our
contracts with customers.
Accounts Receivable, Unbilled. Accounts receivable, unbilled represents a contract asset for revenue that has been recognized in
advance of billing the customer, which is common for long-term construction contracts. For example, we typically recognize
revenue from contracts for the construction and sale of PV solar power systems over time using cost based input methods, which
recognize revenue and gross profit as work is performed based on the relationship between actual costs incurred compared to the
total estimated costs of the contract. Accordingly, revenue could be recognized in advance of billing the customer, resulting in an
amount recorded to “Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage” or “Other assets” depending on the expected timing of payment
for such unbilled receivables. Once we have an unconditional right to consideration under a construction contract, we typically bill
our customer and reclassify the “Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage” to “Accounts receivable trade.” Billing requirements
vary by contract but are generally structured around the completion of certain development, construction, or other specified
milestones.
89
Table of Contents
Retainage. Certain of our EPC contracts for PV solar power systems we build contain retainage provisions. Retainage represents a
contract asset for the portion of the contract price earned by us for work performed, but held for payment by the customer as a form
of security until we reach certain construction milestones. We consider whether collectibility of such retainage is reasonably
assured in connection with our overall assessment of the collectibility of amounts due or that will become due under our EPC
contracts. Retainage included within “Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage” is expected to be billed and collected within the
next 12 months. After we satisfy the EPC contract requirements and have an unconditional right to consideration, we typically bill
our customer for retainage and reclassify such amount to “Accounts receivable trade.”
Allowance for Credit Losses. The allowance for credit losses is a valuation account that is deducted from a financial asset’s
amortized cost to present the net amount we expect to collect from such asset. We estimate allowances for credit losses using
relevant available information from both internal and external sources. We monitor the estimated credit losses associated with our
trade accounts receivable and unbilled accounts receivable based primarily on our collection history and the delinquency status of
amounts owed to us, which we determine based on the aging of such receivables. For our notes receivable, we determine estimated
credit losses through an assessment of the borrower’s credit quality based primarily on quarterly reviews of certain financial
information, including financial statements and forecasts. We estimate credit losses associated with our marketable securities and
restricted marketable securities based on the external credit rating for such investments and the historical loss rates associated with
such credit ratings, which we obtain from third parties. Such methods and estimates are adjusted, as appropriate, for relevant past
events, current conditions, such as the COVID-19 pandemic and related containment measures, and reasonable and supportable
forecasts. We recognize writeoffs within the allowance for credit losses when cash receipts associated with our financial assets are
deemed uncollectible.
Inventories – Current and Noncurrent. We report our inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable value. We determine cost on a
first-in, first-out basis and include both the costs of acquisition and manufacturing in our inventory costs. These costs include direct
materials, direct labor, and indirect manufacturing costs, including depreciation and amortization. Our capitalization of indirect
costs is based on the normal utilization of our plants. If our plant utilization is abnormally low, the portion of our indirect
manufacturing costs related to the abnormal utilization level is expensed as incurred. Other abnormal manufacturing costs, such as
wasted materials or excess yield losses, are also expensed as incurred. Finished goods inventory is comprised exclusively of solar
modules that have not yet been installed in a PV solar power plant under construction or sold to a third-party customer.
As needed, we may purchase a critical raw material that is used in our core production process in quantities that exceed anticipated
consumption within our normal operating cycle, which is 12 months. We classify such raw materials that we do not expect to
consume within our normal operating cycle as noncurrent.
We regularly review the cost of inventories, including noncurrent inventories, against their estimated net realizable value and record
write-downs if any inventories have costs in excess of their net realizable values. We also regularly evaluate the quantities and
values of our inventories, including noncurrent inventories, in light of current market conditions and trends, among other factors,
and record write-downs for any quantities in excess of demand or for any obsolescence. This evaluation considers the use of
modules in our systems business or product warranties, module selling prices, product obsolescence, strategic raw material
requirements, and other factors.
Balance of Systems Parts. BoS parts represent mounting, electrical, and other parts purchased for the construction and maintenance
of PV solar power systems. These parts, which are not yet installed in a system, may include posts, tilt brackets, tables, harnesses,
combiner boxes, inverters, cables, tracker equipment, and other items that we may purchase or assemble for the systems we
construct. We carry BoS parts at the lower of cost or net realizable value and determine their costs on a weighted-average
basis. BoS parts do not include any solar modules that we manufacture.
90
Table of Contents
Property, Plant and Equipment. We report our property, plant and equipment at cost, less accumulated depreciation. Cost includes
the price paid to acquire or construct the assets, required installation costs, interest capitalized during the construction period, and
any expenditures that substantially add to the value of or substantially extend the useful life of the assets. We capitalize costs
related to computer software obtained or developed for internal use, which generally includes enterprise-level business and finance
software that we customize to meet our specific operational requirements. We expense repair and maintenance costs at the time we
incur them.
We begin depreciation for our property, plant and equipment when the assets are placed in service. We consider such assets to be
placed in service when they are both in the location and condition for their intended use. We compute depreciation expense using
the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of assets, as presented in the table below. We depreciate leasehold
improvements over the shorter of their estimated useful lives or the remaining term of the lease. The estimated useful life of an
asset is reassessed whenever applicable facts and circumstances indicate a change in the estimated useful life of such asset has
occurred.
 
  Useful Lives
 in Years
Buildings and building improvements 25 – 40
Manufacturing machinery and equipment 5 – 15
Furniture, fixtures, computer hardware, and computer software 3 – 7
Leasehold improvements up to 15
PV Solar Power Systems. PV solar power systems represent project assets that we may temporarily own and operate after being
placed in service. We report our PV solar power systems at cost, less accumulated depreciation. When we are entitled to incentive
tax credits for our systems, we reduce the related carrying value of the assets by the amount of the tax credits, which reduces future
depreciation. We begin depreciation for PV solar power systems when they are placed in service. We compute depreciation expense
for the systems using the straight-line method over the shorter of the term of the related PPA or 25 years. Accordingly, our current
PV solar power systems have estimated useful lives ranging from 19 to 25 years.
Project Assets. Project assets primarily consist of costs related to solar power projects in various stages of development that are
capitalized prior to the completion of the sale of the project, including projects that may have begun commercial operation under
PPAs and are actively marketed and intended to be sold. These project related costs include costs for land, development, and
construction of a PV solar power system. Development costs may include legal, consulting, permitting, transmission upgrade,
interconnection, and other similar costs. We typically classify project assets as noncurrent due to the nature of solar power projects
(as long-lived assets) and the time required to complete all activities to develop, construct, and sell projects, which is typically
longer than 12 months. Once we enter into a definitive sales agreement, we classify project assets as current until the sale is
completed and we have recognized the sale as revenue. Any income generated by a project while it remains within project assets is
accounted for as a reduction to our basis in the project. If a project is completed and begins commercial operation prior to the
closing of a sales arrangement, the completed project will remain in project assets until placed in service. We present all
expenditures related to the development and construction of project assets, whether fully or partially owned, as a component of
cash flows from operating activities.
We review project assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be
recoverable. We consider a project commercially viable or recoverable if it is anticipated to be sold for a profit once it is either fully
developed or fully constructed. We consider a partially developed or partially constructed project commercially viable or
recoverable if the anticipated selling price is higher than the carrying value of the related project assets. We examine a number of
factors to determine if the project is expected to be recoverable, including whether there are any changes in environmental,
permitting, market pricing, regulatory, or other conditions that may impact the project. Such changes could cause the costs of the
project to increase or the selling price of the project to decrease. If a project is not considered recoverable, we impair the respective
project
91
Table of Contents
assets and adjust the carrying value to the estimated fair value, with the resulting impairment recorded within “Selling, general and
administrative” expense.
Interest Capitalization. We capitalize interest as part of the historical cost of acquiring, developing, or constructing certain assets,
including property, plant and equipment; project assets; and PV solar power systems. Interest capitalized for property, plant and
equipment or PV solar power systems is depreciated over the estimated useful life of the related assets when they are placed in
service. We charge interest capitalized for project assets to cost of sales when such assets are sold. We capitalize interest to the
extent that interest has been incurred and payments have been made to acquire, construct, or develop an asset. We cease
capitalization of interest for assets in development or under construction if the assets are substantially complete or if we have sold
such assets.
Asset Impairments. We assess long-lived assets classified as “held and used,” including our property, plant and equipment; PV solar
power systems; project assets; operating lease assets; and intangible assets, for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances arise, including consideration of technological obsolescence, that may indicate that the carrying amount of such
assets may not be recoverable. These events and changes in circumstances may include a significant decrease in the market price of
a long-lived asset; a significant adverse change in the extent or manner in which a long-lived asset is being used or in its physical
condition; a significant adverse change in the business climate that could affect the value of a long-lived asset; an accumulation of
costs significantly in excess of the amount originally expected for the acquisition or construction of a long-lived asset; a current-
period operating or cash flow loss combined with a history of such losses or a projection of future losses associated with the use of
a long-lived asset; or a current expectation that, more likely than not, a long-lived asset will be sold or otherwise disposed of
significantly before the end of its previously estimated useful life. For purposes of recognition and measurement of an impairment
loss, long-lived assets are grouped with other assets and liabilities at the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely
independent of the cash flows of other assets and liabilities.
When impairment indicators are present, we compare undiscounted future cash flows, including the eventual disposition of the
asset group at market value, to the asset group’s carrying value to determine if the asset group is recoverable. If the carrying value
of the asset group exceeds the undiscounted future cash flows, we measure any impairment by comparing the fair value of the asset
group to its carrying value. Fair value is generally determined by considering (i) internally developed discounted cash flows for the
asset group, (ii) third-party valuations, and/or (iii) information available regarding the current market value for such assets. If the
fair value of an asset group is determined to be less than its carrying value, an impairment in the amount of the difference is
recorded in the period that the impairment indicator occurs. Estimating future cash flows requires significant judgment, and such
projections may vary from the cash flows eventually realized.
We consider a long-lived asset to be abandoned after we have ceased use of the asset and we have no intent to use or repurpose it in
the future. Abandoned long-lived assets are recorded at their salvage value, if any.
We classify long-lived assets or asset groups we plan to sell, excluding project assets and PV solar power systems to be sold as part
of our ongoing operations, as held for sale on our consolidated balance sheets only after certain criteria have been met including: (i)
management has the authority and commits to a plan to sell the asset, (ii) the asset is available for immediate sale in its present
condition, (iii) an active program to locate a buyer and the plan to sell the asset have been initiated, (iv) the sale of the asset is
probable within 12 months, (v) the asset is being actively marketed at a reasonable sales price relative to its current fair value, and
(vi) it is unlikely that the plan to sell will be withdrawn or that significant changes to the plan will be made. We record assets or
asset groups held for sale at the lower of their carrying value or fair value less costs to sell. If, due to unanticipated circumstances,
such assets or asset groups are not sold in the 12 months after being classified as held for sale, then held for sale classification
would continue as long as the above criteria are still met.
Ventures and Variable Interest Entities. In the normal course of business, we establish wholly owned project companies which may
be considered variable interest entities (“VIEs”). We consolidate wholly owned VIEs when we are considered the primary
beneficiary of such entities. Additionally, we have, and may in the future form, joint
92
Table of Contents
venture type arrangements, including partnerships and partially owned limited liability companies or similar legal structures, with
one or more third parties primarily to develop, construct, own, and/or sell solar power projects. We analyze all of our ventures and
classify them into two groups: (i) ventures that must be consolidated because they are either not VIEs and we hold a majority
voting interest, or because they are VIEs and we are the primary beneficiary and (ii) ventures that do not need to be consolidated
because they are either not VIEs and we hold a minority voting interest, or because they are VIEs and we are not the primary
beneficiary.
Ventures are considered VIEs if (i) the total equity investment at risk is not sufficient to permit the entity to finance its activities
without additional subordinated financial support; (ii) as a group, the holders of the equity investment at risk lack the ability to
make certain decisions, the obligation to absorb expected losses, or the right to receive expected residual returns; or (iii) an equity
investor has voting rights that are disproportionate to its economic interest and substantially all of the entity’s activities are
conducted on behalf of that investor. Our venture agreements typically require us to fund some form of capital for the development
and construction of a project, depending upon the opportunity and the market in which our ventures are located.
We are considered the primary beneficiary of and are required to consolidate a VIE if we have the power to direct the activities that
most significantly impact the VIE’s economic performance and the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive benefits of the
VIE that could potentially be significant to the entity. If we determine that we do not have the power to direct the activities that
most significantly impact the entity, then we are not the primary beneficiary of the VIE.
Equity Method Investments. We use the equity method of accounting for our investments when we have the ability to significantly
influence, but not control, the operations or financial activities of the investee. As part of this evaluation, we consider our
participating and protective rights in the venture as well as its legal form. We record our equity method investments at cost and
subsequently adjust their carrying amount each period for our share of the earnings or losses of the investee and other adjustments
required by the equity method of accounting. We present our equity method investments within “Other assets.”
Distributions received from our equity method investments are recorded as reductions in the carrying value of such investments and
are classified on the consolidated statements of cash flows pursuant to the cumulative earnings approach. Under this approach,
distributions received are considered returns on investment and are classified as cash inflows from operating activities unless our
cumulative distributions received, less distributions received in prior periods that were determined to be returns of investment,
exceed our cumulative equity in earnings recognized from the investment. When such an excess occurs, the current period
distributions up to this excess are considered returns of investment and are classified as cash inflows from investing activities.
We monitor equity method investments for impairment and record reductions in their carrying values if the carrying amount of an
investment exceeds its fair value. An impairment charge is recorded when such impairment is deemed to be other-than-temporary.
To determine whether an impairment is other-than-temporary, we consider our ability and intent to hold the investment until the
carrying amount is fully recovered. Circumstances that indicate an other-than-temporary impairment may have occurred include
factors such as decreases in quoted market prices or declines in the operations of the investee. The evaluation of an investment for
potential impairment requires us to exercise significant judgment and to make certain assumptions. The use of different judgments
and assumptions could result in different conclusions.
Goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price of acquired businesses over the estimated fair value assigned to the
individual assets acquired and liabilities assumed. We do not amortize goodwill, but instead are required to test goodwill for
impairment at least annually. We perform impairment tests between the scheduled annual test in the fourth quarter if facts and
circumstances indicate that it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit that has goodwill is less than its carrying
value.
93
Table of Contents
We may first make a qualitative assessment of whether it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s fair value is less than its
carrying value to determine whether it is necessary to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. Such qualitative impairment
test considers various factors, including macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, cost factors, the overall
financial performance of a reporting unit, and any other relevant events affecting our company or a reporting unit. If we determine
through the qualitative assessment that a reporting unit’s fair value is more likely than not greater than its carrying value, the
quantitative impairment test is not required. If the qualitative assessment indicates it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s
fair value is less than its carrying value, we perform a quantitative impairment test. We may also elect to proceed directly to the
quantitative impairment test without considering qualitative factors.
The quantitative impairment test is the comparison of the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount, including goodwill.
Our reporting units consist of our modules and systems businesses. We define the fair value of a reporting unit as the price that
would be received to sell the unit as a whole in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. We
primarily use an income approach to estimate the fair value of our reporting units. Significant judgment is required when estimating
the fair value of a reporting unit, including the forecasting of future operating results and the selection of discount and expected
future growth rates used to determine projected cash flows. If the estimated fair value of a reporting unit exceeds its carrying value,
goodwill is not impaired, and no further analysis is required. Conversely, if the carrying value of a reporting unit exceeds its
estimated fair value, we record an impairment loss equal to the excess, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to the
reporting unit.
Intangible Assets. Intangible assets primarily include developed technologies, certain PPAs acquired after the associated PV solar
power systems were placed in service, and our internally-generated intangible assets, substantially all of which were patents on
technologies related to our products and production processes. We record an asset for patents after the patent has been issued based
on the legal, filing, and other costs incurred to secure it. We amortize intangible assets on a straight-line basis over their estimated
useful lives, which generally range from 10 to 20 years.
Leases. Upon commencement of a lease, we recognize a lease liability for the present value of the lease payments not yet paid,
discounted using an interest rate that represents our ability to borrow on a collateralized basis over a period that approximates the
lease term. We also recognize a lease asset, which represents our right to control the use of the underlying property, plant or
equipment, at an amount equal to the lease liability, adjusted for prepayments and initial direct costs.
We subsequently recognize the cost of operating leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term, and any variable lease costs,
which represent amounts owed to the lessor that are not fixed per the terms of the contract, are recognized in the period in which
they are incurred. Any costs included in our lease arrangements that are not directly related to the leased assets, such as
maintenance charges, are included as part of the lease costs. Leases with an initial term of one year or less are considered short-
term leases and are not recognized as lease assets and liabilities. We also recognize the cost of such short-term leases on a straight-
line basis over the term of the underlying agreement.
Many of our leases, in particular those related to systems project land, contain renewal or termination options that are exercisable at
our discretion. At the commencement date of a lease, we include in the lease term any periods covered by a renewal option, and
exclude from the lease term any periods covered by a termination option, to the extent we are reasonably certain to exercise such
options. In making this determination, we seek to align the lease term with the expected economic life of the underlying asset.
Deferred Revenue. When we receive consideration, or such consideration is unconditionally due, from a customer prior to
transferring goods or services to the customer under the terms of a sales contract, we record deferred revenue, which represents a
contract liability. Such deferred revenue typically results from billings in excess of costs incurred on long-term construction
contracts and advance payments received on sales of solar modules. As a
94
Table of Contents
practical expedient, we do not adjust the consideration in a contract for the effects of a significant financing component when we
expect, at contract inception, that the period between a customer’s advance payment and our transfer of a promised product or
service to the customer will be one year or less. Additionally, we do not adjust the consideration in a contract for the effects of a
significant financing component when the consideration is received as a form of performance security.
Product Warranties. We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal
use and service conditions for up to 12 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon
specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage
reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years.
Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. In resolving claims
under both the limited defect and power output warranties, we typically have the option of either repairing or replacing the covered
modules or, under the limited power output warranty, providing additional modules to remedy the power shortfall. Our limited
module warranties also include an option for us to remedy claims under such warranties, generally exercisable only after the second
year of the warranty period, by making certain cash payments. Under the limited workmanship warranty, the optional cash payment
will be equal to the original purchase price of the module, reduced by a degradation factor, and under the limited power output
warranty, the cash payment will be equal to the shortfall in power output. Such limited module warranties are standard for module
sales and may be transferred from the original purchasers of the solar modules to subsequent purchasers upon resale.
As an alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level
limited module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems
and provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty. In resolving claims under the system-level limited
module performance warranty to restore the system to warranted performance levels, we first must validate that the root cause of
the issue is due to module performance; we then have the option of either repairing or replacing the covered modules, providing
supplemental modules, or making a cash payment. Consistent with our limited module power output warranty, when we elect to
satisfy a warranty claim by providing replacement or supplemental modules under the system-level module performance warranty,
we do not have any obligation to pay for the labor to remove or install modules.
In addition to our limited solar module warranties described above, for PV solar power systems we construct, we typically provide
limited warranties for defects in engineering design, installation, and BoS part workmanship for a period of one to two years
following the substantial completion of a system or a block within the system. In resolving claims under such BoS warranties, we
have the option of remedying the defect through repair or replacement.
When we recognize revenue for module or system sales, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our limited
warranty obligations. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty installed
at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty claims, and our estimated per-module replacement
costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain quality and reliability testing and actual
performance in certain field installation sites.
Accrued Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability. Historically, we recognized expense at the time of sale for the estimated
cost of our future obligations for collecting and recycling solar modules covered by our solar module
95
Table of Contents
collection and recycling program. See Note 11. “Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability” to our consolidated financial
statements for further information.
Derivative Instruments. We recognize derivative instruments on our consolidated balance sheets at their fair value. On the date that
we enter into a derivative contract, we designate the derivative instrument as a fair value hedge, a cash flow hedge, a hedge of a net
investment in a foreign operation, or a derivative instrument that will not be accounted for using hedge accounting methods. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, all of our derivative instruments were designated either as cash flow hedges or as derivative
instruments not accounted for using hedge accounting methods.
We record changes in the fair value of a derivative instrument that is highly effective and that is designated and qualifies as a cash
flow hedge in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” until our earnings are affected by the variability of the cash flows from the
underlying hedged item. We record any amounts excluded from effectiveness testing in current period earnings in the same income
statement line item in which the earnings effect of the hedged item is reported. We report changes in the fair value of derivative
instruments that are not designated or do not qualify for hedge accounting in current period earnings. We classify cash flows from
derivative instruments on the consolidated statements of cash flows in the same category as the item being hedged or on a basis
consistent with the nature of the instrument.
At the inception of a hedge, we formally document all relationships between hedging instruments and the underlying hedged items
as well as our risk-management objective and strategy for undertaking the hedge transaction. We also formally assess (both at
inception and on an ongoing basis) whether our derivative instruments are highly effective in offsetting changes in the fair value or
cash flows of the underlying hedged items and whether those derivatives are expected to remain highly effective in future periods.
When we determine that a derivative instrument is not highly effective as a hedge, we discontinue hedge accounting prospectively.
In all situations in which we discontinue hedge accounting and the derivative instrument remains outstanding, we carry the
derivative instrument at its fair value on our consolidated balance sheets and recognize subsequent changes in its fair value in
current period earnings.
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income or Loss. Our accumulated other comprehensive income or loss includes foreign
currency translation adjustments, unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale debt securities, and unrealized gains and losses
on derivative instruments designated and qualifying as cash flow hedges. We record these components of accumulated other
comprehensive income or loss net of tax and release such tax effects when the underlying components affect earnings.
Revenue Recognition – Module Sales. We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of
such products to the customer, which typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying
contracts.
Revenue Recognition – Solar Power System Sales and/or EPC Services. We recognize revenue for the sale of a development
project, which excludes EPC services, or for the sale of a completed system when we enter into the associated sales contract with
the customer. For EPC services, or sales of solar power systems with EPC services, we recognize revenue over time as our
performance creates or enhances an energy generation asset controlled by the customer. Furthermore, the sale of a solar power
system combined with EPC services represents a single performance obligation for the development and construction of a single
generation asset. For such arrangements, we recognize revenue and gross profit as work is performed using cost based input
methods, for which we determine our progress toward contract completion based on the relationship between the actual costs
incurred and the total estimated costs (including solar module costs) of the contract. Such revenue recognition is dependent, in part,
on our customers’ commitment to perform their obligations under the contract, which is typically measured through the receipt of
cash deposits or other forms of financial security issued by creditworthy financial institutions or parent entities.
96
Table of Contents
Cost based input methods of revenue recognition are considered a faithful depiction of our efforts to satisfy long-term construction
contracts and therefore reflect the transfer of goods to a customer under such contracts. Costs incurred that do not contribute to
satisfying our performance obligations (i.e., “inefficient costs”) are excluded from our input methods of revenue recognition as the
amounts are not reflective of our transferring control of the system to the customer. Costs incurred toward contract completion may
include costs associated with solar modules, direct materials, labor, subcontractors, and other indirect costs related to contract
performance. We recognize solar module and direct material costs as incurred when such items are installed in a system.
Cost based input methods of revenue recognition require us to make estimates of net contract revenues and costs to complete our
projects. In making such estimates, significant judgment is required to evaluate assumptions related to the amount of net contract
revenues, including the impact of any performance incentives, liquidated damages, and other payments to customers. Significant
judgment is also required to evaluate assumptions related to the costs to complete our projects, including materials, labor,
contingencies, and other system costs. If the estimated total costs on any contract, including any inefficient costs, are greater than
the net contract revenues, we recognize the entire estimated loss in the period the loss becomes known. The cumulative effect of
revisions to estimates related to net contract revenues or costs to complete contracts are recorded in the period in which the
revisions to estimates are identified and the amounts can be reasonably estimated. The effect of the changes on future periods are
recognized as if the revised estimates had been used since revenue was initially recognized under the contract. Such revisions could
occur in any reporting period, and the effects may be material depending on the size of the contracts or the changes in estimates.
As part of our solar power system sales, we conduct performance testing of a system prior to substantial completion to confirm the
system meets its operational and capacity expectations noted in the EPC agreement. In addition, we may provide an energy
performance test during the first or second year of a system’s operation to demonstrate that the actual energy generation for the
applicable period meets or exceeds the modeled energy expectation, after certain adjustments. In certain instances, a bonus payment
may be received at the end of the applicable test period if the system performs above a specified level. Conversely, if there is an
underperformance event with regards to these tests, we may incur liquidated damages as a percentage of the EPC contract price.
Such performance guarantees represent a form of variable consideration and are estimated at contract inception at their most likely
amount and updated at the end of each reporting period as additional performance data becomes available and only to the extent
that it is probable that a significant reversal of any incremental revenue will not occur.
Revenue Recognition – Operations and Maintenance. We recognize revenue for standard, recurring O&M services over time as
customers receive and consume the benefits of such services, which typically include 24/7 system monitoring, certain PPA and
other agreement compliance, NERC compliance, large generator interconnection agreement compliance, energy forecasting,
performance engineering analysis, regular performance reporting, turn-key maintenance services including spare parts and
corrective maintenance repair, warranty management, and environmental services. Other ancillary O&M services, such as
equipment replacement, weed abatement, landscaping, or solar module cleaning, are recognized as revenue as the services are
provided to the customer. Costs of O&M services are expensed in the period in which they are incurred.
As part of our O&M service offerings, we typically offer an effective availability guarantee, which stipulates that a system will be
available to generate a certain percentage of total possible energy during a specific period after adjusting for factors outside our
control as the service provider. If system availability exceeds a contractual threshold, we may receive a bonus payment, or if system
availability falls below a separate threshold, we may incur liquidated damages for certain lost energy under the PPA. Such bonuses
or liquidated damages represent a form of variable consideration and are estimated and recognized over time as customers receive
and consume the benefits of the O&M services.
97
Table of Contents
Revenue Recognition – Energy Generation. We sell energy generated by PV solar power systems under PPAs or on an open
contract basis. For energy sold under PPAs, we recognize revenue each period based on the volume of energy delivered to the
customer (i.e., the PPA off-taker) and the price stated in the PPA. For energy sold on an open contract basis, we recognize revenue
at the point in time the energy is delivered to the grid based on the prevailing spot market prices.
Shipping and Handling Costs. We account for shipping and handling activities related to contracts with customers as costs to fulfill
our promise to transfer the associated products. Accordingly, we record amounts billed for shipping and handling costs as a
component of net sales, and classify such costs as a component of cost of sales.
Taxes Collected from Customers and Remitted to Governmental Authorities. We exclude from our measurement of transaction
prices all taxes assessed by governmental authorities that are both (i) imposed on and concurrent with a specific revenue-producing
transaction and (ii) collected from customers. Accordingly, such tax amounts are not included as a component of net sales or cost of
sales.
Research and Development. We incur research and development costs during the process of researching and developing new
products and enhancing our existing products, technologies, and manufacturing processes. Our research and development costs
consist primarily of employee compensation, materials, outside services, and depreciation. We expense these costs as incurred until
the resulting product has been completed, tested, and made ready for commercial manufacturing.
Production Start-Up. Production start-up expense consists primarily of employee compensation and other costs associated with
operating a production line before it is qualified for full production, including the cost of raw materials for solar modules run
through the production line during the qualification phase and applicable facility related costs. Costs related to equipment upgrades
and implementation of manufacturing process improvements are also included in production start-up expense as well as costs
related to the selection of a new site, related legal and regulatory costs, and costs to maintain our plant replication program to the
extent we cannot capitalize these expenditures.
Share-Based Compensation. We recognize share-based compensation expense for the estimated grant-date fair value of equity
awards issued as compensation to employees over the requisite service period, which is generally four years. For awards with
performance conditions, we recognize share-based compensation expense if it is probable that the performance conditions will be
achieved. We account for forfeitures of share-based awards as such forfeitures occur. Accordingly, when an associate’s employment
is terminated, all previously unvested awards granted to such associate are forfeited, which results in a benefit to share-based
compensation expense in the period of such associate’s termination equal to the cumulative expense recorded through the
termination date for the unvested awards. We recognize share-based compensation expense for awards with graded vesting
schedules on a straight-line basis over the requisite service periods for each separately vesting portion of the award as if each award
was in substance multiple awards.
Foreign Currency Translation. The functional currencies of certain of our foreign subsidiaries are their local currencies.
Accordingly, we apply period-end exchange rates to translate their assets and liabilities and daily transaction exchange rates to
translate their revenues, expenses, gains, and losses into U.S. dollars. We include the associated translation adjustments as a
separate component of “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” within stockholders’ equity. The functional currency of our
subsidiaries in Canada, Chile, Malaysia, Singapore, and Vietnam is the U.S. dollar; therefore, we do not translate their financial
statements. Gains and losses arising from the remeasurement of monetary assets and liabilities denominated in currencies other than
a subsidiary’s functional currency are included in “Foreign currency (loss) income, net” in the period in which they occur.
98
Table of Contents
Income Taxes. We use the asset and liability method to account for income taxes whereby we calculate deferred tax assets or
liabilities using the enacted tax rates and tax law applicable to when any temporary differences are expected to reverse. We
establish valuation allowances, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the extent it is more likely than not that such
deferred tax assets will not be realized. We do not provide deferred taxes related to the U.S. GAAP basis in excess of the
outside tax basis in the investment in our foreign subsidiaries to the extent such amounts relate to indefinitely reinvested earnings
and profits of such foreign subsidiaries.
Income tax expense includes (i) deferred tax expense, which generally represents the net change in deferred tax assets or liabilities
during the year plus any change in valuation allowances, and (ii) current tax expense, which represents the amount of tax currently
payable to or receivable from taxing authorities. We only recognize tax benefits related to uncertain tax positions that are more
likely than not of being sustained upon examination. For those positions that satisfy such recognition criteria, the amount of tax
benefit that we recognize is the largest amount of tax benefit that is more likely than not of being sustained on ultimate settlement
of the uncertain tax position.
Per Share Data. Basic net income or loss per share is computed by dividing net income or loss by the weighted-average number of
common shares outstanding for the period. Diluted net income per share is computed giving effect to all potentially dilutive
common shares, including restricted and performance stock units and stock purchase plan shares, unless there is a net loss for the
period. In computing diluted net income per share, we utilize the treasury stock method.
3. Recent Accounting Pronouncements
In June 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) 2016-13, Financial
Instruments – Credit Losses (Topic 326), to provide financial statement users with more useful information about expected credit
losses. ASU 2016-13 replaces the historical incurred loss model with a model that reflects current expected credit losses (“CECL”),
which requires consideration of a broader range of information to measure credit losses and determine the timing of when such
losses are recorded. The CECL model is applicable to certain financial assets measured at amortized cost that subject us to credit
risk, including cash equivalents, trade accounts receivable, unbilled accounts receivable and retainage, and notes receivable. In
addition, ASU 2016-13 amended certain aspects of the accounting for available-for-sale debt securities, including the presentation
of credit losses as an allowance against, rather than a write-down of, the fair value of such securities. Furthermore, a credit loss is
only considered when a security is in an unrealized loss position, is limited to the difference between such security’s fair value and
amortized cost basis, and is recorded directly to “Other expense, net.” Any remaining unrealized loss is recorded to “Accumulated
other comprehensive loss” until realized.
We adopted ASU 2016-13 in the first quarter of 2020 using the modified-retrospective approach, which resulted in the recognition
of an initial allowance for credit losses for our various financial assets through a cumulative-effect adjustment that decreased
retained earnings by $9.2 million, net of tax, as of January 1, 2020.
See Note 5. “Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Marketable Securities,” Note 6. “Restricted Marketable Securities,” and Note 7.
“Consolidated Balance Sheet Details” to our consolidated financial statements for further information about the allowance for
credit losses associated with our various financial assets.
99
Table of Contents
4. Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill
Goodwill for the relevant reporting unit consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
December 31,
2019Acquisitions
(Impairments)December 31,
2020
Modules $ 407,827  $ — $ 407,827  
Accumulated impairment losses (393,365 ) — (393,365 )
Total $ 14,462  $ — $ 14,462  
December 31,
2018Acquisitions
(Impairments)December 31,
2019
Modules $ 407,827  $ — $ 407,827  
Accumulated impairment losses (393,365 ) — (393,365 )
Total $ 14,462  $ — $ 14,462  
We performed our annual impairment analysis in the fourth quarter of 2020, 2019, and 2018. ASC 350-20 allows companies to
perform a qualitative assessment of whether it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s fair value is less than its carrying value
to determine whether it is necessary to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. Such qualitative assessment considers
various factors, including macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, cost factors, the overall financial
performance of a reporting unit, and any other relevant events affecting our company or a reporting unit.
We performed a qualitative assessment for our modules reporting unit in each respective period and concluded that it was not more
likely than not that the fair value of the reporting unit was less than its carrying amount. Accordingly, a quantitative goodwill
impairment test for this reporting unit was not required in any period presented.
Intangible assets, net
The following tables summarize our intangible assets at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
December 31, 2020
 Gross AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net Amount
Developed technology $ 99,964  $ (52,115)$ 47,849  
Power purchase agreements 6,486  (1,296 ) 5,190  
Patents 8,173  (5,074 ) 3,099  
Total $ 114,623  $ (58,485 )$ 56,138  
December 31, 2019
 Gross AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net Amount
Developed technology $ 97,964  $ (42,344 )$ 55,620  
Power purchase agreements 6,486  (972) 5,514  
Patents 7,780  (4,371 ) 3,409  
Total $ 112,230  $ (47,687 )$ 64,543  
Amortization of intangible assets was $10.8 million, $10.2 million, and $9.9 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019,
and 2018, respectively.
100
Table of Contents
Estimated future amortization expense for our definite-lived intangible assets was as follows at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
Amortization
Expense
2021 $ 10,935  
2022 10,91 1 
2023 10,626  
2024 10,497  
2025 4,026  
Thereafter 9,143  
Total amortization expense $ 56,138  
5. Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Marketable Securities
Cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
2020 2019
Cash and cash equivalents:
Cash $ 1,227,000  $ 1,345,419  
Money market funds 2 7,322  
Total cash and cash equivalents 1,227,002  1,352,741  
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt 214,254  387,820  
Foreign government obligations — 22,01 1 
U.S. debt 14,543  66,134  
Time deposits 291,269  335,541  
Total marketable securities 520,066  811,506  
Total cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities $ 1,747,068  $ 2,164,247  
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash reported within our consolidated balance
sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 to the total of such amounts as presented in the consolidated statements of cash flows (in
thousands):
Balance Sheet Line Item 2020 2019
Cash and cash equivalents Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,227,002  $ 1,352,741  
Restricted cash – current Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,745  13,697  
Restricted cash – noncurrent Other assets 44,847  80,072  
Total cash, cash equivalents, and restricted cash $ 1,273,594  $ 1,446,510  
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we sold marketable securities for proceeds of $188.1 million and realized gains of $0.2
million on such sales. During the year ended December 31, 2019, we sold marketable securities for proceeds of $52.0 million and
realized no gain or loss on such sales. During the year ended December 31, 2018, we sold marketable securities for proceeds of
$10.8 million and realized gains of less than $0.1 million on such sales. See Note 10. “Fair Value Measurements” to our
consolidated financial statements for information about the fair value of our marketable securities.
101
Table of Contents
The following tables summarize the unrealized gains and losses related to our available-for-sale marketable securities, by major
security type, as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 As of December 31, 2020
Amortized
 CostUnrealized
 GainsUnrealized
 LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
 Value
Foreign debt $ 213,949  $ 367 $ 46 $ 16 $ 214,254  
U.S. debt 14,521  22 — — 14,543  
Time deposits 291,374  — — 105 291,269  
Total $ 519,844  $ 389 $ 46 $ 121 $ 520,066  
 As of December 31, 2019
Amortized
 CostUnrealized
 GainsUnrealized
 LossesFair
 Value
Foreign debt $ 387,775  $ 551 $ 506 $ 387,820  
Foreign government obligations 21,991  20 — 22,01 1 
U.S. debt 65,970  176 12 66,134  
Time deposits 335,541  — — 335,541  
Total $ 811,277  $ 747 $ 518 $ 811,506  
The following table presents the change in allowance for credit losses related to our available-for-sale marketable securities for the
year ended December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
Marketable
Securities
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ — 
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment for the adoption of ASU 2016-13 207 
Provision for credit losses, net 326 
Sales and maturities of marketable securities (412)
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ 121 
The contractual maturities of our marketable securities as of December 31, 2020 were as follows (in thousands):
Fair
 Value
One year or less $ 407,491  
One year to two years 109,553  
Two years to three years 3,022  
Total $ 520,066  
6. Restricted Marketable Securities
Restricted marketable securities consisted of the following as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
2020 2019
Foreign government obligations $ 149,700  $ 126,066  
U.S. government obligations 115,580  97,719  
Total restricted marketable securities $ 265,280  $ 223,785  
Our restricted marketable securities represent long-term marketable securities held in custodial accounts to fund the estimated
future cost of collecting and recycling modules covered under our solar module collection and recycling program. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, such custodial accounts also included noncurrent restricted cash
102
Table of Contents
balances of $0.7 million and less than $0.1 million, respectively, which were reported within “Other assets.” As necessary, we fund
any incremental amounts for our estimated collection and recycling obligations on an annual basis based on the estimated costs of
collecting and recycling covered modules, estimated rates of return on our restricted marketable securities, and an estimated solar
module life of 25 years, less amounts already funded in prior years. We have established a trust under which estimated funds are
put into custodial accounts with an established and reputable bank, for which First Solar, Inc.; First Solar Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.; and
First Solar Manufacturing GmbH are grantors. Trust funds may be disbursed for qualified module collection and recycling costs
(including capital and facility related recycling costs), payments to customers for assuming collection and recycling obligations,
and reimbursements of any overfunded amounts. Investments in the trust must meet certain investment quality criteria comparable
to highly rated government or agency bonds.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we sold certain restricted marketable securities for proceeds of $115.2 million and
realized gains of $15.1 million on such sales, and repurchased $114.5 million of restricted marketable securities as part of our
ongoing management of the custodial accounts. During the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we sold certain restricted
marketable securities for proceeds of $281.6 million and $231.1 million, respectively, and realized gains of $40.6 million and $55.4
million, respectively, on such sales as part of an effort to align the currencies of the investments with those corresponding collection
and recycling liabilities and disburse $22.2 million and $143.1 million, respectively, of overfunded amounts. See Note 10. “Fair
Value Measurements” to our consolidated financial statements for information about the fair value of our restricted marketable
securities.
The following tables summarize the unrealized gains and losses related to our restricted marketable securities, by major security
type, as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 As of December 31, 2020
Amortized
 CostUnrealized
 GainsUnrealized
 LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
 Value
Foreign government obligations $ 131,980  $ 17,720  $ — $ — $ 149,700  
U.S. government obligations 115,648  133 188 13 115,580  
Total $ 247,628  $ 17,853  $ 188 $ 13 $ 265,280  
 As of December 31, 2019
Amortized
 CostUnrealized
 GainsUnrealized
 LossesFair
 Value
Foreign government obligations $ 129,499  $ — $ 3,433  $ 126,066  
U.S. government obligations 99,700  — 1,981  97,719  
Total $ 229,199  $ — $ 5,414  $ 223,785  
The following table represents the change in the allowance for credit losses related to our restricted marketable securities for the
year ended December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
Restricted
Marketable
Securities
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ — 
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment for the adoption of ASU 2016-13 54 
Provision for credit losses, net (16)
Sales of restricted marketable securities (25)
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ 13 
As of December 31, 2020, the contractual maturities of our restricted marketable securities were between 9 years and 21 years.
103
Table of Contents
7. Consolidated Balance Sheet Details
Accounts receivable trade, net
Accounts receivable trade, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Accounts receivable trade, gross $ 269,095  $ 476,425  
Allowance for credit losses (3,009 ) (1,386 )
Accounts receivable trade, net $ 266,086  $ 475,039  
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, $24.4 million and $44.9 million, respectively, of our trade accounts receivable were secured by
letters of credit, bank guarantees, surety bonds, or other forms of financial security issued by creditworthy financial institutions.
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Accounts receivable, unbilled $ 26,673  $ 162,057  
Retainage — 21,416  
Allowance for credit losses (303) — 
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net $ 26,370  $ 183,473  
Allowance for credit losses
The following table presents the change in the allowances for credit losses related to our accounts receivable for the year ended
December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
Accounts
Receivable TradeAccounts
Receivable,
Unbilled and
Retainage
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ (1,386 )$ — 
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment for the adoption of ASU 2016-13 (171) (459)
Provision for credit losses, net (1) (2,030 ) (19)
Writeof fs 578 175 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ (3,009 )$ (303)
——————————
(1) Includes credit losses for trade accounts receivable and unbilled accounts receivable of $2.2 million and $0.2 million, respectively , to
reflect our estimate of expected credit losses attribu table to the current economic conditions resulting from the ongoing COVID-19
pandemic.
104
Table of Contents
Inventories
Inventories consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Raw materials $ 292,334  $ 248,756  
Work in process 64,709  59,924  
Finished goods 411,773  295,479  
Inventories $ 768,816  $ 604,159  
Inventories – current $ 567,587  $ 443,513  
Inventories – noncurrent $ 201,229  $ 160,646  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets
Prepaid expenses and other current assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Prepaid expenses $ 160,534  $ 137,927  
Prepaid income taxes 71,051  47,81 1 
Derivative instruments (1) 3,315  1,199  
Indirect tax receivables 1,827  29,908  
Restricted cash 1,745  13,697  
Notes receivable, net (2) — 23,873  
Other current assets 13,237  22,040  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets $ 251,709  $ 276,455  
——————————
(1) See Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our derivative instruments.
(2) In November 2014 and February 2016, we entered into a term loan agreement and a convertible loan agreement, respectively , with
Clean Energy Collective, LLC (“CEC”). Our term loan bears interest at 16% per annum, and our convertible loan bears interest at 10%
per annum. In November 2018, we amended the terms of the loan agreements to (i) extend their maturity  to June 2020, (ii) waive the
conversion features on our convertible loan, and (iii) increase the frequency of interest payments, subject to certain conditions.
As of Decem ber 31, 2019, the aggregate balance outstanding on the loans was $23.9 million. Upon the adoption of ASU 2016-13, we
evaluated the estimated credit losses over the remaining contractual term of the loan agreements based on a discounted cash flow model.
As a result of this evaluation, we recorded an allowance for credit losses of $10.8 millio n as of January 1, 2020. During 2020, we
recorded incremental credit losses of $13.1 millio n due to CEC’ s inability to repay the loans by their contractual maturity date, and
wrote off the aggregate outstanding loan balance against the associated allowance for credit losses based on our determination that the
loans are uncollectible.
105
Table of Contents
Property, plant and equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Land $ 14,498  $ 14,241  
Buildings and improvements 693,762  664,266  
Machinery and equipment 2,184,236  2,436,997  
Office equipment and furniture 143,685  159,848  
Leasehold improvements 41,459  48,772  
Construction in progress 419,766  243,107  
Property , plant and equipment, gross 3,497,406  3,567,231  
Accumulated depreciation (1,095,121 ) (1,386,082 )
Property , plant and equipment, net $ 2,402,285  $ 2,181,149  
We assess our property, plant and equipment for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances arise that may indicate
that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. We consider a long-lived asset to be abandoned after we have
ceased use of the asset and we have no intent to use or repurpose it in the future, and such abandoned assets are recorded at their
salvage value, if any. During 2020, we recorded an impairment loss of $17.4 million in “Cost of sales” for certain abandoned
module manufacturing equipment, including framing and assembly tools, as such equipment was no longer compatible with our
long-term module technology roadmap.
Depreciation of property, plant and equipment was $198.9 million, $176.4 million, and $109.1 million for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
PV solar power systems, net
PV solar power systems, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
2020 2019
PV solar power systems, gross $ 298,067  $ 530,004  
Accumulated depreciation (54,671 ) (53,027 )
PV solar power systems, net $ 243,396  $ 476,977  
Depreciation of PV solar power systems was $19.6 million, $18.7 million, and $15.3 million for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
Project assets
Project assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Project assets – development costs, including project acquisition and land costs $ 176,346  $ 254,466  
Project assets – construction costs 197,031  82,654  
Project assets $ 373,377  $ 337,120  
Project assets – current $ — $ 3,524  
Project assets – noncurrent $ 373,377  $ 333,596  
106
Table of Contents
Capitalized interest
The components of interest expense and capitalized interest were as follows during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and
2018 (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Interest cost incurred $ (25,834 )$ (29,656 )$ (31,752 )
Interest cost capitalized – project assets 1,798  2,590  5,831  
Interest expense, net $ (24,036 )$ (27,066 )$ (25,921 )
Other assets
Other assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Operating lease assets (1) $ 226,664  $ 145,71 1 
Advanced payments for raw materials 97,883  59,806  
Restricted cash 44,847  80,072  
Accounts receivable, unbilled 22,722  — 
Indirect tax receivables 14,849  9,446  
Notes receivable (2) 350 8,194  
Income taxes receivable 36 4,106  
Other 26,779  22,591  
Other assets $ 434,130  $ 329,926  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
(2) In April 2009, we entered into a credit facility agree ment with a solar power project entity of one of our customers for an available
amount of € 17.5 millio n to provide financin g for a PV solar power system. The credit facility bore interest at 8.0% per annum, payable
quarterly , and the full amount was due in December 2026. As of December 31, 2019, the balance outstand ing on the credit facility was
€7.0 million ($ 7.8 million). In October 2020, the project entity repaid the outstanding balance of the credit facility . The rema ining notes
receivable balance relates to a separate arrangement with another third party .
Assets and liabilities held for sale
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our O&M services business,
we received an offer to purchase certain portions of the business and determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to
pursue this transaction. As a result, in August 2020 we entered into an agreement with Clairvest for the sale of our North American
O&M operations. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of
certain third-party consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect
the sale to be completed in the first half of 2021. Accordingly, we classified the assets and liabilities we expect to transfer to
Clairvest as assets held for sale and liabilities held for sale on our consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2020.
Following an evaluation of the long-term cost structure, competitiveness, and risk-adjusted returns of our U.S. project development
business, we have determined it is in the best interest of our stockholders to pursue the sale of this business. On January 24, 2021,
we entered into an agreement with OMERS for the sale of our U.S. project development operations, which comprises the business
of developing, contracting for the construction of, and selling utility-scale PV solar power systems. The transaction includes our
approximately 10 GW utility-scale solar project pipeline, including the advanced-stage Horizon, Madison, Ridgely, Rabbitbrush,
and Oak Trail projects that are expected to commence construction in the next two years; the 30 MW Barilla Solar project, which
is operational; and certain other equipment. In addition, OMERS has agreed to certain module purchase commitments. TheAC
AC
107
Table of Contents
completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approval from
FERC, the expiration of the mandatory waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the transaction by CFIUS, and other
customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be completed in the first half
of 2021. Accordingly, we classified the assets and liabilities we expect to transfer to OMERS upon completion of this transaction as
assets held for sale and liabilities held for sale on our consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2020.
The following table summarizes our assets and liabilities held for sale at December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
Operations &
MaintenanceProject
Development Total
Cash and cash equivalents $ — $ 2,037  $ 2,037  
Accounts receivable trade, net 16,537  75 16,612  
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net 3,687  — 3,687  
Inventories 243 — 243 
Balance of systems parts 72 34,173  34,245  
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 12,577  1,169  13,746  
Property , plant and equipment, net 5,577  215 5,792  
PV solar power systems, net — 10,997  10,997  
Project assets — 65,660  65,660  
Other assets 25 2,641  2,666  
Assets held for sale $ 38,718  $ 116,967  $ 155,685  
Accounts payable $ 2,692  $ 299 $ 2,991  
Accrued expenses 4,357  1,236  5,593  
Deferred revenue 2,730  — 2,730  
Other current liabilities 944 960 1,904  
Other liabilities 4,350  8,053  12,403  
Liabilities held for sale $ 15,073  $ 10,548  $ 25,621  
Accrued expenses
Accrued expenses consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Accrued project costs $ 81,380  $ 91,971  
Accrued property , plant and equipment 66,543  42,834  
Accrued compensation and benefits 51,685  65,170  
Accrued inventory 25,704  39,366  
Product warranty liability (1) 22,278  20,291  
Other 62,877  91,628  
Accrued expenses $ 310,467  $ 351,260  
——————————
(1)    See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our “Product W arranties.”
108
Table of Contents
Other current liabilities
Other current liabilities consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Other taxes payable $ 30,041  $ 994 
Operating lease liabilities (1) 14,006  11,102  
Derivative instruments (2) 5,280  2,582  
Contingent consideration (3) 2,243  2,395  
Other 31,467  11,057  
Other current liabilities $ 83,037  $ 28,130  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
(2) See Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our derivative instruments.
(3) See Note 13. “Commitm ents and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our “Contingent
Consideration” arrangements.
Other liabilities
Other liabilities consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Operating lease liabilities (1) $ 189,034  $ 112,515  
Product warranty liability (2) 72,818  109,506  
Deferred revenue 44,919  71,438  
Deferred tax liabilities, net (3) 23,671  6,493  
Other taxes payable 6,515  90,201  
Derivative instruments (4) 341 7,439  
Transition tax liability (5) — 70,047  
Contingent consideration (2) — 4,500  
Other 34,928  36,627  
Other liabilities $ 372,226  $ 508,766  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
(2) See Note 13. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our “Product Warranties”
and “Contingent Consideration” arrangements.
(3) See Note 17. “Income T axes” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our net deferred tax assets and liabilities.
(4) See Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our derivative instruments.
(5) See Note 17. “Income Taxes” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of the one-time transition tax on accumulated
earnings of foreign subsidiaries as a result of the T ax Act.
109
Table of Contents
8. Derivative Financial Instruments
As a global company, we are exposed in the normal course of business to interest rate, foreign currency, and commodity price risks
that could affect our financial position, results of operations, and cash flows. We use derivative instruments to hedge against these
risks and only hold such instruments for hedging purposes, not for speculative or trading purposes.
Depending on the terms of the specific derivative instruments and market conditions, some of our derivative instruments may be
assets and others liabilities at any particular balance sheet date. We report all of our derivative instruments at fair value and account
for changes in the fair value of derivative instruments within “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” if the derivative instruments
qualify for hedge accounting. For those derivative instruments that do not qualify for hedge accounting (i.e., “economic hedges”),
we record the changes in fair value directly to earnings. See Note 10. “Fair Value Measurements” to our consolidated financial
statements for information about the techniques we use to measure the fair value of our derivative instruments.
The following tables present the fair values of derivative instruments included in our consolidated balance sheets as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
 December 31, 2020
 Prepaid Expenses
and Other
Current AssetsOther Current
Liabilities Other Liabilities
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:   
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ — $ 2,504  $ 341 
Commodity swap contracts 1,478  — — 
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments $ 1,478  $ 2,504  $ 341 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:   
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 1,837  $ 2,776  $ — 
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 1,837  $ 2,776  $ — 
Total derivative instruments $ 3,315  $ 5,280  $ 341 
 December 31, 2019
 Prepaid Expenses
and Other
Current Assets Other AssetsOther Current
Liabilities Other Liabilities
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:    
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 226 $ 139 $ 369 $ 230 
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments $ 226 $ 139 $ 369 $ 230 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:    
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 973 $ — $ 1,807  $ — 
Interest rate swap contracts — $ — 406 7,209  
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 973 $ — $ 2,213  $ 7,209  
Total derivative instruments $ 1,199  $ 139 $ 2,582  $ 7,439  
110
Table of Contents
The following table presents the pretax amounts related to derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges affecting
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and our consolidated statements of operations for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
Foreign Exchange
Forward
ContractsCommodity Swap
Contracts Total
Balance as of December 31, 2017 $ (1,723 )$ — $ (1,723 )
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) (3,760 ) — (3,760 )
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Net sales 1,698  — 1,698  
Cost of sales 212 — 212 
Foreign currency (loss) income, net 5,448  — 5,448  
Other (expense) income, net (546) — (546)
Balance as of December 31, 2018 1,329  — 1,329  
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) (1,086 ) — (1,086 )
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Net sales (124) — (124)
Cost of sales (1,081 ) — (1,081 )
Balance as of December 31, 2019 (962) — (962)
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) (3,881 ) 1,472  (2,409 )
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Cost of sales 1,199  — 1,199  
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ (3,644 )$ 1,472  $ (2,172 )
During the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, we recognized unrealized gains of $1.2 million and $0.8 million,
respectively, within “Cost of sales” for amounts excluded from effectiveness testing for our foreign exchange forward contracts
designated as cash flow hedges. During the year ended December 31, 2018, we recognized unrealized gains of $0.5 million within
“Other (expense) income, net” for amounts excluded from effectiveness testing for our foreign exchange forward contracts
designated as cash flow hedges. We recorded no amounts related to ineffective portions of our derivative instruments designated as
cash flow hedges during the year ended December 31, 2018.
The following table presents gains and losses related to derivative instruments not designated as hedges affecting our consolidated
statements of operations for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income
Income Statement Line Item 2020 2019 2018
Interest rate swap contracts Cost of sales $ — $ (1,656 )$ — 
Foreign exchange forward contracts Cost of sales (462) — — 
Foreign exchange forward contracts Foreign currency (loss) income, net (6,317 ) 3,716  12,113 
Interest rate swap contracts Interest expense, net (7,259 ) (8,532 ) (8,643 )
Interest Rate Risk
We primarily use interest rate swap contracts to mitigate our exposure to interest rate fluctuations associated with certain of our
debt instruments. We do not use such swap contracts for speculative or trading purposes. During the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019, and 2018, the majority of our interest rate swap contracts related to project specific debt facilities. Such swap contracts
did not qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815 due to our expectation to sell the associated
projects before the maturity of their project specific debt
111
Table of Contents
financings and corresponding swap contracts. Accordingly, changes in the fair values of these swap contracts were recorded
directly to “Interest expense, net.”
In December 2019, FS Japan Project 31 GK, our indirectly wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into an interest
rate swap contract to hedge a portion of the floating rate term loan facility under the project’s Anamizu Credit Agreement (as
defined in Note 12. “Debt” to our consolidated financial statements). Such swap had an initial notional value of ¥0.9 billion and
entitled the project to receive a six-month floating Tokyo Interbank Offered Rate (“TIBOR”) plus 0.70% interest rate while
requiring the project to pay a fixed rate of 1.1925%. In September 2020, we completed the sale of our Anamizu project, and its
interest rate swap contract and outstanding loan balance were assumed by the customer. As of December 31, 2019, the notional
value of the interest rate swap contract was ¥0.9 billion ($8.0 million).
In January 2017, FS Japan Project 12 GK, our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into an interest rate
swap contract to hedge a portion of the floating rate senior loan facility under the project’s Ishikawa Credit Agreement (as defined
in Note 12. “Debt” to our consolidated financial statements). Such swap had an initial notional value of ¥5.7 billion and entitled the
project to receive a six-month floating TIBOR plus 0.75% interest rate while requiring the project to pay a fixed rate of 1.482%. In
September 2020, we repaid the remaining loan balance and settled the swap contract prior to completing the sale of our Ishikawa
project. As of December 31, 2019, the notional value of the interest rate swap contract was ¥18.7 billion ($171.7 million).
Foreign Currency Risk
Cash Flow Exposure
We expect certain of our subsidiaries to have future cash flows that will be denominated in currencies other than the subsidiaries’
functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the other currencies
in which they transact will cause fluctuations in the cash flows we expect to receive or pay when these cash flows are realized or
settled. Accordingly, we enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to hedge a portion of these forecasted cash flows. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, these foreign exchange forward contracts hedged our forecasted cash flows for periods up to 20
months and 22 months, respectively. These foreign exchange forward contracts qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in
accordance with ASC 815, and we designated them as such. We report unrealized gains or losses on such contracts in
“Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and subsequently reclassify applicable amounts into earnings when the hedged
transaction occurs and impacts earnings. We determined that these derivative financial instruments were highly effective as cash
flow hedges as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the notional values associated with our foreign exchange forward contracts qualifying as cash
flow hedges were as follows (notional amounts and U.S. dollar equivalents in millions):
December 31, 2020
Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
U.S. dollar (1) $43.4 $43.4
December 31, 2019
Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
U.S. dollar (1) $69.9 $69.9
——————————
(1) These derivative instruments represent hedges of outstanding payables denominated in U.S. dollars at certain of our foreign subsidiaries
whose functional currencies are other than the U.S. dollar .
112
Table of Contents
In the following 12 months, we expect to reclassify to earnings $3.3 million of net unrealized loss related to foreign exchange
forward contracts that are included in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” at December 31, 2020 as we realize the earnings
effects of the related forecasted transactions. The amount we ultimately record to earnings will depend on the actual exchange rates
when we realize the related forecasted transactions.
Transaction Exposure and Economic Hedging
Many of our subsidiaries have assets and liabilities (primarily cash, receivables, deferred taxes, payables, accrued expenses, and
solar module collection and recycling liabilities) that are denominated in currencies other than the subsidiaries’ functional
currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the other currencies in which
these assets and liabilities are denominated will create fluctuations in our reported consolidated statements of operations and cash
flows. We may enter into foreign exchange forward contracts or other financial instruments to economically hedge assets and
liabilities against the effects of currency exchange rate fluctuations. The gains and losses on such foreign exchange forward
contracts will economically offset all or part of the transaction gains and losses that we recognize in earnings on the related foreign
currency denominated assets and liabilities.
We also enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to economically hedge balance sheet and other exposures related to
transactions between certain of our subsidiaries and transactions with third parties. Such contracts are considered economic hedges
and do not qualify for hedge accounting. Accordingly, we recognize gains or losses from the fluctuations in foreign exchange rates
and the fair value of these derivative contracts in “Foreign currency (loss) income, net” on our consolidated statements of
operations.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the notional values of our foreign exchange forward contracts that do not qualify for hedge
accounting were as follows (notional amounts and U.S. dollar equivalents in millions):
December 31, 2020
Transaction Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
Purchase Australian dollar AUD 3.2 $2.5
Purchase Brazilian real BRL 2.6 $0.5
Sell Canadian dollar CAD 8.9 $7.0
Purchase Chilean peso CLP 2,006.0 $2.8
Sell Chilean peso CLP 4,476.7 $6.3
Purchase Euro €140.0 $172.1
Sell Euro €63.6 $78.2
Sell Indian rupee INR 619.2 $8.4
Purchase Japanese yen ¥1,593.7 $15.5
Sell Japanese yen ¥20,656.6 $200.5
Purchase Malaysian ringgit MYR 69.3 $17.2
Sell Malaysian ringgit MYR 24.9 $6.2
Sell Mexican peso MXN 34.6 $1.7
Purchase Singapore dollar SGD 2.9 $2.2
113
Table of Contents
December 31, 2019
Transaction Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
Purchase Australian dollar AUD 14.9 $10.4
Sell Australian dollar AUD 11.1 $7.8
Purchase Brazilian real BRL 13.2 $3.3
Sell Brazilian real BRL 4.3 $1.1
Purchase Canadian dollar CAD 4.5 $3.4
Sell Canadian dollar CAD 1.6 $1.2
Purchase Chilean peso CLP 1,493.1 $2.0
Sell Chilean peso CLP 3,866.1 $5.1
Purchase Euro €86.1 $96.5
Sell Euro €116.3 $130.3
Sell Indian rupee INR 1,283.8 $18.0
Purchase Japanese yen ¥3,625.5 $33.3
Sell Japanese yen ¥23,089.5 $212.2
Purchase Malaysian ringgit MYR 88.6 $21.6
Sell Malaysian ringgit MYR 41.3 $10.1
Sell Mexican peso MXN 34.6 $1.8
Purchase Singapore dollar SGD 2.9 $2.2
Commodity Price Risk
We use commodity swap contracts to mitigate our exposure to commodity price fluctuations for certain raw materials used in the
production of our modules. In August 2020, we entered into a commodity swap contract to hedge a portion of our forecasted cash
flows for purchases of aluminum frames for a one-year period. Such swap had an initial notional value based on metric tons of
forecasted aluminum purchases, equivalent to $24.9 million, and entitled us to receive a three-month average London Metals
Exchange price for aluminum while requiring us to pay certain fixed prices. The notional amount of the commodity swap contract
proportionately adjusts with forecasted purchases of aluminum frames. As of December 31, 2020, the notional value associated
with this contract was $12.3 million.
This commodity swap contract qualifies for accounting as a cash flow hedge in accordance with ASC 815, and we designated it as
such. We report unrealized gains or losses on such contract in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and subsequently reclassify
applicable amounts into earnings when the hedged transaction occurs and impacts earnings. We determined that this derivative
financial instrument was highly effective as a cash flow hedge as of December 31, 2020. In the following 12 months, we expect to
reclassify into earnings $1.5 million of net unrealized gains related to this commodity swap contract that are included in
“Accumulated other comprehensive loss” at December 31, 2020 as we realize the earnings effects of the related forecasted
transactions. The amount we ultimately record to earnings will depend on the actual commodity pricing when we realize the related
forecasted transactions.
114
Table of Contents
9. Leases
Our lease arrangements include land associated with our systems projects, our corporate and administrative offices, land for our
international manufacturing facilities, and certain of our manufacturing equipment. Such leases primarily relate to assets located in
the United States, Japan, Malaysia, and Vietnam.
The following table presents certain quantitative information related to our lease arrangements for the year ended December 31,
2020 and 2019, and as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
2020 2019
Operating lease cost $ 18,739 $ 21,833
Variable lease cost 2,616 3,518
Short-term lease cost 2,628 7,511
Total lease cost $ 23,983 $ 32,862
Payments of amounts included in the measurement of operating lease liabilities $ 19,192 $ 21,678
Lease assets obtained in exchange for operating lease liabilities $ 98,822 $ 179,804
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Operating lease assets $ 226,664 $ 145,71 1
Operating lease liabilities – current 14,006 11,102
Operating lease liabilities – noncurrent 189,034 112,515
Weighted-average remaining lease term 20 years 15 years
Weighted-average discount rate 2.9 % 4.3 %
As of December 31, 2020, the future payments associated with our lease liabilities were as follows (in thousands):
Total Lease
Liabilities
2021 $ 17,858  
2022 17,378  
2023 17,483  
2024 17,158  
2025 16,726  
Thereafter 166,168  
Total future payments 252,771  
Less: interest (49,731 )
Total lease liabilities $ 203,040  
Our lease expense was $18.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2018.
115
Table of Contents
10. Fair Value Measurements
The following is a description of the valuation techniques that we use to measure the fair value of assets and liabilities that we
measure and report at fair value on a recurring basis:
•Cash Equivalents. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, our cash equivalents consisted of money market funds. We value our cash
equivalents using observable inputs that reflect quoted prices for securities with identical characteristics and classify the
valuation techniques that use these inputs as Level 1.
•Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, our marketable securities
consisted of foreign debt, foreign government obligations, U.S. debt, and time deposits, and our restricted marketable securities
consisted of foreign and U.S. government obligations. We value our marketable securities and restricted marketable securities
using observable inputs that reflect quoted prices for securities with identical characteristics or quoted prices for securities with
similar characteristics and other observable inputs (such as interest rates that are observable at commonly quoted intervals).
Accordingly, we classify the valuation techniques that use these inputs as either Level 1 or Level 2 depending on the inputs
used. We also consider the effect of our counterparties’ credit standing in these fair value measurements.
•Derivative Assets and Liabilities. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, our derivative assets and liabilities consisted of foreign
exchange forward contracts involving major currencies, interest rate swap contracts involving major interest rates, and
commodity swap contracts involving major commodity prices. Since our derivative assets and liabilities are not traded on an
exchange, we value them using standard industry valuation models. As applicable, these models project future cash flows and
discount the amounts to a present value using market-based observable inputs, including interest rate curves, credit risk,
foreign exchange rates, forward and spot prices for currencies, and forward prices for commodities. These inputs are
observable in active markets over the contract term of the derivative instruments we hold, and accordingly, we classify the
valuation techniques as Level 2. In evaluating credit risk, we consider the effect of our counterparties’ and our own credit
standing in the fair value measurements of our derivative assets and liabilities, respectively.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the fair value measurements of our assets and liabilities measured on a recurring basis were as
follows (in thousands):
Fair Value Measurements at Reporting
 Date Using
December 31,
2020Quoted Prices
 in Active
 Markets for
 Identical
 Assets
 (Level 1)Significant
 Other
 Observable
 Inputs
 (Level 2)Significant
 Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3)
Assets:
Cash equivalents:
Money market funds $ 2 $ 2 $ — $ — 
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt 214,254  — 214,254  — 
U.S. debt 14,543  — 14,543  — 
Time deposits 291,269  291,269  — — 
Restricted marketable securities 265,280  — 265,280  — 
Derivative assets 3,315  — 3,315  — 
Total assets $ 788,663  $ 291,271  $ 497,392  $ — 
Liabilities:
Derivative liabilities $ 5,621  $ — $ 5,621  $ — 
116
Table of Contents
Fair Value Measurements at Reporting
Date Using
December 31,
2019Quoted Prices
in Active
 Markets for
 Identical
 Assets
 (Level 1)Significant
Other
 Observable
 Inputs
 (Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
 Inputs
 (Level 3)
Assets:
Cash equivalents:
Money market funds $ 7,322  $ 7,322  $ — $ — 
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt 387,820  — 387,820  — 
Foreign government obligations 22,01 1 — 22,01 1 — 
U.S. debt 66,134  — 66,134  — 
Time deposits 335,541  335,541  — — 
Restricted marketable securities 223,785  — 223,785  — 
Derivative assets 1,338  — 1,338  — 
Total assets $ 1,043,951  $ 342,863  $ 701,088  $ — 
Liabilities:
Derivative liabilities $ 10,021  $ — $ 10,021  $ — 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying values and fair values of our financial instruments not measured at fair value were as
follows (in thousands):
 December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Carrying
 ValueFair
 ValueCarrying
 ValueFair
 Value
Assets:
Notes receivable – current $ — $ — $ 23,873  $ 24,929  
Notes receivable – noncurrent 350 350 8,194  10,276  
Accounts receivable, unbilled – noncurrent 22,722  22,096  — — 
Liabilities:
Long-term debt, including current maturities (1) $ 287,149  $ 297,076  $ 482,892  $ 504,213  
——————————
(1) Excludes unamortized discounts and issuance costs.
The carrying values in our consolidated balance sheets of our trade accounts receivable, current unbilled accounts receivable and
retainage, restricted cash, accounts payable, and accrued expenses approximated their fair values due to their nature and relatively
short maturities; therefore, we excluded them from the foregoing table. The fair value measurements for our notes receivable,
noncurrent unbilled accounts receivable, and long-term debt are considered Level 2 measurements under the fair value hierarchy.
Credit Risk
We have certain financial and derivative instruments that subject us to credit risk. These consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents,
marketable securities, accounts receivable, restricted cash, restricted marketable securities, notes receivable, foreign exchange
forward contracts, and commodity swap contracts. We are exposed to credit losses in the event of nonperformance by the
counterparties to our financial and derivative instruments. We place cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, restricted cash,
restricted marketable securities, and foreign exchange forward contracts with various high-quality financial institutions and limit
the amount of credit risk from any one
117
Table of Contents
counterparty. We continuously evaluate the credit standing of our counterparty financial institutions. Our net sales are primarily
concentrated among a limited number of customers. We monitor the financial condition of our customers and perform credit
evaluations whenever considered necessary. Depending upon the sales arrangement, we may require some form of payment
security from our customers, including advance payments, parent guarantees, letters of credit, bank guarantees, or surety bonds. We
also have PPAs that subject us to credit risk in the event our off-take counterparties are unable to fulfill their contractual
obligations, which may adversely affect our project assets and certain receivables. Accordingly, we closely monitor the credit
standing of existing and potential off-take counterparties to limit such risks.
11. Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability
We previously established a module collection and recycling program, which has since been discontinued, to collect and recycle
modules sold and covered under such program once the modules reach the end of their service lives. For legacy customer sales
contracts that were covered under this program, we agreed to pay the costs for the collection and recycling of qualifying solar
modules, and the end-users agreed to notify us, disassemble their solar power systems, package the solar modules for shipment, and
revert ownership rights over the modules back to us at the end of the modules’ service lives. Accordingly, we recorded any
collection and recycling obligations within “Cost of sales” at the time of sale based on the estimated cost to collect and recycle the
covered solar modules.
We estimate the cost of our collection and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting
and recycling the solar modules, which includes estimates for the cost of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar
module installation sites to a recycling center; material, labor, and capital costs; and by-product credits for certain materials
recovered during the recycling process. We base these estimates on our experience collecting and recycling solar modules and
certain assumptions regarding costs at the time the solar modules will be collected and recycled. In the periods between the time of
sale and the related settlement of the collection and recycling obligation, we accrete the carrying amount of the associated liability
and classify the corresponding expense within “Selling, general and administrative” expense on our consolidated statements of
operations.
We periodically review our estimates of expected future recycling costs and may adjust our liability accordingly. During the year
ended December 31, 2020, we completed our annual cost study of obligations under our module collection and recycling program
and reduced the associated liability by $18.9 million primarily due to changes to the estimated timing of cash flows associated with
capital, labor, and maintenance costs and updates to certain valuation assumptions. During the year ended December 31, 2018, we
reduced our module collection and recycling liability by $34.2 million primarily due to higher by-product credits for glass, lower
capital costs resulting from the expanded scale of our recycling facilities, and adjustments to certain valuation assumptions driven
by our increased experience with module recycling.
Our module collection and recycling liability was $130.7 million and $137.8 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized a net benefit of $18.9 million to cost of sales as a result of
the reduction to our module and collection recycling liability described above and accretion expense of $5.2 million associated with
this liability. During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recognized accretion expense of $4.9 million associated with this
liability. During the year ended December 31, 2018, we recognized net benefits of $25.0 million to cost of sales and $2.9 million to
accretion expense as a result of the reduction in our module collection and recycling liability. As of December 31, 2020, a 1%
increase in the annualized inflation rate used in our estimated future collection and recycling cost per module would increase the
liability by $21.6 million, and a 1% decrease in that rate would decrease the liability by $18.7 million. See Note 6. “Restricted
Marketable Securities” to our consolidated financial statements for more information about our arrangements for funding this
liability.
118
Table of Contents
12. Debt
Our long-term debt consisted of the following at December 31, 2020 and 2019 (in thousands):
Balance (USD)
Loan Agreement Currency 2020 2019
Revolving Credit Facility USD $ — $ — 
Luz del Norte Credit Facilities USD 186,230  188,017  
Ishikawa Credit Agreement JPY — 215,879  
Japan Credit Facility JPY 13,813  1,678  
Tochigi Credit Facility JPY 39,400  37,304  
Anamizu Credit Agreement JPY — 12,138  
Kyoto Credit Facility JPY 47,706  — 
Anantapur Credit Facility INR — 15,123  
Tungabhadra Credit Facility INR — 12,753  
Long-term debt principal 287,149  482,892  
Less: unamortized discounts and issuance costs (7,918 ) (11,195 )
Total long-term debt 279,231  471,697  
Less: current portion (41,540 ) (17,510 )
Noncurrent portion $ 237,691  $ 454,187  
Revolving Credit Facility
Our amended and restated credit agreement with several financial institutions as lenders and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as
administrative agent provides us with a senior secured credit facility (the “Revolving Credit Facility”) with an aggregate borrowing
capacity of $500.0 million, which we may increase to $750.0 million, subject to certain conditions. Borrowings under the credit
facility bear interest at (i) London Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”), adjusted for Eurocurrency reserve requirements, plus a
margin of 2.00% or (ii) a base rate as defined in the credit agreement plus a margin of 1.00% depending on the type of borrowing
requested. These margins are also subject to adjustment depending on our consolidated leverage ratio. We had no borrowings under
our Revolving Credit Facility as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 and had issued $4.3 million and $39.3 million, respectively, of
letters of credit using availability under the facility. Loans and letters of credit issued under the Revolving Credit Facility are jointly
and severally guaranteed by First Solar, Inc.; First Solar Electric, LLC; First Solar Electric (California), Inc.; and First Solar
Development, LLC and are secured by interests in substantially all of the guarantors’ tangible and intangible assets other than
certain excluded assets.
In addition to paying interest on outstanding principal under the Revolving Credit Facility, we are required to pay a commitment
fee at a rate of 0.30% per annum, based on the average daily unused commitments under the facility, which may also be adjusted
due to changes in our consolidated leverage ratio. We also pay a letter of credit fee based on the applicable margin for Eurocurrency
revolving loans on the face amount of each letter of credit and a fronting fee of 0.125%. Our Revolving Credit Facility matures in
July 2022.
Luz del Norte Credit Facilities
In August 2014, Parque Solar Fotovoltaico Luz del Norte SpA (“Luz del Norte”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project
company, entered into credit facilities (the “Luz del Norte Credit Facilities”) with the U.S. International Development Finance
Corporation (“DFC”) and the International Finance Corporation (“IFC”) to provide limited-recourse senior secured debt financing
for the design, development, financing, construction, testing, commissioning, operation, and maintenance of a 141 MW PV solar
power plant located near Copiapó, Chile.
In March 2017, we amended the terms of the DFC and IFC credit facilities. Such amendments (i) allowed for the capitalization of
accrued and unpaid interest through March 15, 2017, along with the capitalization of certain futureAC
119
Table of Contents
interest payments as variable rate loans under the credit facilities, (ii) allowed for the conversion of certain fixed rate loans to
variable rate loans upon scheduled repayment, (iii) extended the maturity of the DFC and IFC loans until June 2037, and (iv)
canceled the remaining borrowing capacity under the DFC and IFC credit facilities with the exception of the capitalization of
certain future interest payments. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the balance outstanding on the DFC loans was $139.4 million
and $140.8 million, respectively. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the balance outstanding on the IFC loans was $46.8 million
and $47.2 million, respectively. The DFC and IFC loans are secured by liens over all of Luz del Norte’s assets and by a pledge of
all of the equity interests in the entity.
Ishikawa Credit Agreement
In December 2016, FS Japan Project 12 GK (“Ishikawa”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into
a credit agreement (the “Ishikawa Credit Agreement”) with Mizuho Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥27.3 billion
($233.9 million) for the development and construction of a 59 MW PV solar power plant located in Ishikawa, Japan. The credit
agreement consists of a ¥24.0 billion ($205.6 million) senior loan facility, a ¥2.1 billion ($18.0 million) consumption tax facility,
and a ¥1.2 billion ($10.3 million) letter of credit facility. In September 2020, we repaid the remaining $215.5 million principal
balance on the credit agreement prior to completing the sale of the project.
Japan Credit Facility
In September 2015, First Solar Japan GK, our wholly-owned subsidiary, entered into a construction loan facility with Mizuho
Bank, Ltd. for borrowings up to ¥4.0 billion ($33.4 million) for the development and construction of utility-scale PV solar power
plants in Japan (the “Japan Credit Facility”). Borrowings under the facility generally mature within 12 months following the
completion of construction activities for each financed project. The facility is guaranteed by First Solar, Inc. and secured by pledges
of certain projects’ cash accounts and other rights in the projects.
Tochigi Credit Facility
In June 2017, First Solar Japan GK, our wholly-owned subsidiary, entered into a term loan facility with Mizuho Bank, Ltd. for
borrowings up to ¥7.0 billion ($62.2 million) for the development of utility-scale PV solar power plants in Japan (the “Tochigi
Credit Facility”). The term loan facility matures in March 2021. The facility is guaranteed by First Solar, Inc. and secured by
pledges of certain of First Solar Japan GK’s accounts.
Anamizu Credit Agreement
In December 2019, FS Japan Project 31 GK (“Anamizu”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into
a credit agreement (the “Anamizu Credit Agreement”) with MUFG Bank, Ltd.; The Iyo Bank, Ltd.; The Hachijuni Bank, Ltd.; The
Hyakugo Bank, Ltd.; and The Yamagata Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥7.7 billion ($70.8 million) for the development
and construction of a 17 MW PV solar power plant located in Ishikawa, Japan. The credit agreement consisted of a ¥6.6 billion
($61.0 million) term loan facility, a ¥0.7 billion ($6.5 million) consumption tax facility, and a ¥0.4 billion ($3.3 million) debt
service reserve facility. In September 2020, we completed the sale of our Anamizu project, and the outstanding balance of the
Anamizu Credit Agreement of $31.3 million was assumed by the customer.
Miyagi Credit Facility
In July 2020, GK Marumori Hatsudensho (“Miyagi”), our indirectly wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into a
credit agreement (the “Miyagi Credit Facility”) with Shinsei Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥17.2 billion ($164.2
million) for the development and construction of a 40 MW PV solar power plant located in Miyagi, Japan. The credit facility
consisted of a ¥15.2 billion ($145.1 million) term loan facility, a ¥1.5 billion ($14.4 million) consumption tax facility, and a ¥0.5
billion ($4.7 million) debt service reserve facility. InAC
AC 
AC
120
Table of Contents
September 2020, we completed the sale of our Miyagi project, and the outstanding balance of the Miyagi Credit Facility of $79.4
million was assumed by the customer.
Kyoto Credit Facility
In July 2020, First Solar Japan GK, our wholly-owned subsidiary, entered into a construction loan facility with Mizuho Bank, Ltd.
for borrowings up to ¥15.0 billion ($142.8 million), which are intended to be used for the construction of a 38 MW PV solar
power plant located in Kyoto, Japan (the “Kyoto Credit Facility”). Borrowings under the facility generally mature within 12 months
following the completion of construction activities at the project. The facility is guaranteed by First Solar, Inc. and First Solar Japan
GK, our wholly-owned subsidiary, and secured by pledges of the project’s cash accounts and certain other assets.
Anantapur Credit Facility
In March 2018, Anantapur Solar Parks Private Limited, our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into a
term loan facility (the “Anantapur Credit Facility”) with J.P. Morgan Securities India Private Limited for borrowings up to INR 1.2
billion ($18.4 million) for costs related to a 20 MW PV solar power plant located in Karnataka, India. In July 2020, we
completed the sale of our Anantapur project, and the outstanding balance of the Anantapur Credit Facility of $14.0 million was
assumed by the customer.
Tungabhadra Credit Facility
In March 2018, Tungabhadra Solar Parks Private Limited, our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into
a term loan facility (the “Tungabhadra Credit Facility”) with J.P. Morgan Securities India Private Limited for borrowings up to INR
1.0 billion ($15.3 million) for costs related to a 20 MW PV solar power plant located in Karnataka, India. In July 2020, we
completed the sale of our Tungabhadra project, and the outstanding balance of the Tungabhadra Credit Facility of $12.0 million
was assumed by the customer.
Variable Interest Rate Risk
Certain of our long-term debt agreements bear interest at prime, LIBOR, TIBOR, or equivalent variable rates. An increase in these
variable rates would increase the cost of borrowing under our Revolving Credit Facility and certain project specific debt financings.
Our long-term debt borrowing rates as of December 31, 2020 were as follows:
Loan Agreement December 31, 2020
Revolving Credit Facility 2.14%
Luz del Norte Credit Facilities (1)Fixed rate loans at bank rate plus 3.50%
Variable rate loans at 91-Day U.S. T reasury Bill Y ield or LIBOR plus
3.50%
Japan Credit Facility 1-month TIBOR plus 0.55%
Tochigi Credit Facility 3-month TIBOR plus 1.00%
Kyoto Credit Facility 1-month TIBOR plus 0.60%
——————————
(1) Outstanding balance comprised of $ 144.2  million of fixed rate loans and $ 42.0 million of variable rate loans as of December 31, 2020.
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, we paid $14.9 million, $18.8 million, and $16.6 million, respectively,
of interest related to our long-term debt arrangements.AC
AC
AC
121
Table of Contents
Future Principal Payments
At December 31, 2020, the future principal payments on our long-term debt were due as follows (in thousands):
Total Debt
2021 $ 41,801  
2022 17,848  
2023 6,084  
2024 54,727  
2025 7,560  
Thereafter 159,129  
Total long-term debt future principal payments $ 287,149  
13. Commitments and Contingencies
Commercial Commitments
During the normal course of business, we enter into commercial commitments in the form of letters of credit and surety bonds to
provide financial and performance assurance to third parties. As of December 31, 2020, the majority of these commercial
commitments supported our systems projects. As of December 31, 2020, the issued and outstanding amounts and available
capacities under these commitments were as follows (in millions):
Issued and
OutstandingAvailable
Capacity
Revolving Credit Facility (1) $ 4.3 $ 395.7  
Bilateral facilities (2) 135.5  270.5  
Surety bonds 67.0 649.9  
——————————
(1) Our Revolving Credit Facility provides us with a sub-limit of $400.0  million  to issue letters of credit, subject to certain additional limits
depending on the currencies of the letters of credit, at a fee based on the applicable margin for Eurocurrency revolving loans and a
fronting fee.
(2) Of the total letters of credit issued under the bilateral facilities, $ 1.2 million was secured with cash.
Product Warranties
When we recognize revenue for module or system sales, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our limited
warranty obligations for both modules and the balance of the systems. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the
number of solar modules under warranty installed at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty
claims, and our estimated per-module replacement costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain
quality and reliability testing and actual performance in certain field installation sites. From time to time, we have taken
remediation actions with respect to affected modules beyond our limited warranties and may elect to do so in the future, in which
case we would incur additional expenses. Such potential voluntary future remediation actions beyond our limited warranty
obligations may be material to our consolidated statements of operations if we commit to any such remediation actions.
122
Table of Contents
Product warranty activities during the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 were as follows (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Product warranty liability , beginning of period $ 129,797  $ 220,692  $ 224,274  
Accruals for new warranties issued 9,424  17,327  14,132  
Settlements (22,464 ) (22,540 ) (11,851 )
Changes in estimate of product warranty liability (21,661 ) (85,682 ) (5,863 )
Product warranty liability , end of period $ 95,096  $ 129,797  $ 220,692  
Current portion of warranty liability $ 22,278  $ 20,291  $ 27,657  
Noncurrent portion of warranty liability $ 72,818  $ 109,506  $ 193,035  
We estimate our limited product warranty liability for power output and defects in materials and workmanship under normal use
and service conditions based on return rates for each series of module technology. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we
revised this estimate downward based on updated information regarding our warranty claims, which reduced our product warranty
liability by $19.7 million. This updated information reflected lower-than-expected settlements for our older series of module
technology and revisions to projected settlements, resulting in a lower projected return rate. During the year ended December 31,
2019, we revised this estimate downward based on updated information regarding our warranty claims, which reduced our product
warranty liability by $80.0 million. This updated information reflected lower-than-expected return rates for our newer series of
module technology, the evolving claims profile of each series, and certain changes to our warranty programs.
In general, we expect the return rates for our newer series of module technology to be lower than our older series. We estimate that
the return rate for such newer series of module technology will be less than 1%. As of December 31, 2020, a 1% increase in the
return rate across all series of module technology would increase our product warranty liability by $104.9 million, and a 1%
increase in the return rate for BoS parts would not have a material impact on the associated warranty liability.
Performance Guarantees
As part of our systems business, we conduct performance testing of a system prior to substantial completion to confirm the system
meets its operational and capacity expectations noted in the EPC agreement. In addition, we may provide an energy performance
test during the first or second year of a system’s operation to demonstrate that the actual energy generation for the applicable period
meets or exceeds the modeled energy expectation, after certain adjustments. If there is an underperformance event with regard to
these tests, we may incur liquidated damages as specified in the applicable EPC agreement. In certain instances, a bonus payment
may be received at the end of the applicable test period if the system performs above a specified level. As of December 31, 2020
and 2019, we accrued $10.2 million and $4.6 million, respectively, for our estimated obligations under such arrangements, which
were classified as “Other current liabilities” in our consolidated balance sheets.
As part of our O&M service offerings, we typically offer an effective availability guarantee, which stipulates that a system will be
available to generate a certain percentage of total possible energy during a specific period after adjusting for factors outside our
control as the service provider, such as weather, curtailment, outages, force majeure, and other conditions that may affect system
availability. Effective availability guarantees are only offered as part of our O&M services and terminate at the end of an O&M
arrangement. If we fail to meet the contractual threshold for these guarantees, we may incur liquidated damages for certain lost
energy. Our O&M agreements typically contain provisions limiting our total potential losses under an agreement, including
amounts paid for liquidated damages, to a percentage of O&M fees. Many of our O&M agreements also contain provisions
whereby we may receive a bonus payment if system availability exceeds a separate threshold. As of December 31, 2020, we
accrued $0.9 million of liquidated damages under our effective availability guarantees, which was classified as “Liabilities held for
sale” in our consolidated balance sheets. As of December 31, 2019, we accrued $0.6 million of
123
Table of Contents
liquidated damages under our effective availability guarantees, which was classified as “Other current liabilities” in our
consolidated balance sheets.
Indemnifications
In certain limited circumstances, we have provided indemnifications to customers, including project tax equity investors, under
which we are contractually obligated to compensate such parties for losses they suffer resulting from a breach of a representation,
warranty, or covenant; a reduction in tax benefits received, including investment tax credits; or the resolution of specific matters
associated with a project’s development or construction. Project related tax benefits are, in part, based on guidance provided by the
Internal Revenue Service and U.S. Treasury Department, which includes assumptions regarding the fair value of qualifying PV
solar power systems. For any sales contracts that have such indemnification provisions, we initially recognize a liability under ASC
460 for the estimated premium that would be required by a guarantor to issue the same indemnity in a standalone arm’s-length
transaction with an unrelated party. We typically base these estimates on the cost of insurance policies that cover the underlying
risks being indemnified and may purchase such policies to mitigate our exposure to potential indemnification payments. We
subsequently measure such liabilities at the greater of the initially estimated premium or the contingent liability required to be
recognized under ASC 450. We recognize any indemnification liabilities as a reduction of revenue in the related transaction.
After an indemnification liability is recorded, we derecognize such amount pursuant to ASC 460-10-35-2 depending on the nature
of the indemnity, which derecognition typically occurs upon expiration or settlement of the arrangement, and any contingent
aspects of the indemnity are accounted for in accordance with ASC 450. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we accrued $3.2
million and $0.8 million of current indemnification liabilities, respectively. As of December 31, 2019, we also accrued $4.2 million
of noncurrent indemnification liabilities. As of December 31, 2020, the maximum potential amount of future payments under our
tax related and other indemnifications was $181.9 million, and we held insurance policies allowing us to recover up to $43.8
million of potential amounts paid under the indemnifications covered by the policies.
Contingent Consideration
We may seek to make additions to our advanced-stage project pipeline by actively developing our early-to-mid-stage project
pipeline and by pursuing opportunities to acquire projects at various stages of development. In connection with such project
acquisitions, we may agree to pay additional amounts to project sellers upon the achievement of certain milestones, such as
obtaining a PPA, obtaining financing, or selling the project to a new owner. We recognize a project acquisition contingent liability
when we determine that such a liability is both probable and reasonably estimable, and the carrying amount of the related project
asset is correspondingly increased. As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we accrued $2.2 million and $2.4 million, respectively, for
project related contingent obligations, which was classified as “Other current liabilities” in our consolidated balance sheets. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, we also accrued $4.5 million for project related contingent obligations, which was classified as
“Liabilities held for sale” and “Other liabilities,” respectively, in our consolidated balance sheets. Any future differences between
the acquisition-date contingent obligation estimate and the ultimate settlement of the obligation are recognized as an adjustment to
the project asset, as contingent payments are considered direct and incremental to the underlying value of the related project.
Legal Proceedings
Class Action
On March 15, 2012, a purported class action lawsuit titled Smilovits v. First Solar, Inc., et al., Case No. 2:12-cv-00555-DGC, was
filed in the Arizona District Court against the Company and certain of our current and former directors and officers. The complaint
was filed on behalf of persons who purchased or otherwise acquired the Company’s publicly traded securities between
April 30, 2008 and February 28, 2012. The complaint generally
124
Table of Contents
alleged that the defendants violated Sections 10(b) and 20(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 by making false and
misleading statements regarding the Company’s financial performance and prospects. The action included claims for damages,
including interest, and an award of reasonable costs and attorneys’ fees to the putative class.
On July 23, 2012, the Arizona District Court issued an order appointing as lead plaintiffs in the Class Action the Mineworkers’
Pension Scheme and British Coal Staff Superannuation Scheme (collectively, the “Pension Schemes”). The Pension Schemes filed
an amended complaint on August 17, 2012, which contains similar allegations and seeks similar relief as the original complaint.
Defendants filed a motion to dismiss on September 14, 2012. On December 17, 2012, the court denied defendants’ motion to
dismiss. On October 8, 2013, the Arizona District Court granted the Pension Schemes’ motion for class certification and certified a
class comprised of all persons who purchased or otherwise acquired publicly traded securities of the Company between
April 30, 2008 and February 28, 2012 and were damaged thereby, excluding defendants and certain related parties. Merits
discovery closed on February 27, 2015.
Defendants filed a motion for summary judgment on March 27, 2015. On August 11, 2015, the Arizona District Court granted
defendants’ motion in part and denied it in part, and certified an issue for immediate appeal to the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals
(the “Ninth Circuit”). First Solar filed a petition for interlocutory appeal with the Ninth Circuit, and that petition was granted on
November 18, 2015. On May 20, 2016, the Pension Schemes moved to vacate the order granting the petition, dismiss the appeal,
and stay the merits briefing schedule. On December 13, 2016, the Ninth Circuit denied the Pension Schemes’ motion. On January
31, 2018, the Ninth Circuit issued an opinion affirming the Arizona District Court’s order denying in part defendants’ motion for
summary judgment. On March 16, 2018, First Solar filed a petition for panel rehearing or rehearing en banc with the Ninth Circuit.
On May 7, 2018, the Ninth Circuit denied defendants’ petition. On August 6, 2018, defendants filed a petition for writ of certiorari
to the U.S. Supreme Court. Meanwhile, in the Arizona District Court, expert discovery was completed on February 5, 2019. On
June 24, 2019, the U.S. Supreme Court denied the petition. Following the denial of the petition, the Arizona District Court ordered
that the trial begin on January 7, 2020.
On January 5, 2020, First Solar entered into an MOU to settle the Class Action. First Solar agreed to pay a total of $350 million to
settle the claims in the Class Action brought on behalf of all persons who purchased or otherwise acquired the Company’s shares
between April 30, 2008 and February 28, 2012, in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice of the complaint
upon court approval of the settlement. The settlement contained no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of
the parties. As a result of the entry into the MOU, we accrued a loss for the above-referenced settlement in our results of operations
for the year ended December 31, 2019. On January 24, 2020, First Solar paid $350 million to the settlement escrow agent. On
February 13, 2020, First Solar entered into a stipulation of settlement with certain named plaintiffs on terms and conditions that are
consistent with the MOU. On February 14, 2020, the lead plaintiffs filed a motion for preliminary approval of the settlement.
Following a February 27, 2020 hearing, the Arizona District Court entered an order on March 2, 2020 that granted preliminary
approval of the settlement and permitted notice to the class. Following a June 30, 2020 hearing, the Arizona District Court entered
an order on June 30, 2020 that granted final approval of the settlement and dismissed the Class Action with prejudice.
Opt-Out Action
On June 23, 2015, a suit titled Maverick Fund, L.D.C. v. First Solar, Inc., et al., Case No. 2:15-cv-01156-ROS, was filed in Arizona
District Court by putative stockholders that opted out of the Class Action. The complaint names the Company and certain of our
current and former directors and officers as defendants, and alleges that the defendants violated Sections 10(b) and 20(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and violated state law, by making false and misleading statements regarding the Company’s
financial performance and prospects. The action includes claims for rescissory and actual damages, interest, punitive damages, and
an award of reasonable attorneys’ fees, expert fees, and costs.
125
Table of Contents
First Solar and the individual defendants filed a motion to dismiss the Opt-Out Action on July 16, 2018. On November 27, 2018,
the Court granted defendants’ motion to dismiss the plaintiffs’ negligent misrepresentation claim under state law, but otherwise
denied defendants’ motion. On June 3, 2020, First Solar and the plaintiffs in the Opt-Out Action entered into an agreement in
principle to settle the claims in the Opt-Out Action. On July 17, 2020, the parties executed a definitive settlement agreement
pursuant to which First Solar agreed to pay a total of $19 million in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice of
the Opt-Out Action. The agreement contains no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the defendants. On
July 30, 2020, First Solar funded the settlement, and on July 31, 2020, the parties filed a joint stipulation of dismissal. On
September 10, 2020, the Arizona District Court entered an order dismissing the case with prejudice. As of December 31, 2019, we
accrued $13 million of estimated losses for this action. As a result of the settlement, we accrued an incremental $6 million litigation
loss during the year ended December 31, 2020.
Derivative Actions
On July 16, 2013, a derivative complaint was filed in the Superior Court of Arizona, Maricopa County, formerly titled Bargar, et al.
v. Ahearn, et al., and now titled Kaufold v. Ahearn, et. al., Case No. CV2013-009938, by a putative stockholder against certain
current and former directors and officers of the Company (“Kaufold”). The complaint generally alleges that the defendants caused
or allowed false and misleading statements to be made concerning the Company’s financial performance and prospects. The action
includes claims for, among other things, breach of fiduciary duties, insider trading, unjust enrichment, and waste of corporate
assets. By court order on October 3, 2013, the Superior Court of Arizona, Maricopa County granted the parties’ stipulation to defer
defendants’ response to the complaint pending resolution of the Class Action or expiration of a stay issued in certain consolidated
derivative actions in the Arizona District Court. On November 5, 2013, the matter was placed on the court’s inactive calendar. The
parties jointly sought and obtained multiple requests to continue the stay in this action. On June 30, 2020, the parties jointly
requested that the stay be lifted. On July 1, 2020, the Superior Court of Arizona, Maricopa County ordered that the stay be lifted.
On July 14, 2020, defendants filed a motion to dismiss the complaint with prejudice. On September 14, 2020, First Solar and the
plaintiff entered into an agreement in principle to settle the claims in the Kaufold action, providing for, among other things,
payment of the plaintiff’s attorney’s fees in an immaterial sum. On October 28, 2020 the parties executed a Stipulation and
Agreement of Settlement on terms and conditions that are consistent with the September 14, 2020 agreement in principle. The
stipulation contains no admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the defendants. On October 30, 2020, the
plaintiff filed a motion for preliminary approval of the settlement, and on November 6, 2020, the court entered an order that granted
preliminary approval of the settlement and permitted notice. Following a December 1, 2020 hearing, the court entered a Final Order
and Judgment that granted final approval of the settlement and dismissed the case with prejudice.
Other Matters and Claims
We are party to other legal matters and claims in the normal course of our operations. While we believe the ultimate outcome of
such other matters and claims will not have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations, or cash flows,
the outcome of such matters and claims is not determinable with certainty, and negative outcomes may adversely affect us.
126
Table of Contents
14. Revenue from Contracts with Customers
The following table presents the disaggregation of revenue from contracts with customers for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019, and 2018 along with the reportable segment for each category (in thousands):
Category Segment 2020 2019 2018
Solar modules Modules $ 1,736,060  $ 1,460,1 16 $ 502,001  
Solar power systems Systems 794,797  1,148,856  1,244,175  
O&M services Systems 115,590  107,705  103,186  
Energy generation (1) Systems 61,948  54,539  47,122  
EPC services Systems 2,937  291,901  347,560  
Net sales $ 2,711,332  $ 3,063,1 17 $ 2,244,044  
——————————
(1) During the year ended December 31, 2020, the majority of energy generated and sold by our PV solar power systems was accounted for
under ASC 840 consistent with the classification of the associated PP As.
We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of the modules to the customer, which
typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying contracts. Such contracts may contain
provisions that require us to make liquidated damage payments to the customer if we fail to ship or deliver modules by scheduled
dates. We recognize these liquidated damages as a reduction of revenue in the period we transfer control of the modules to the
customer.
For EPC services, or sales of solar power systems with EPC services, we recognize revenue over time using cost based input
methods, in which significant judgment is required to evaluate assumptions including the amount of net contract revenues and the
total estimated costs to determine our progress toward contract completion. If the estimated total costs on any contract are greater
than the net contract revenues, we recognize the entire estimated loss in the period the loss becomes known. The cumulative effect
of revisions to estimates related to net contract revenues or costs to complete contracts are recorded in the period in which the
revisions to estimates are identified and the amounts can be reasonably estimated.
Changes in estimates for sales of systems and EPC services occur for a variety of reasons, including but not limited to (i)
construction plan accelerations or delays, (ii) module cost forecast changes, (iii) cost related change orders, or (iv) changes in other
information used to estimate costs. Changes in estimates may have a material effect on our consolidated statements of operations.
127
Table of Contents
The following table outlines the impact on revenue of net changes in estimated transaction prices and input costs for systems
related sales contracts (both increases and decreases) for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 as well as the number
of projects that comprise such changes. For purposes of the table, we only include projects with changes in estimates that have a net
impact on revenue of at least $1.0 million during the periods presented with the exception of the sales and use tax matter described
below, for which the aggregate change in estimate has been presented. Also included in the table is the net change in estimate as a
percentage of the aggregate revenue for such projects.
 2020 2019 2018
Number of projects (1) 9 3 24 
(Decrease) increase in revenue from net changes in transaction prices (in
thousands) (1) $ (16,954 ) $ (3,642 ) $ 63,361  
Increase (Decrease) in revenue from net changes in input cost estimates (in
thousands) 7,487  (23,103 ) 1,548  
Net (decrease) increase in revenue from net changes in estimates (in thousands) $ (9,467 ) $ (26,745 ) $ 64,909  
Net change in estimate as a percentage of aggregate revenue (0.5)% (4.6)% 0.6 %
——————————
(1) During the year ended December 31, 2018, we settled a tax examination with the state of California regarding several matters, including
certain sales and use tax payments due under lump sum EPC contracts. Accordingly , we revised our estimates of sales and use taxes due
for projects in the state of California, which affected the estimated transaction prices for such contracts, and recorded an increase to
revenue of $ 54.6 million.
The following table reflects the changes in our contract assets, which we classify as “Accounts receivable, unbilled” or
“Retainage,” and our contract liabilities, which we classify as “Deferred revenue,” for the year ended December 31, 2020,
excluding any assets or liabilities classified as held for sale as of December 31, 2020 (in thousands):
 2020 2019 Change
Accounts receivable, unbilled (1) $ 49,395  $ 162,057  
Retainage — 21,416  
Allowance for credit losses (303) — 
Accounts receivable, unbilled and retainage, net $ 49,092  $ 183,473  $ (134,381 ) (73)%
Deferred revenue (2) $ 233,732  $ 394,655  $ (160,923 ) (41)%
——————————
(1) Includes $ 22.7 million of noncurrent accounts receivable, unbilled classified as “Other assets” on our consolidated balance sheet as of
December 31, 2020.
(2) Includes $44.9 million and $71.4 million of noncurrent deferred revenue classified as “Other liabilities ” on our consolidated balance
sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
During the year ended December 31, 2020, our contract assets decreased by $134.4 million primarily due to billings associated with
ongoing construction activities at the GA Solar 4, Sun Streams, and Sunshine Valley projects, partially offset by unbilled
receivables associated with the sale of certain systems projects. During the year ended December 31, 2020, our contract liabilities
decreased by $160.9 million primarily due to the recognition of revenue for sales of solar modules for which payment was received
in 2019 prior to the step down in the U.S. investment tax credit from 30% to 26%, partially offset by advance payments received
for sales of solar modules in the current period. During the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, we recognized revenue of
$316.1 million and $117.7 million, respectively, that was included in the corresponding contract liability balance at the beginning
of the periods.
128
Table of Contents
As of December 31, 2020, we had entered into contracts with customers for the future sale of 10.7 GW of solar modules for an
aggregate transaction price of $3.3 billion. We expect to recognize such amounts as revenue through 2023 as we transfer control of
the modules to the customers. While our contracts with customers typically represent firm purchase commitments, these contracts
may be subject to amendments made by us or requested by our customers. These amendments may increase or decrease the volume
of modules to be sold under the contract, change delivery schedules, or otherwise adjust the expected revenue under these contracts.
As of December 31, 2020, we had entered into O&M contracts covering approximately 900 MW of utility-scale PV solar power
systems, excluding contracts expected to be transferred to Clairvest in connection with the sale of our North American O&M
operations. See Note 7. “Consolidated Balance Sheet Details” to our consolidated financial statements for further information. We
expect to recognize $146.0 million of revenue during the noncancelable term of these O&M contracts over a weighted-average
period of 18.3 years.
15. Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred Stock
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had authorized 30,000,000 shares of undesignated preferred stock, $0.001 par value, none
of which was issued and outstanding. Our board of directors is authorized to determine the rights, preferences, and restrictions on
any series of preferred stock that we may issue.
Common Stock
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had authorized 500,000,000 shares of common stock, $0.001 par value, of which
105,980,466 and 105,448,921 shares, respectively, were issued and outstanding. Each share of common stock is entitled to a single
vote. We have not declared or paid any dividends through December 31, 2020.
16. Share-Based Compensation
The following table presents share-based compensation expense recognized in our consolidated statements of operations for the
years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Cost of sales $ 3,183  $ 7,541  $ 6,422  
Selling, general and administrative 22,093  23,741  21,646  
Research and development 3,991  5,917  5,714  
Production start-up — 230 372 
Total share-based compensation expense $ 29,267  $ 37,429  $ 34,154  
Share-based compensation expense capitalized in inventory, project assets, and PV solar power systems was $1.1 million and $1.2
million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. As of December 31, 2020, we had $28.6 million of unrecognized share-
based compensation expense related to unvested restricted and performance stock units, which we expect to recognize over a
weighted-average period of approximately 1.3 years. During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, we recognized
an income tax benefit in our statement of operations of $7.3 million, $9.6 million, and $9.9 million, respectively, related to share-
based compensation expense, including excess tax benefits. We authorize our transfer agent to issue new shares, net of shares
withheld for taxes as appropriate, for the vesting of restricted and performance stock units or grants of unrestricted stock.DC
DC
129
Table of Contents
Share-Based Compensation Plans
During the year ended December 31, 2015, we adopted our 2015 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan (“the 2015 Omnibus
Plan”), under which directors, officers, employees, and consultants of First Solar (including any of its subsidiaries) are eligible to
participate in various forms of share-based compensation. The 2015 Omnibus Plan was administered by the compensation
committee (or any other committee designated by our board of directors), which is authorized to, among other things, determine the
recipients of grants, the exercise price, and the vesting schedule of any awards made under the 2015 Omnibus Plan. The 2015
Omnibus Plan provided for the grant of incentive stock options, non-qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted
shares, restricted stock units, performance units, cash incentive awards, performance compensation awards, and other equity-based
and equity-related awards.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the 2015 Omnibus Plan was replaced by our 2020 Omnibus Plan. Upon approval by our
shareholders, the 2015 Omnibus Plan share reserve was transferred to the 2020 Omnibus Plan and any forfeitures under the 2015
Omnibus Plan became available for grant under the 2020 Omnibus Plan. This new plan differs from the 2015 Omnibus Plan in that
the 2020 Omnibus Plan (i) continues to permit performance-based awards despite the elimination of performance-based awards
under Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, (ii) alters the number of, and manner in which we
calculate the 2020 Omnibus Plan share reserve (A) to count dividend equivalents paid in stock against the applicable share reserve
and (B) to count shares tendered in payment of all awards or withheld by the Company to satisfy any tax withholding obligation
against the applicable share reserve, (iii) prohibits payment of dividends or dividend equivalents before the underlying awards vest,
(iv) clarifies the method of tax withholding, and (v) responds to other compensation and governance trends.
Under the 2020 Omnibus Plan, directors, officers, employees, and consultants of First Solar, Inc. (including any of its affiliates) are
eligible to participate. The 2020 Omnibus Plan is administered by the compensation committee (or any other committee designated
by our board of directors), which is authorized to, among other things, determine the recipients of grants, the exercise price, and
vesting schedule of any awards made under the 2020 Omnibus Plan. Our board of directors may amend, modify, or terminate the
2020 Omnibus Plan without the approval of our stockholders, except for amendments that would increase the maximum number of
shares of our common stock available for awards under the 2020 Omnibus Plan, increase the maximum number of shares of our
common stock that may be delivered by incentive stock options, or modify the requirements for participation in the 2020 Omnibus
Plan.
The 2020 Omnibus Plan provides for the grant of incentive stock options, non-qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights,
restricted shares, restricted stock units, performance units, cash incentive awards, performance compensation awards, and other
equity-based and equity-related awards. Excluding the share reserve transferred from the 2015 Omnibus Plan, the maximum
number of new shares of our common stock that may be delivered by awards granted under the 2020 Omnibus Plan is 4,000,000. In
addition, the shares underlying any forfeited, expired, terminated, or canceled awards, or shares surrendered as payment for taxes
required to be withheld, become available for new award grants. We may not grant awards under the 2020 Omnibus Plan after
2030, which is the tenth anniversary of the 2020 Omnibus Plan’s approval by our stockholders. As of December 31, 2020, we had
6,608,877 shares available for future issuance under the 2020 Omnibus Plan.
Restricted and Performance Stock Units
We issue shares to the holders of restricted stock units on the date the restricted units vest. The majority of shares issued are net of
applicable withholding taxes, which we pay on behalf of our associates. As a result, the actual number of shares issued will be less
than the number of restricted stock units granted. Prior to vesting, restricted stock units do not have dividend equivalent rights or
voting rights, and the shares underlying the restricted stock units are not considered issued and outstanding.
In February 2017, the compensation committee approved a long-term incentive program for key executive officers and associates.
The program is intended to incentivize retention of our key executive talent, provide a smooth
130
Table of Contents
transition from our former key senior talent equity performance program, and align the interests of executive management and
stockholders. Specifically, the program consists of (i) performance stock units to be earned over an approximately three-year
performance period, which ended in December 2019 and (ii) stub-year grants of separate performance stock units to be earned over
an approximately two-year performance period, which ended in December 2018. In February 2019, the compensation committee
certified the achievement of the maximum vesting conditions applicable for the stub-year grants. Accordingly, each participant
received one share of common stock for each vested performance unit, net of any tax withholdings. In February 2020, the
compensation committee certified the achievement of the threshold vesting conditions applicable to the remaining 2017 grants of
performance stock units. Accordingly, each participant received one share of common stock for each vested performance unit
granted in February 2017, net of any tax withholdings.
In April 2018, in continuation of our long-term incentive program for key executive officers and associates, the compensation
committee approved additional grants of performance stock units to be earned over an approximately three-year performance
period ending in December 2020. Vesting of the 2018 grants of performance stock units is contingent upon the relative attainment
of target gross margin, operating expense, and contracted revenue metrics, to be certified by the compensation committee.
In July 2019, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance stock units for key executive officers. Such
grants are expected to be earned over a multi-year performance period ending in December 2021. Vesting of the 2019 grants of
performance stock units is contingent upon the relative attainment of target cost per watt, module wattage, gross profit, and
operating income metrics.
In March 2020, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance stock units for key executive officers. Such
grants are expected to be earned over a multi-year performance period ending in December 2022. Vesting of the 2020 grants of
performance stock units is contingent upon the relative attainment of contracted revenue, module wattage, and return on capital
metrics.
Vesting of performance stock units is also contingent upon the employment of program participants through the applicable vesting
dates, with limited exceptions in case of death, disability, a qualifying retirement, or a change-in-control of First Solar. Outstanding
performance stock units are included in the computation of diluted net income per share for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019, and 2018 based on the number of shares that would be issuable if the end of the reporting period were the end of the
contingency period.
The following is a summary of our restricted stock unit activity, including performance stock unit activity, for the year ended
December 31, 2020:
 
  
   
Number of
SharesWeighted-
Average
 Grant-Date
 Fair Value
Unvested restricted stock units at December 31, 2019 2,411,436 $ 50.13  
Restricted stock units granted (1) 808,834 45.01  
Restricted stock units vested (751,354 ) 43.80  
Restricted stock units forfeited (616,660 ) 43.96  
Unvested restricted stock units at December 31, 2020 1,852,256 $ 52.52  
——————————
(1) Restricted stock units granted include the maximum  amount of performance stock units available for issuance under our long-term
incentive program for key executive officers and associates. The actual number of shares to be issued will depend on the relative
attainment of the performance metrics described above.
We estimate the fair value of our restricted stock unit awards based on our stock price on the grant date. For the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the weighted-average grant-date fair value for restricted stock units
131
Table of Contents
granted in such years was $56.47 and $67.44, respectively. The total fair value of restricted stock units vested during 2020, 2019,
and 2018 was $32.9 million, $40.8 million, and $32.2 million, respectively.
Unrestricted Stock
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, we awarded 27,731; 26,254; and 31,190, respectively, of fully vested,
unrestricted shares of our common stock to the independent members of our board of directors. Accordingly, we recognized $1.5
million, $1.5 million, and $1.6 million of share-based compensation expense for these awards during the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.
Stock Purchase Plan
Our shareholders approved our stock purchase plan for employees in June 2010. The plan allowed employees to purchase our
common stock through payroll withholdings over a six-month offering period at a discount from the closing share price on the last
day of the offering period. In April 2017, we amended our stock purchase plan to reduce the purchase discount from 15% to 4%.
Accordingly, the plan was considered noncompensatory and no longer resulted in the recognition of share-based compensation
expense. Effective as of May 14, 2020, the stock purchase plan was terminated. Accordingly, and because no future issuances of the
Company’s common stock will occur under the plan, the Company deregistered all unissued shares of the Company’s common
stock formerly registered for issuance.
17. Income Taxes
On March 27, 2020, the CARES Act was signed into law. The CARES Act includes a number of federal corporate tax relief
provisions that are intended to support the ongoing liquidity of U.S. corporations. Among other provisions, the CARES Act allows
net operating losses incurred in 2018, 2019, and 2020 to be carried back to each of the five preceding taxable years.
As a result of the CARES Act, we expect to carry back our 2019 and 2020 net operating losses to our 2016 U.S. corporate income
tax return, which restores certain foreign tax credits we expect to utilize by amending our 2017 and 2018 U.S. corporate income tax
returns. Such amended returns restore other general business credits we expect to utilize in future tax years before the credits expire
and eliminate the transition tax liability for accumulated earnings of foreign subsidiaries resulting from the Tax Act. As a result, we
recorded a tax benefit of $89.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2020, which represents the one-time income tax benefit for
the difference between the statutory federal corporate income tax rate of 35% applicable to our 2016 U.S. corporate income tax
return and the current federal corporate income tax rate of 21%. Any changes to the estimate will be recorded in the period the
carry back claims are filed.
Although we continue to evaluate our plans for the reinvestment or repatriation of unremitted foreign earnings, we expect to
indefinitely reinvest the earnings of our foreign subsidiaries to fund our international operations, with the exception of certain
subsidiaries for which applicable taxes have been recorded as of December 31, 2020. Accordingly, we have not recorded any
provision for additional U.S. or foreign withholding taxes related to the outside basis differences of our foreign subsidiaries in
which we expect to indefinitely reinvest their earnings.
The U.S. and non-U.S. components of our income or loss before income taxes for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and
2018 were as follows (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
U.S. income (loss) $ 22,475  $ (239,547 )$ (49,353 )
Non-U.S. income 270,715  119,418  162,500  
Income (loss) before taxes and equity in earnings $ 293,190  $ (120,129 )$ 113,147  
132
Table of Contents
The components of our income tax expense or benefit for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 were as follows (in
thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Current (benefit) expense:    
Federal $ (149,162 )$ 9,961  $ (44,267 )
State 4,027  3,890  (13,568 )
Foreign 26,303  41,080  8,788  
Total current (benefit) expense (118,832 ) 54,931  (49,047 )
Deferred expense (benefit):    
Federal 12,681  (55,647 ) 31,530  
State 7,591  (6,737 ) 2,387  
Foreign (8,734 ) 1,973  18,571  
Total deferred expense (benefit) 11,538  (60,41 1) 52,488  
Total income tax (benefit) expense $ (107,294 )$ (5,480 )$ 3,441  
Our Malaysian subsidiary has been granted a long-term tax holiday that expires in 2027. The tax holiday, which generally provides
for a full exemption from Malaysian income tax, is conditional upon our continued compliance with meeting certain employment
and investment thresholds, which we are currently in compliance with and expect to continue to comply with through the expiration
of the tax holiday in 2027. In addition, our Vietnamese subsidiary has been granted a tax incentive that provides a two-year tax
exemption, beginning in 2020, and reduced tax rates through the end of 2025.
Our income tax results differed from the amount computed by applying the relevant U.S. statutory federal corporate income tax rate
to our income or loss before income taxes for the following reasons for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 (in
thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
 Tax Percent Tax Percent Tax Percent
Statutory income tax expense (benefit) $ 61,570  21.0 %$ (25,227 ) 21.0 %$ 23,761  21.0 %
Effect of CARES Act (89,699 ) (30.6)% — — % — — %
Change in tax contingency (59,010 ) (20.1)% 7,096  (5.9)% (6,273 ) (5.5)%
Changes in valuation allowance (31,671 ) (10.8)% (5,735 ) 4.8 % 19,064  16.8 %
Effect of tax holiday (11,500 ) (3.9)% (26,834 ) 22.4 % (26,277 ) (23.2)%
Tax credits (8,091 ) (2.8)% (1,996 ) 1.7 % (8,431 ) (7.5)%
Share-based compensation (720) (0.2)% (1,594 ) 1.3 % (2,105 ) (1.9)%
Return to provision adjustments 2,414  0.8 % 14,362  (12.0)% (25,307 ) (22.3)%
Foreign dividend income 3,004  1.0 % 6,718  (5.6)% 16,570  14.6 %
Non-deductible expenses 3,834  1.3 % 11,119 (9.3)% 4,636  4.1 %
Foreign tax rate dif ferential 6,135  2.1 % 17,195  (14.3)% 14,117 12.5 %
State tax, net of federal benefit 11,059  3.8 % (4,090 ) 3.4 % (7,580 ) (6.7)%
Other 5,381  1.8 % 3,506  (2.9)% 1,266  1.1 %
Reported income tax (benefit) expense $ (107,294 ) (36.6)%$ (5,480 ) 4.6 %$ 3,441  3.0 %
During the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, we made net tax payments of $22.2 million, $34.7 million, and $58.8
million, respectively.
133
Table of Contents
Deferred income taxes reflect the net tax effects of temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities
calculated under U.S. GAAP and the amounts calculated for preparing our income tax returns. The items that gave rise to our
deferred taxes as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 were as follows (in thousands):
 2020 2019
Deferred tax assets:   
Tax credits $ 134,328  $ 13,127  
Net operating losses 110,753  165,669  
Accrued expenses 39,458  134,791  
Compensation 15,806  22,401  
Long-term contracts 10,813  11,215  
Inventory 4,587  4,020  
Equity in earnings 3,666  2,906  
Goodwill 3,065  5,557  
Deferred expenses 1,844  2,177  
Other 30,091  20,143  
Deferred tax assets, gross 354,41 1 382,006  
Valuation allowance (127,71 1) (151,705 )
Deferred tax assets, net of valuation allowance 226,700  230,301  
Deferred tax liabilities:   
Property , plant and equipment (103,324 ) (77,794 )
Investment in foreign subsidiaries (21,917 ) (5,554 )
Restricted marketable securities and derivatives (6,326 ) (4,330 )
Acquisition accounting / basis dif ference (5,079 ) (5,356 )
Capitalized interest (3,097 ) (2,199 )
Other (6,529 ) (10,790 )
Deferred tax liabilities (146,272 ) (106,023 )
Net deferred tax assets and liabilities $ 80,428  $ 124,278  
We use the deferral method of accounting for investment tax credits under which the credits are recognized as reductions in the
carrying value of the related assets. The use of the deferral method also results in a basis difference from the recognition of a
deferred tax asset and an immediate income tax benefit for the future tax depreciation of the related assets. Such basis differences
are accounted for pursuant to the income statement method.
Changes in the valuation allowance against our deferred tax assets were as follows during the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Valuation allowance, beginning of year $ 151,705  $ 159,546  $ 143,818  
Additions 23,884  9,161  29,359  
Reversals (47,878 ) (17,002 ) (13,631 )
Valuation allowance, end of year $ 127,71 1 $ 151,705  $ 159,546  
We maintained a valuation allowance of $127.7 million and $151.7 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively,
against certain of our deferred tax assets, as it is more likely than not that such amounts will not be fully realized. During the year
ended December 31, 2020, the valuation allowance decreased by $24.0 million primarily due to the release of the valuation
allowance associated with our Vietnamese subsidiary due to its current year operating income, partially offset by an increase in
valuation allowances due to current year operating losses in certain other jurisdictions.
134
Table of Contents
As of December 31, 2020, we had federal and aggregate state net operating loss carryforwards of $10.8 million and $722.8 million,
respectively. As of December 31, 2019, we had federal and aggregate state net operating loss carryforwards of $218.3 million and
$205.6 million, respectively. If not used, the federal net operating loss carryforwards incurred prior to 2018 will begin to expire in
2030, and the state net operating loss carryforwards will begin to expire in 2029. Federal net operating losses arising in tax years
beginning in 2018 may be carried forward indefinitely, and the associated deduction is limited to 80% of taxable income. The
utilization of our net operating loss carryforwards is also subject to an annual limitation under Section 382 of the Internal Revenue
Code due to changes in ownership. Based on our analysis, we do not believe such limitation will impact our realization of the net
operating loss carryforwards as we anticipate utilizing them prior to expiration.
As of December 31, 2020, we had U.S. foreign tax credit carryforwards of $28.8 million, federal and state research and
development credit carryforwards of $71.7 million, and investment tax credits of $58.4 million available to reduce future federal
and state income tax liabilities. If not used, these credits will begin to expire in 2028, 2027, and 2035, respectively.
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of liabilities associated with uncertain tax positions for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 is as follows (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
Unrecognized tax benefits, beginning of year $ 72,169  $ 72,193  $ 84,173  
Increases related to prior year tax positions 169 800 — 
Decreases related to prior year tax positions (256) — (2,979 )
Decreases from lapse in statute of limitations (67,396 ) (1,539 ) (10,704 )
Increases related to current tax positions 684 715 1,703  
Unrecognized tax benefits, end of year $ 5,370  $ 72,169  $ 72,193  
If recognized, $5.4 million of unrecognized tax benefits, excluding interest and penalties, would reduce our annual effective tax
rate. Due to the uncertain and complex application of tax laws and regulations, it is possible that the ultimate resolution of uncertain
tax positions may result in liabilities that could be materially different from these estimates. In such an event, we will record
additional tax expense or benefit in the period in which such resolution occurs. Our policy is to recognize any interest and penalties
that we may incur related to our tax positions as a component of income tax expense or benefit. During the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, we recognized interest and penalties of $5.3 million, $7.9 million, and $5.3 million,
respectively, related to unrecognized tax benefits. It is reasonably possible that $0.4 million of uncertain tax positions will be
recognized within the next 12 months due to the expiration of the statute of limitations associated with such positions.
We are subject to audit by federal, state, local, and foreign tax authorities. We are currently under examination in Chile, India,
Malaysia, and the state of California. We believe that adequate provisions have been made for any adjustments that may result from
tax examinations. However, the outcome of tax examinations cannot be predicted with certainty. If any issues addressed by our tax
examinations are not resolved in a manner consistent with our expectations, we could be required to adjust our provision for
income taxes in the period such resolution occurs.
The following table summarizes the tax years that are either currently under audit or remain open and subject to examination by the
tax authorities in the most significant jurisdictions in which we operate:
 Tax Years
Vietnam 2011 - 2019
Japan 2015 - 2019
Malaysia 2015 - 2019
United States 2017 - 2019
135
Table of Contents
In certain of the jurisdictions noted above, we operate through more than one legal entity, each of which has different open years
subject to examination. The table above presents the open years subject to examination for the most material of the legal entities in
each jurisdiction. Additionally, tax years are not closed until the statute of limitations in each jurisdiction expires. In the
jurisdictions noted above, the statute of limitations can extend beyond the open years subject to examination.
18. Net Income (Loss) per Share
The calculation of basic and diluted net income (loss) per share for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 was as
follows (in thousands, except per share amounts):
2020 2019 2018
Basic net income (loss) per share    
Numerator:    
Net income (loss) $ 398,355  $ (114,933 )$ 144,326  
Denominator:    
Weighted-average common shares outstanding 105,867 105,310 104,745
Diluted net income (loss) per share    
Denominator:    
Weighted-average common shares outstanding 105,867 105,310 104,745
Effect of restricted and performance stock units and stock purchase plan shares 819 — 1,368  
Weighted-average shares used in computing diluted net income (loss) per share 106,686 105,310 106,1 13
Net income (loss) per share:
Basic $ 3.76 $ (1.09)$ 1.38 
Diluted $ 3.73 $ (1.09)$ 1.36 
The following table summarizes the potential shares of common stock that were excluded from the computation of diluted net
income (loss) per share for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 as such shares would have had an anti-dilutive
effect (in thousands):
2020 2019 2018
Anti-dilutive shares — 868 299
136
Table of Contents
19. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The following table presents the changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of tax, for the year ended December 31,
2020 (in thousands):
Foreign Currency
Translation
AdjustmentUnrealized Gain
(Loss) on
Marketable
Securities and
Restricted
Marketable
SecuritiesUnrealized Gain
(Loss) on
Derivative
Instruments Total
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ (73,429 )$ (5,029 )$ (876)$ (79,334 )
Other comprehensive income (loss) before reclassifications 120 38,236  (2,409 ) 35,947  
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive
loss (2,930 ) (15,346 ) 1,199  (17,077 )
Net tax ef fect — (1,231 ) (31) (1,262 )
Net other comprehensive income (loss) (2,810 ) 21,659  (1,241 ) 17,608  
Balance as of December 31, 2020 $ (76,239 )$ 16,630  $ (2,117)$ (61,726 )
The following table presents the pretax amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into our consolidated
statements of operations for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
Comprehensive Income Components Income Statement Line Item 2020 2019 2018
Foreign currency translation adjustment:
Foreign currency translation adjustment Cost of sales $ 370 $ 1,190  $ — 
Foreign currency translation adjustment Other (expense) income, net 2,560  — — 
Total foreign currency translation adjustment 2,930  1,190  — 
Unrealized gain on marketable securities and
restricted marketable securities Other (expense) income, net 15,346  40,621  55,405  
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative contracts:
Foreign exchange forward contracts Net sales — 124 (1,698 )
Foreign exchange forward contracts Cost of sales (1,199 ) 1,081  (212)
Foreign exchange forward contracts Foreign currency (loss) income,
net — — (5,448 )
Foreign exchange forward contracts Other (expense) income, net — — 546 
Total unrealized (loss) gain on derivative contracts (1,199 ) 1,205  (6,812 )
Total gain reclassified $ 17,077  $ 43,016  $ 48,593  
20. Segment and Geographical Information
We operate our business in two segments. Our modules segment involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules,
which convert sunlight into electricity. Third-party customers of our modules segment include integrators and operators of PV solar
power systems. Our second segment is our systems segment, through which we provide power plant solutions in certain markets,
which include (i) project development, (ii) EPC services, and (iii) O&M services. We may provide any combination of individual
products and services within such capabilities (including, with respect to EPC services, by contracting with third parties) depending
upon the customer and market opportunity. Our systems segment customers include utilities, independent power producers,
commercial and industrial companies, and other system owners. From time to time, we may temporarily own and operate, or retain
interests in, certain of our systems for a period of time based on strategic opportunities or market factors.
137
Table of Contents
In August 2020 we entered into an agreement with a subsidiary of Clairvest for the sale of our North American O&M operations.
The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of certain third-party
consents and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the sale to be
completed in the first half of 2021. In January 2021, we entered into an agreement with OMERS for the sale of our U.S. project
development business. The completion of the transaction is contingent on a number of closing conditions, including the receipt of
regulatory approval from FERC, the expiration of the mandatory waiting period under U.S. antitrust laws, a review of the
transaction by CFIUS, and other customary closing conditions. Assuming satisfaction of such closing conditions, we expect the
sale to be completed in the first half of 2021.
Our segments are managed by our Chief Executive Officer, who is also considered our chief operating decision maker (“CODM”).
Our CODM views sales of solar modules or systems as the primary drivers of our resource allocation, profitability, and cash flows.
Our modules segment contributes to our operating results by providing the fundamental technologies and solar modules that drive
our business and sales opportunities, and our systems segment contributes to our operating results by using such modules as part of
a range of PV solar energy solutions, depending on the customer and market opportunity. Our CODM generally makes decisions
about allocating resources to our segments and assessing their performance based on gross profit. However, information about
segment assets is not reported to the CODM for purposes of making such decisions. Accordingly, we exclude such asset
information from our reportable segment financial disclosures.
The following tables present certain financial information for our reportable segments for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019, and 2018 (in thousands):
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
 Modules Systems Total
Net sales $ 1,736,060  $ 975,272  $ 2,711,332  
Gross profit 429,131  251,542  680,673  
Depreciation and amortization expense 181,402  20,813  202,215  
Goodwill 14,462  — 14,462  
 Year Ended December 31, 2019
 Modules Systems Total
Net sales $ 1,460,1 16 $ 1,603,001  $ 3,063,1 17 
Gross profit 290,079  259,133  549,212  
Depreciation and amortization expense 161,993  21,708  183,701  
Goodwill 14,462  — 14,462  
 Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Modules Systems Total
Net sales $ 502,001  $ 1,742,043  $ 2,244,044  
Gross (loss) profit (50,467 ) 442,644  392,177  
Depreciation and amortization expense 85,797  18,647  104,444  
138
Table of Contents
The following table presents net sales for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 by geographic region, based on the
customer country of invoicing (in thousands):
 2020 2019 2018
United States $ 1,843,433  $ 2,659,940  $ 1,478,034  
Japan 469,657  34,234  234,814  
France 127,097  88,816  28,796  
Canada 118,865  5,944  5,391  
India 33,848  7,451  232,130  
Australia 20,788  138,327  153,163  
All other foreign countries 97,644  128,405  111,716  
Net sales $ 2,711,332  $ 3,063,1 17 $ 2,244,044  
The following table presents long-lived assets, which include property, plant and equipment, PV solar power systems, project assets
(current and noncurrent), and operating lease assets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 by geographic region, based on the physical
location of the assets (in thousands):
 2020 2019
United States $ 1,043,954  $ 1,077,593  
Malaysia 878,064  637,322  
Vietnam 670,440  699,841  
Japan 382,823  416,375  
Chile 224,666  234,470  
All other foreign countries 45,775  75,356  
Long-lived assets $ 3,245,722  $ 3,140,957  
21. Concentrations of Risks
Customer Concentration Risk. The following customers each comprised 10% or more of our total net sales for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018:
 2020 2019 2018
 % of Net Sales % of Net Sales % of Net Sales
Customer #1 11 % * *
Customer #2 10 % * *
Customer #3 * 16 % *
Customer #4 * * 16 %
Customer #5 * * 13 %
——————————
* Net sales for these customers were less than 10% of our total net sales for the period.
Geographic Risk. During the year ended December 31, 2020, our third-party solar module net sales were predominantly in the
United States and France and our solar power system net sales were predominantly in the United States and Japan. The
concentration of our net sales in a limited number of geographic regions exposes us to local economic, public policy, and regulatory
risks in such regions.
Production Risk. Our products include components that are available from a limited number of suppliers or sources. Shortages of
essential components could occur due to increases in demand or interruptions of supply, thereby adversely affecting our ability to
meet customer demand for our products. Our solar modules are currently produced at our facilities in Perrysburg, Ohio; Lake
Township, Ohio; Kulim, Malaysia; and Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam. Damage to or disruption of these facilities could interrupt our
business and adversely affect our ability to generate net sales.
139
Table of Contents
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
The following exhibits are filed with or incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K:
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
 Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
 First FilingExhibit
 Number
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of First Solar , Inc. S-1/A 333-135574 10/25/06 3.1
3.2 Amended and Restated Bylaws of First Solar , Inc. 10-Q 001-33156 5/5/17 3.1
4.1 Description of the Registrant’ s Securities 10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 4.1
+10.1 Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement S-1/A 333-135574 10/25/06 10.15
10.2 Form of Director and Of ficer Indemnification Agreement 10-K 001-33156 2/27/13 10.20
10.3 Credit Agreem ent, dated as of September 4, 2009, among First Solar ,
Inc., First Solar Manufacturing GmbH, the lenders party thereto,
JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, Bank of
America and The Royal Bank of Scotland plc, as Documentation
Agents, and Credit Suisse, Cayman Islands Branch, as Syndication
Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.1
10.4 Char ge of Company Shares, dated as of September 4, 2009, between
First Solar , Inc., as Char gor, and JPMor gan Chase  Bank, N.A., as
Security Agent, relating to 66% of the shares of First Solar FE
Holdings Pte. Ltd. (Singapore)8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.2
10.5 German Share Pledge Agreements, dated as of September 4, 2009,
between First Solar , Inc., First Solar Holdings GmbH, First Solar
Manufacturing GmbH, First Solar GmbH, and JPMor gan Chase Bank,
N.A., as Administrative Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.3
10.6 Guarantee and Collateral Agreement, dated as of September 4, 2009,
by First Solar , Inc. in favor of JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.4
10.7 Guarantee, dated as of September 8, 2009, betw een First Solar
Holdings GmbH, First Solar GmbH, First Solar Manufacturing
GmbH, as German Guarantors, and JPMor gan Chas e Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.5
10.8 Assignment Agreement, dated as of September 4, 2009, between First
Solar Holdings GmbH and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.6
10.9 Assignment Agreement, dated as of September 4, 2009, between First
Solar GmbH and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative
Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.7
10.10 Assignment Agreement, dated as of September 8, 2009, between First
Solar Manufacturing GmbH and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as
Administrative Agent8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.8
10.11 Security Trust Agreement, dated as of September 4, 2009, between
First Solar , Inc., First Solar Holdings GmbH, First Solar GmbH, First
Solar Manufa cturing Gmb H, as Security Grantors, JPMor gan Chase
Bank, N.A., as Administra tive Agent, and the other Secured Parties
party thereto8-K 001-33156 9/10/09 10.9
10.12 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15,
2010, among First Solar , Inc., the borrowing subsidiaries party thereto,
the lenders party thereto, Bank of America N.A. and The Royal Bank
of Scotland PLC, as documentation agents, Credit Suisse, Cayman
Islands Branch, as syndication agent and JPMor gan Chase Bank,
N.A., as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 10/20/10 10.1
+10.13 Employment Agreement, dated March 15, 2011, and Change in
Control Severance Agreement, dated April 4, 2011 between First
Solar , Inc. and Mark W idmar10-Q 001-33156 5/5/1 1 10.3
140
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
 Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
 First FilingExhibit
 Number
10.14 First Amendment, dated as of May 6, 2011, to the Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2010, among First
Solar , Inc., the borrowing subsidiaries party thereto, the lenders party
thereto, Bank of America, N.A. and The Royal Bank of Scotland plc,
as documentation agents, Credit Suisse, Cayman Islands Branch, as
syndication agent, and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative
agent8-K 001-33156 5/12/1 1 10.1
10.15 Second Amendment and Waiver , dated as of June 30, 2011, to the
Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15,
2010, among  First Solar , Inc., the lenders party thereto, Bank of
America, N.A. and The Royal Bank of Scotland plc, as documentation
agents, Credit Suisse, Cayman Islands Branch, as syndication agent,
and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 7/14/1 1 10.1
+10.16 Employment Agreement, effective July 1, 2012, and Change in
Control Severance Agreement, effective July 1, 2012 between First
Solar , Inc. and Geor ges Antoun10-Q 001-33156 8/3/12 10.1
10.17 Third Amendment, dated as of October 23, 2012 to the Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement dated as of October 15, 2010, among First
Solar , Inc., the lenders party thereto, Bank of America, N.A. and The
Royal Bank of Scotland plc, as documentation agents, Credit Suisse,
Cayman Islands Branch, as syndication agent, and JPMor gan Chase
Bank, N.A., as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 10/26/12 10.1
+10.18 Non-Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of
March 15, 201 1, between First Solar , Inc. and Mark W idmar10-Q 001-33156 5/7/13 10.2
+10.19 Change in Control Severan ce Agreement, effective as of July 1, 2012,
between First Solar , Inc. and Geor ges Antoun10-Q 001-33156 5/7/13 10.3
10.20 Fourth Amendment dated as of July 15, 2013, to the Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2010, among First
Solar , Inc., the lenders party thereto and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 7/19/13 10.1
10.21 Amended and Restated Guarantee and Collateral Agreement, dated as
of July 15, 2013, by First Solar , Inc., First Solar Electric, LLC, First
Solar Electric  (California), Inc. and First Solar Development, LLC in
favor of JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 7/19/13 10.2
+10.22 Amendment to Change in Control Severance Agreement 10-Q 001-33156 8/7/13 10.1
10.23 Restricted Cash Assignment of Deposits 10-Q 001-33156 8/6/14 10.2
+10.24 First Solar , Inc. 2015 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan DEF
14A001-33156 4/8/15 App. A
10.25 Fifth Amend ment, dated as of June 3, 2015, to the Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2010, among First
Solar , Inc., the lenders party thereto and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 6/5/15 10.1
+10.26 Employment Agreement, effective as of July 25, 2011, and Change in
Control Severance Agreement, effective as of October 25, 2011 and
amended as of August 1, 2013, between First Solar , Inc. and Philip
Tymen deJong10-K 001-33156 2/24/16 10.23
+10.27 Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of July 1, 2016,
between First Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar , and Amendment to Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of July 1,
2016, between First Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar, and Second
Amendment to Change-in- Control Severance Agreement, effective as
of July 1, 2016, between First Solar , Inc. and Mark W idmar10-Q 001-33156 4/28/16 10.1
141
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
 Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
 First FilingExhibit
 Number
+10.28 Employment Agreement, effective as of October 24, 2016, and
Change-in-Control Severance Agreement, effective as of October 24,
2016, between First Solar , Inc. and Alexander Bradley10-Q 001-33156 11/3/16 10.1
10.29 Sixth Amendment, dated as of January 20, 2017, to the Amended and
Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of October 15, 2010, among First
Solar , Inc., the lenders party thereto and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A.,
as administrative agent8-K 001-33156 1/27/17 10.1
10.30 Second Amen ded and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of July 10,
2017, among First Solar , Inc., the borrowing subsidiaries party thereto,
the lenders party thereto , and JPMor gan Chase Bank, N.A., as
administrative agent8-K 001-33156 7/14/17 10.1
+10.31 Form of Grant Notice for Executive Performance Equity Plan 10-Q 001-33156 7/27/18 10.1
+10.32 Form of Grant Notice for CEO Leadership Equity Plan 10-Q 001-33156 7/27/18 10.2
+10.33 Form of Performance Unit A ward Agreement - Form Perf Unit-008 10-Q 001-33156 7/27/18 10.3
+10.34 Form of Performance Unit A ward Agreement - Form Perf Unit-009 10-K 001-33156 2/22/19 10.45
+10.35 Form of Grant Notice for 2019-2021 Executive Performance Equity
Plan10-Q 001-33156 10/24/19 10.1
+10.36 Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of October
7, 2019 between First Solar , Inc. and Caroline Stockdale10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 10.34
+10.37 Form of Performance Unit A ward Agreement - Form Perf Unit-010 10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 10.46
+10.38 First Solar , Inc. 2020 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan DEF
14A001-33156 4/1/20 App. A
+10.39 Form of Grant Notice for 2020-2022 Executive Performance Equity
Plan10-Q 001-33156 5/8/20 10.1
+10.40 Employment Agreement, First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectu al Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Patrick Buehler10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.1
+10.41 Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August
10, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Jason Dymbort10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.2
+10.42 Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August
10, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Markus Gloeckler10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.3
+10.43 Employment Agreement, First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectu al Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Michael Koralewski10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.4
+10.44 First Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of October
8, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Caroline Stockdale10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.5
142
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
 Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
 First FilingExhibit
 Number
+10.45 Employment Agreement, First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectu al Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Kuntal Kumar V erma10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.6
*+10.46 First Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of January
8, 2021 between First Solar , Inc. and Markus Gloeckler— — — —
*+10.47 Form of Performance Unit A ward Agreement - Form Perf Unit-01 1 — — — —
*+10.48 Form of Performance Unit A ward Agreement - Form Perf Unit-012 — — — —
*+10.49 Form of RSU A ward Agreement — — — —
*+10.50 Form of Option A ward Agreement — — — —
*+10.51 Form of Share A ward Agreement — — — —
*+10.52 Form of Cash Incentive A ward Agreement — — — —
*21.1 List of Subsidiaries of First Solar , Inc. — — — —
*23.1 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm — — — —
*31.01 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)
and 15d-14(a), as amended— — — —
*31.02 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)
and 15d-14(a), as amended— — — —
†32.01 Certification of Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section
906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002— — — —
*101.INS XBRL Instan ce Document – the instance document does not appear in
the Interactive Data file because its XBRL tags are embedded within
the Inline XBRL document— — — —
*101.SCH XBRL T axonomy Extension Schema Document — — — —
*101.CAL XBRL T axonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document — — — —
*101.DEF XBRL T axonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document — — — —
*101.LAB XBRL T axonomy Label Linkbase Document — — — —
*101.PRE XBRL T axonomy Extension Presentation Document — — — —
*104 Cover page formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101 — — — —
——————————
*    Filed herewith.
†    Furnishe d herewith. This exhibit shall not be deemed “filed” for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or
otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act
of 1933 or the Securities  Exchange Act of 1934, whether made before or after the date hereof and irrespective of any general
incorporation language in any filings.
+    Management contract, compensatory plan, or arrangement.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
None.
143
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
FIRST SOLAR, INC.
Date: February 25, 2021 By: /s/ BYRON JEFFERS
Name: Byron Jef fers
Title: Chief Accounting Of ficer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ MARK R. WIDMAR Chief Executive Of ficer and Director February 25, 2021
Mark R. W idmar
/s/ ALEXANDER R. BRADLEY Chief Financial Of ficer February 25, 2021
Alexander R. Bradley
/s/ MICHAEL J. AHEARN Chairman of the Board of Directors February 25, 2021
Michael J. Ahearn
/s/ SHARON L. ALLEN Director February 25, 2021
Sharon L. Allen
/s/ RICHARD D. CHAPMAN Director February 25, 2021
Richard D. Chapman
/s/ GEORGE A. HAMBRO Director February 25, 2021
Geor ge A. Hambro
/s/ MOLL Y E. JOSEPH Director February 25, 2021
Molly E. Joseph
/s/ CRAIG KENNEDY Director February 25, 2021
Craig Kennedy
/s/ WILLIAM J. POST Director February 25, 2021
William J. Post
/s/ PAUL H. STEBBINS Director February 25, 2021
Paul H. Stebbins
 
/s/ MICHAEL SWEENEY Director February 25, 2021
Michael Sweeney
144
